Been going to Dr. Goldberg for over 10 years. I think I was one of his 1st patients when he started at MHMG. He's been great over the years and is really all about the big picture. It is because of him, not my now former gyn Dr. Markoff, that I found out I have fibroids. He explores all options with you and is very patient and understanding. He doesn't judge and asks all the right questions. Very thorough and wants to be kept in the loop on every aspect of your medical health and your life.
Got a letter in the mail last week that said Dr. Goldberg is moving to Arizona to take a new position there in June.  He will be missed very much.  \n\nI think finding a new doctor in NYC that you actually like might almost be as awful as trying to find a date!
I drove by yesterday to get a sneak peak.  It re-opens on July 14th and I can't wait to take my kids.  The new range looks amazing.  The entire range appears to be turf, which may or many not help your game, but it looks really nice.  The tee boxes look state of the art and the club house looks like something you'll see on a newer course.  Can't wait to experience it!
A great townie bar with tasty food and an interesting clientele. I went to check this place out on the way home from the airport one Friday night and it didn't disappoint. It is refreshing to walk into a townie bar and not feel like the music stops and everyone in the place is staring at you - I'm guessing the mixed crowd of older hockey fans, young men in collared shirts, and thirtysomethings have probably seen it all during their time at this place. \n\nThe staff was top notch - the orders were somewhat overwhelming as they appeared short-staffed for the night, but my waitress tried to keep a positive attitude for my entire visit. The other waiter was wearing a hooded cardigan, and I wanted to steal it from him due to my difficulty in finding such a quality article of clothing.\n\nWe ordered a white pizza - large in size, engulfed in cheese, full of garlic flavor, flavorful hot sausage. An overall delicious pizza, aside from 2 things: 1, way too much grease (I know this comes with the territory, but still, it is sometimes unbearable); 2, CANNED MUSHROOMS - the worst thing to come out of a can. Ever. I would rather eat canned Alpo than canned mushrooms. And if the mushrooms weren't canned, they were just the worst mushrooms I've ever consumed. The mushroom debacle is enough to lower the review by an entire star - disgusting!\n\nMy advice for the place is keep everything awesome - random music from the jukebox, tasty food, great prices, good crowd and staff - and get some decent mushrooms; why they spoil an otherwise above average pie with such inferior crap, I'll never know.
I heart King's. I've always been a fan and this one was as good as my old one in Monaca.
Rocky's has been in business since the 1980s and still going strong.  Their food is good.  Not haute cuisine, pretentious!  Everyday, well prepared and taste bud pleasing home style cooking.  I've mostly gone during supper hours and  and ate in the dining room, but, today I introduced an old friend to \"linner\" in the bar.\nHe ordered the large version of fish sandwich.  Rocky's is famous for their fish.  Three large breaded and fried fish filets, bun and fries for under $10.  Needless to say, he had no complaints and brought home more than he ate.\nI ordered the meatball grill.  It was delish.  Served on thick cut Italian bread and made \"grilled cheese\" (mozzarella) style.  Meatballs and tomato sauce are both good!  Also, served with fries.  I brought home half the sandwich.\nAnother good meal there.  Friends, mother, and former boss all enjoy their food!
I miss this place. When I return home to pittsburgh this is always a must to ease myself into a saturday morning recovery after getting banged up on cheap south side cocktails the night before. When I think of pittsburgh, I remember cutting morning classes in highschool just to get after the best bacon egg and cheese i know of. Honestly i live in nyc where you can get a bacon egg and cheese on every single corner, and nowhere that i have been does it as well as this joint. Go here and you will be happy you did.
Great breakfast, good price. You might have to stand outside in line though, so I don't really recommend winter time to go. lol. Very friendly service, interesting coffee mugs. They have great deserts and such also. Bring your cash though as they dont' take cards.
Best Irish food in the Burgh.  Great bar food too.  The service is maybe a bit surly and it's not the cleanest, nor the best decor.  But, that's not what this place is about.  It's a town Irish bar and it serves great solid Irish fare and suds to the locals.  And it does it better than anyone.  I go back again and again.
When I moved to the area, Dr. Weinberg was recommended to me by my cousin who had been a client for years. I've had nothing but positive experiences with her and her staff since seeing her two years ago. The team is professional, nice and courteous. I recently had to reschedule an appointment due to a last minute work thing and they were very accommodating. My daughter looks forward to coming to the dentist so that's saying something. I DO wish they would turn off FOX news in the lobby as I'd rather watch paint dry but... nobody's perfect.
I belong to this gym...  I live in the South section of Pittsburgh, and I find that this gym is not too far from me.  The staff is friendly, the equipment is quite good.  You get two free personal training sessions when you join.  They have lots of weights (which my boyfriend uses) and a decent cardio room.  The only thing I would say is to increase some of the cardio equipment.  Water is only $1 a bottle!
Yay, I'm a fan but sometimes service is a little slow, it was very good for us this visit.  Go to Papa j's every once in a while but mostly for the White Pizza.  It is the best white pizza I have ever had.  Order the white pizza on our visit this  weekend... it has garlic, spinach, feta cheese and we usually add some veggie on top.  It was delicious!  Order fried calamari and it was OK...note to self next time try the calamari roman style.\n\nLike the dinning room with the hardwood floors and bright lighting.  \n\nThe bar was jumping thou never go to the bar.
Yay, I'm a fan of the white pizza.  Had take out.  \n\nThe bar was jumping when I picked up our order.\n\nThe white pizza is so delicious...with garlic, spinach, feta, and added some veggies.  Tried the Roman Style calamari, very good better than the fried calamari we had last time.
OK, its Friday night and have about 70 minutes to eat. Driving by Papa J's and W says, lets stop in and get a quick dinner. \n\nAdvice host that we are in a hurry.  The host advised us it is a 90 minute service. The place was crowded, we were seated at the last open table. However our waiter, Jason, said he will do his best to get as out on time. We ordered our dinner immediately, with a salad and a glass of wine. In a few minutes we had our wine, then in a few more seconds we had our salads and some great homemade Italian bread with some olive oil and balsamic ving. for dipping.  Yum!\n\nJust as we were finishing our salads our dinners were delivered. Great job Jason! The Fettuccine Carbanara was very good; a thick cream sauce with bacon and ricotta.  In and out in 60 minutes.  Now that is some good service.
Great little gem! The food was fantastic was very food and just the right price. The Italian food was amazing, but you can not leave without a dessert and be prepared for giant serving. I had the carrot cake yummy!! Def a place everyone should try.
san francisco california visitor liked the food and the local is great. I am thinking about relocating to pttsbrgh area. I liked Carnegie because u can stroll down Main street and hit a couple places for lunch. I imagine this place would be crazy busy on friday or saturday night. we ate a lunchtime and it was nice.
I was pleasantly surprised by this restaurant.  Came here with no expectations.  \n\nI was greeted by a large open (garage style) window, that opened the whole lounge bar area to the street.  It had modern furnishings and the staff were quite friendly.\n\nOrdered the quattro formaggi pizza.  Quite good!!!  Great balance of cheeses.  Not too rich at all.  Crust was excellent too.  Can't wait to come back.
spinach/feta cheese salad:  B-\npesto alfredo penne :  :A+\nCoconut Cake huge piece:  A+\nbread small portions:  B\nService B \nhost seemed grumpy, waitress good, but then she got busy .\nPRICE: Pasta was $15 and the portion smallish more like a $12.99 dish \nARRIVE EARLY ON SATURDAY NIGHT THIS PLACE PACKED after 6pm
Fast food in a resturant setting.  Considering this food is good and cheap plus you can get food to go.  Must be a reason why this place is always packed.
As far as I'm concerned, Filene's Basement is good for two things: cheap dresses and cheap accessories.\r\n\r\nAs a young performer, I need good-looking dresses for frequent auditions -- and I need a couple, so I'm not wearing the same thing every time. The dresses on the second floor usually range from $30-60 and are good for over a year. It can be hard to find a full-length dress that's not reminiscent of a prom dress, but their selection of cocktail-length dresses is ample.\r\n\r\nAs far as accessories go, Filene's tends to have cheap versions of popular trends. If I feel the need to stock my wardrobe with a transient fad, Filene's is the place to go.
Even when we didn't have a car Filene's Basement was worth the bus trip to the Waterfront. I always find something (usually I find 3-4 things and spend about $60) and better still, I am always still wearing the clothes and shoes 3 months later. \n\nI kind of suspect this is the best shopping in Pittsburgh; it's much better than the usual department stores, better than Marshall's and TJ Maxx and better than the Saks downtown, even when it has a sale. Selection, bargains AND quality.\n\nI like this Filene's better than Gabriel Brothers, which are harder to get to. Gabriel Brothers are a real discount shopper's challenge and I'm afraid I didn't live in Pittsburgh long enough to develop the necessary skills . . . Filene's was still up and running in June 2007 when I left town.
Always a good time, although it's definitely not a place I would visit often. It's great for groups....which is quite obvious since there are always several folks there for bachelorette  parties and birthdays. \n\nShut out to the piano players, who can not only play the piano, but also sing, play the drums and the sax. They are funny and know how to keep a crowd entertained. Also know some pretty obscure songs. \n\nMy big criticism is the set up. If you don't have a reservation and/or come later in the evening, it's difficult to get seats. Believe me, I don't mind standing, but it does become a bit awkward when you have to keep scooting over to let waitresses and patrons past you. If you do find a seat, it is often littered with someone else's empty glasses.
Waterfront Lowe's beats Monroeville Lowe's for lawn and garden.  Hate to admit it, but it's true.
I love the games here but can't go very often since they don't rotate new games in very often.  The place is usually pretty clean.\n\nPool tables often have a wait on the weekend but are some of the better ones you'll find in the city.\n\nFood is just \"ok\" Drink prices are fair but not great.
I'll have a biased opinion of any place like this. What could be wrong with playing old and new school games, drinking, and eating all at the same place? The one thing I can think of is the price. On the surface, this is a pretty expensive place; however, they give a bunch of good deals depending on the time you go, whether or not you \"donate\" money to the Make-a-Wish Foundation, and if you're lucky when you take a spin on the wheel of prizes! But honestly, know what the deals are before you go to make sure to get the best price available. \nIn regards to the games, there's a plethora for your enjoyment. Although it is nice to play games that spit out tickets, the last couple of times I've gone I've gotten 2 hours of arcade games for a very cheap price (Mario Kart, anyone?!). Either way, it's a really fun place that you'll most certainly have a good time at.
Beer selection was good, but they were out of the ones we wanted. 4 of the 6 people in our group ordered steaks all of them were cooked to their satisfaction. The bourbanzola was a good addition. Defiantly a place I would go again. Joe, our server, was awesome and super friendly.
I've always been pleasantly surprised with the food I've gotten at Rock Bottom.  I say \"surprised' because with any restaurant that falls into the slippery territory of a \"chain\", you expect to find your fair share of culinary duds.  But I've really had a lot of good meals at Rock Bottom.  Now, granted, you do owe it to yourself when ordering to not forget where you are (a \"bar-straunt\" if you will), and don't get anything above and beyond this place's call of duty.  For instance, I will never be ordering the ahi tuna.  I'll leave that to my favorite sushi bars and restaurants a bit closer to the water (the Mon doesn't count.....).\n\nBut besides that, I always really enjoy my meal choices.  I've recently gotten the chicken avocado sandwich.  Chicken was grilled perfectly, plenty of avocado, and it was a good sized sandwich without being excessive.  I've also ordered the Margherita pizza, which could definitely be split between two people.  It's an eight cut that comes to you on a big wooden pizza paddle.  The pizza was really great.  The crust was crispy, it had a good balance of cheese and tomatoes, and the basil pesto was fresh and tasty.  And not greasy whatsoever - BIG bonus points there.  But my biggest surprise as of late was when I ordered their chicken flautas.  I'm a HUGE Mexican food fan and always hesitate to order Mexican outside of a Mexican restaurant for fear of being disappointed.  But I had an insatiable craving one night and decided to go for it.  It was DELICIOUS.  The flautas are deep fried which gives you an amazing crunch, and they still managed to not dry out the inner ingredients.  The accompanying rice was nice and moist as well.  I was so happy!\n\nI've always been quite happy with the service there as well.  I go on Thursday evenings for trivia, and nine times out of ten the service is really spot on.  The ladies servicing the bar area are friendly and attentive.  Only once or twice, to my memory, has my service been sub-par, and that can usually be chalked up to an extremely packed Trivia Night with only two visible servers helping 50+ people.\n\nI definitely give Rock Bottom two thumbs up for taking your typical chain-found food and making it fresh, yummy, and worth coming back for more.
Rock Bottom was our first stop on a 17 mile pub crawl.  As expected, the bar was lively, the food was good, and the service was accommodating,  The beers are better than Church Brew Works and the bar was populated.  The bartender readily offered a taste of beer and gave us a hat to wear for the rest of the crawl.  \nI vote for Rock Bottom as the anchor store of the Water Works.
I haven't been to Rock Bottom in years.  Maybe even decades...is that even possible?  Well, either way, it's been awhile.  So with my gift certificate I took my brother out for a birthday dinner.  \n\nAs I get older, my tolerance for things like crowds and youngsters gets lower and lower.  As a result, I told my brother to be ready by 4pm so we could head to the Waterfront before everyone goes out for date night.  Plus the Pirates were playing at 4:05 so we could enjoy our beers and the game.\n\nWhen we arrived, the bar side was already pretty packed but we were still able to get a table.  Our server was very attentive, friendly and helpful.  Right off the bat we both ordered samplers so we could try all of their beers.  We loved the fact that as she approached our table with a full tray of samples our server said, \"I have to go back for the rest.\"  In all we were served 10 different beers each (in 3 oz glasses, maybe 4 - I can never tell).  I gotta say, Rock Bottom knows their beer.  I liked more than I didn't, and very few were not to my liking.  So the $6.95 10 beer sampler was well worth it.  \n\nDuring our sampling we indulged on some Southwest Egg Rolls.  They were okay, but not quite what I expected.  The spicy ranch was top notch, though.  As we ran out of beer, we each ordered up a Kobe Burger.  They were both cooked exactly to our liking (medium).  And to top off our wonderful evening, the Pirates brought home a win!\n\nMy only complaint, as a beer drinker, is the cost for a growler.  The glass container itself is sold for $12.95.  That's the empty price.  To me, that's a little ridiculous when East End only charges $3 for the bottle and Penn Brewery $5.  Paying more for the bottle than the beer inside seems like insanity to me.  So I walked out empty handed.    But it won't deter me from returning.
Went to Rock Bottom for lunch the other day and was very pleased. My coworker had printed out a coupon for a free mini appetizer. The waitress told us that they were not making mini appetizers and gave us a full sized chicken quesadilla. If you have ever had the southwestern egg rolls from Chili's - the filling tasted like that and I am a big fan! \n\nMondays are half off burger days and I tried the just hot enough burger - topped with crispy jalapenos, pepper jack cheese, pico de gallo and housemade habanero ketchup. It was delish! The ketchup was so good and the fries were extremely crispy. \n\nThe prices are a little steep for lunch but if you go on Monday, it's totally worth it. I think that the quality of food more than makes up for it but don't expect for pay under $10 for a sit down. \n\nI felt that the staff was very nice and the waitress was very attentive. The service was quick and I think you can get in and out in under an hour.
I go to Rock Bottom pretty often for dinner or their awesome beer, so I was really really excited to have my bridal shower there.  My maid of honor reserved the banquet room which was very nice and separated from the rest of the restaurant.  My MOH and mother said that the person they talked to about reservations and arrangements was wonderful and easy to get in touch with.  My shower was wonderful, the wait staff was great and kept everyone's glasses full.  It started pouring down rain and they let us stay a little longer so my gifts wouldn't get wet when taking them out to the car.  The only reason this place gets 4 stars is because we were not allowed to take our leftover food from the buffet home.  There was salmon, chicken, potatoes, and mac and cheese left over and they told us we couldn't box it up.  Not sure why- they can't re-serve it!  It would have just gone to waste!\n\nAlso, not at all related to the shower, their trivia night is super fun!
I'm not much of a beer drinker, but my fiancee is a major enthusiast, so I agreed to tag along.  I'm glad I did!  Our waitress was very knowledgeable about the extensive house-brewed beer selection, and helped me to pick one I would love (the kolsch was very crisp, light, and drinkable.)  The food was standard pub fare with a twist, well-executed.  My burger was topped with onion petals and gorgonzola, and cooked to perfection.  The waitress recommended their macaroni and cheese for a side, which was definitely a good choice.  My only complaint is that most of the food was rather heavy, and I spent the rest of the night wallowing on the couch.  Not sure I would make the hour+ trip to Pittsburgh again, but if I found myself in the city, I may just stop by.
I really miss the Northstar Amber but the specialty beers are always good.  Food is excellent and the service staff is friendly.
Another good meal ... this time the Housemade Meatloaf. It's a blend of turkey and sausage instead of the standard ground beef. A refreshing and delicious twist on a comfort food staple. Served over cheddar mashed and mixed veggies. The server could have behaved like she wanted to be there but everyone has a bad day once in awhile. Service was prompt just the same. Overall good experience.
The staff here is very nice and the set up has TVs all around the family so enjoy mostly all sports, the music is nice and pretty mellow and the place is very spacey and the prices are pretty reasonable. And most importantly is the place seems to be kept clean at all times.
Good food and large portions. I ordered the Veggie Burger for $8.50 and I loved it! It's one of the most unique veggie burgers I have ever had: a homemade patty of beans, rolled oats and veggies. The chipotle mayo really gave it that oomph. My burger was more than enough for me to handle and everything was worth the price. As for drinks, I'm a complete noob when it comes to beer but my friend ordered a tap and even from a small taste, I could tell it was very good quality beer. Bitter and sweet, with a slight tang. I rarely drink beer but i I'm going to, then might as well drink the best kind there is - fresh and microbrewed.\n\nNOTE: There aren't too many options for vegetarians. The veggie burger was pretty good and I'd recommend it, but other than that, there's also the veggie tacos, a few select appetizers, and a few salads from which to choose.
This was my second visit to the club and it was still a blast. My girlfriends bought tickets for John Witherspoon for my bachelorette. We were all looking forward to it and it was hilarious! He was wonderful. \n\nThe servers were fantastic. They always came back to check in on us and make sure we had plenty to eat and drink. I suggest the Pink Cadillac for a drink as well as the cheese cake and chocolate cake for dessert. \n\nThe only reason it isn't 5 stars is because they had us wait an hour past the time we were to enter the building. We were to see the 9pm showing so the doors were to open at 8:45pm. They came out and explained that the show had run over and we wouldn't be able to even enter the building until 9:20pm. It was 28 degrees outside. We finally were able to enter the building, order drinks then the show finally started at 9:45pm.  The host did offer a blanket apology which was nice but hardly made up for the fact the show started almost an hour late.
Good! I can't comment on the food or the bathrooms, but from what experienced it was great! The drinks were decent, and I  believe you must order two items at minimum. The staff is quick, but they should have more people working on a Saturday night. Before you can ask for anything else they bolt to the next table or to the kitchen.\n\nThe comics we saw were funny as well. Will definitely go back!
I went here for the first time the other night and had a great time!  The comedian was hilarious and it was a great intimate setting for a fun night out with friends!  My only complaint was that it was a little pricey for the overall experience because not only do you need to buy a ticket, but every person needs to buy 2 items of food/drink and the drinks aren't cheap (around $10-12).  However, I would definitely go back sometime!
You're getting an extra star for two solid reasons.  \n\nOne is because the remodel is over and the store is pretty again (and a bit fancier).  Two, and thee most important part, this iggle has the best quality and well made sushi out of any Iggle's out there!  Believe me, I've eaten many a rainbow roll from many different locations around the Burgh and nothing has compared.  Dare I say, it's as close as you get to going to a good sushi restaurant.  Bold statement, right? \n\nI  just love me some sushi and want it often, quick and convenient and this serves all those purposes with upholding the quality.  Need a quick sushi fix?  This place is it!
oddly enough, of all the giant eagles i have visited in pittsburgh, this is the only location that carries the toothpaste that i've used for most of my life (outside of pittsburgh). the location is clean and the staff are friendly.  i sometimes resent having a market district being the closest giant eagle to my apartment, as many of the items that i buy there are severely overpriced. but whenever i run out of groceries and toothpaste at the same time, i take the hike down to waterfront to shop here, although they may not carry all the groceries that i'd like.
I'm with Rachel C. on this one. You get an extra star for being a pretty Giant Eagle and a Cafe with a very decent beer selection of 6packs and individual bottles. Even though the Giant Eagle in Robinson is better in my opinion you, Waterfront Giant Eagle, are not bad and pretty close to where I live.
One comfy seat in the entire place, but they have a cafe, they have good books to look at, and they are open until 11pm.  What more could you want?  Why an APPLE PURSE of course!  And a nice Earl Gray tea thrown in for good measure.  Wow...I love this place.  I am such a nerd...only a nerd would enjoy going to a book store and reading as much as I do.  The extra amenities just make it that much more enjoyable.
I've eaten just once, mostly I go for drinks. Nice, lively place, nice outdoor seating for the summer and fall.\nDrinks are good, service is good.\nLocation is great as well, right across the movie theater.
I'm not into waterparks as much as I am into amusement parks.  I go to Sandcastle maybe once a year.  But my Chicago friend Catherine came in to visit for the weekend and after a day at the zoo, we donned our swimsuits and came here.  The main part of the park is closed in the evenings, but the Sandbar and the Sandbar Pool and the Hot Tub remain open for the 21 and over set.  The Sandbar has a great menu of food and drinks and has a $6.00 cover charge to get in.  Occasionally there's live entertainment.\n\nIt's hard to believe that before they built this place, it was the site of an abandoned steel mill.  Actually, it was the railroad yard for the nearby Homestead Works.  But after site-clearing and clean-up, they turned it into a beautiful place to spend a warm day or nice evening.  The view across the Mon is quite beautiful with a wooded hillside on the other side.  There's even a boat dock, so you can arrive by river if you desire.\n\nI'm glad I renewed my acquaintance with this place and hopefully, I'll get another chance to come back.
So the last time I went to a water park was probably when I was in elementary school and didn't really know how to swim (... I still kinda don't. lol). Anyway, it was in California at Raging Rivers and it was a traumatizing experience. Screaming & being tossed around in the pool that pushes periodic waves at the sound of a loud horn and ending up with scraped knees and feet. Not fun.\n\nSo to say the least, I was a bit nervous coming to this water park afraid to have another episode of feeling I was being drowned. Luckily that did not happen.\n\nI seriously had SO MUCH fun here! I honestly was only expecting to go on the Lazy River pool all day but with my bf, we hit up so many rides... tandem AND single rides! I feel like such a big girl now! Definitely lean back while you're on those single donuts on the water rides, or else you feel like you're going to flip over while swishing down the tubes. The new dragon ride they just opened up was okay. I was expecting it to be so much more fun, but literally you just slide down a dark tube into a circular room where you just slowly swirl your way down the middle hole and that was it. \n\nThere was this one ride where you slide down the tubes for a few seconds, then you land into a pool where a worker pushes you into another tube and this continues about 3 times. It was weird. Kinda awkward with the worker having to grab you and push you through. Although it was still fun. The last dude threw me in backwards! Scared the crap out of me but it was fun :)\n\nThe food here is surprisingly pretty affordable. Plus, who wants to eat a huge meal while in your swim suit. Me don't want no pot belly. \n\nOverall I had such a fun time here. It definitely made me rethink my fear of water parks. By the way, we went on a Saturday in early June and it wasn't as packed as I thought it would be! So the lines weren't long at all. Also, go to Giant Eagle to purchase your discounted tickets. You save a few bucks versus buying them at the water park. Oh and don't forget to bring sandals while walking around. Your feet will literally feel like they're burning from the ground. Now go off and have some fun! :)
My girlfriends made reservations here for my bachelorette party last Saturday. I highly suggest that you make reservations because we were able to just walk right in and sit down. There were people there waiting 30 minutes+. We had the sangria which was amazing. Our sever Alex recommend it and it was perfect for the 4 of us.  I had their thin crust pepperoni pizza which really hit the spot. My two friend had salads which they said were amazing and my other friend joined me in ordering a pesto chicken pizza. Let's just say there wasn't any food left on the table when we were finished.  I will be back for sure.
All in favor of a deep dish pizza say I!.......IIIIIII,  ok now that i have that out of my system. This place is such a great hangout/eat-in spot. I hadn't been here and years and some friends invited us out for the evening. I was so glad they were paying cause  I was low on funds at the time.\n\nWe arrived on a friday night and of course it was busy there. We waited about 10 minutes to get a table which wasn't bad considering the crowd. We looked over the menu and they have so many great choices. Pizza, pasta, appetizers, seafood, burgers, salads and sandwiches. \n\nAfter ordering two mango lemonades that were wayyyyy over sweetened we ordered our food. We both are going gluten free which is tough but UNO's gave us a nice selection of dishes to choose from. Plus! They make a thin crust gluten free pizza which taste great. My hubby ordered the mediterrean thin crust because he loves kalamata olives and I ordered the Guac-alicious burger with a Caesar side salad. My salad came out pretty quick which was nice but it had a little too much dressing on it. I didn't complain, it still tasted great.\n\nI'm not into red meat so I tried to order a black bean burger or get chicken instead of beef, but the ran out of black bean and they couldn't get the chicken so i just ordered it anyway. The burger was piled really high with all the toppings including guacamole and it was very creamy but i couldn't get over the taste of the burger because it just didn't have any flavor. Very saddening. I ended up just eating the veggies and discarding the meat. I snacked on some of my hubbies pizza even though it was only a small amount. \n\nWe came here twice in one week. The second time we ordered the 9-grain deep dish with mushrooms, parmesan and a garlic white sauce. Was this pizza amazing or what?? I will probably always eat this pizza whenever I come. \n\nOnly down side is slow service. It took 20 minutes for our pizza to come out and my hubbies was a little over cooked. He got the numero uno which was ok but mine had way more flavor!!
I had the deep dish pizza and it was very good!  The individual size was smaller Than I expected for $12 but I wasn't starving so it was very filling.  Our waitress April was very nice and attentive for how busy it was.  We had about a 30 minute wait but it was worth it!  I can't wait to try it again!
My friend and I have never eaten here before so last night we decided to check it out. For a Thursday it wasn't that crowded and we were seated promptly. There were plenty of flat screens and warm lighting that made the place cozy. We ordered a thin crust pizza: on one side there was chicken, hamburger and pepperoni (for him) while the other side had just pepperoni (for me). I was expecting the pizza to be bland and warm but it was surprisingly hot and savory. I even tried a slice of my friend's pizza and the hamburger and chicken were moist, not dried out. This wasn't bad for a first visit so I will definitely be back in the future to try more menu items. I'm only giving Uno 4 stars because the waitress brought us a plate that still had old food stuck to it. Hello! The plate was yellow! How could she not have seen that?!
We visitied PF Changs on Sunday with a large group of 20 people.  Although they had to split the tables - everything was delicious!\n\nWe enjoyed everything from the spring rolls and chicken lettuce wraps...to the mooshu that they made special vegetarian for one of the guests...to the fried banana dessert!\n\nif you are with a group, and you want dessert - get the fried bananas!  They come wrapped in a spring roll wrapper and with coconut/pineapple ice cream.\n\nOverall, we had a great time and would come back here again.
So I have never been to P.F. Chang's before since I'm Chinese and I'm not a huge fan of eating at Chinese/American restaurants when I can eat delicious authentic Chinese food at home (courtesy of my momma). My boyfriend and I were at Dave & Busters and weren't in the mood for American food, which was what we were all surrounded by so I decided to give P.F. Chang's a try. \n\nWe came on a Saturday night without reservations, so we had to wait 45min :( Luckily time went by fast while I was on my phone looking at the Yelp reviews for this place. When we were seated, we ordered immediately and our server was very friendly. We got the salt and pepper calamari as an appetizer and then the Dan Dan noodles and Shanghai shrimp with garlic sauce. The food came out quick which was a huge plus considering how busy they were. The calamari was okay. I felt like the strips were cut too thin and we should have received more. The Dan Dan noodles were actually very delicious and flavorful. I really enjoyed them and definitely recommend them. The shrimp was cooked well and was also good. Overall I was happy with my first time experience here and would consider coming back if I'm ever in the mood for Chinese/American food.
A big thank you to Chad Cynamom, manager at PF Chang's for making our anniversary night so special.  He seated us, brought us drinks and told us about the menu.  Every time my fiance and I go to this PF Chang's, we get the best service.  Food isn't the most authentic chinese food we've ever had, hence the 4 stars.  It is a bit overpriced as well, but the service makes up for it.
Good quality pork fried dumpling and mongo beef.  Bar service was fast and Efficent.   Good value.  Not a 5 cause dragon eye tea was cold first time around and beef had minor amount of fat.   Fortune was even Postive!
We had another opportunity to eat here today and the experience was much improved. There was no crowd to fight and we weren't seated near the door as we were last time. As I expected, getting a table near the edge of the restaurant provides for a much nicer dining experience. Our service was good and they accommodated our 1 year old nicely. I appreciate that they serve steamed veggies on the kids menu. \n\nI still left with the impression that the serving sizes were small in comparison to most other places, but we were satisfied and happy.
This is the fourth Changs I've eat ate. It was pretty good. The food was kinda like it had been previously frozen. Had a strange texture. Some of the changs chicken pieces was stuck together and the breading on the sweet and sour chicken was mushy and falling off the chicken. Overall still pretty good. Would eat at this one again.
I live close by so I go here frequently pretty much for the free WIFI and espresso. But here's a secret - they don't seem to know what an Americano is so often I am charged like 75 cents for a double shot of espresso to which they add hot water upon my request. Needless to say coffee is not expensive here as you can fill up as many times as needed without being hassled. Although there regular coffee is undrinkable to my taste. Pastries are baked fresh and are plentiful. There is other foods to choose from ie whole grain bagels are edible and about a buck with no extra charge for butta. Outside seating and people watching is always a good distraction plus there are all kinds of people who frequent this Panera from the very very old and decrepit to the fashionistas taking a break from Victoria Secrets, Ulta, Wet Seal and the other various shops at this water front location.
It was my first time here.  Was recommended by my coworker.  However, I was a little unsure as I've read some bad reviews about this place.\n\nThe first visit was great.  The receptionists were helpful and gave me guidance on how to get my dog licensed.  Everyone seemed happy and talkative.  \n\nDr. Bezak was very nice.  He had a smile on him the entire time I was there.  He was very quick to give me information about anything and everything relating to the dog.  Overall, I had a good first visit and definitely going back.\n\nThe only thing that made it didn't earn a five-star is that my appointment is at 12:15pm.  The entire office have their lunch at 1pm.  So I can tell there was alot of hustle to get me out of their asap.  I don't mind that it was a quick visit, but I would have liked to had time to ask more questions.  If you want adequate time with the doc, consider making your appointment after their lunch.
What can I say, I'm a shill for Target!  Like another reviewer says, you have to watch the impulse buying here because it is so easy to do!\n\nBut as for the name brands here, I've never had a problem with them.  I bought some Woolrich blankets and sheets here that my husband and I have been very satisfied with.  The housewares section here is positively unbeatable.  My husband Rick is an amateur chef and he could blow his paycheck on the kitchen utensils.  He particularly likes the Michael Graves ones.  He is also an amateur photographer and he still works with film, so he likes the film development here.\n\nMe, I also like buying household cleaners and personal items such as soaps, toothpaste, deoderant, etc because the selection is so good.  I've also purchased a lot of my casual wear here.
Oh Target!  You are big corporate America!  But how can I not love you so?  Your prices are the best whenever I need household goods like detergents, cleaners, etc.  For personal effects such as toiletries, soap, etc, you can't be beat!  Your cookware and bakeware department is every bit as good as Macy's!\n\nAnd I see you have the retro tees too.  You know:  Yes http://www.dovenetq.net.au/~mahayes/Graphics/YesLogoFullCircle1.jpg Boston http://www.vinylrecords.ch/B/BO/Boston/Boston/boston-63.jpg Led Zeppelin http://henrikfalck.com/blog/uploaded_images/LedZeppelinLedZeppelinalbumcover-716782.jpg  We know what \"retro tee\" means:  faux aged, catering to boomers and teens, and costing way more than they origianlly did.  Oh and made in China of course!
Target is one of my favorite stores -- I just love wandering around late at night when the store is quiet -- it's just so therapeutic! This location is now my closest store, so I drop by pretty often.\n\nThis store is pretty average. Inventory and customer service aren't particularly stellar but isn't poor either. I've generally been able to find what I need here and check out pretty quickly. \n\nIn addition to the common pharmacy and photo studio found in most Targets, this location also has an optical department. Of the 10-15 locations in the Pittsburgh area, only this store and the Cranberry store sell glasses. I purchased a pair of glasses and sunglasses through Target Optical three years ago and have been very happy with their product and customer service.
I've been to many Targets and they're all the same. However, this particular one is currently being remodeled. Children's clothing, toys, electronics and health & beauty items have been moved to other parts of the store. There is a new Starbucks that is now open. The cafe that is there has been remodeled and will serve Pizza Hut pizza and other new menu items. The area where the electronics used to be it is now going to have a small grocery section. Basically, this Target in Homestead will eventually look like the one in East Liberty. I like this Target, so I am pleased with the new changes (especially Starbucks)!
I love bed bath & beyond! \n\nThe employees at this particular one are always available and helpful!  \n\nThe selection, plus the 20% off coupons keep me coming back, and its also where I get all of the things for my soda stream. \n\nOverall I will be back many, many times
Very good cheap food. Pittsburgh classic.Great desserts! The oreo pie is amazing! The servers are always very friendly. The salad bar could be a little more clean.
Service was slow, but that was because one of our party insisted that the bartender, her favorite server, serve us in our private room for a party of 8.  The food and drinks were good and we woud return.
My husbands first time.  Nice to be able to pick your fish and style of cooking.  I had a trio of Jamaican jerk tilapia,  salmon,  and scallops.  All good but too much sauce on scallops.  Husband had surf n turf special. Snow crab legs tasty but smaller portion than I expected. Glad they had raw oysters,  but no idea where they were from.  For $2.50 each you'd think they'd say.  Waitstaff friendly but inexperienced when it came to wine.  We taught two of them how to open a champagne bottle.  Nice time out,  but two gripes... #1 Used my phones flashlight to see if there was an outlet on the floor.  Felt like an archaeologist finding old remains of dinners gone by.  Crumbs,  napkins wedged between booth and wall,  gum,  dirt.  For the price I would expect a cleaner place. #2 our waiter kept saying Thank you. After every single sentence,  even when it wasn't appropriate.  Silly gripe,  right?  But it was way over the top and felt more like,  Can I have a tip?  Can I have a tip?
In the Homestead area of Pittsburgh. Seafood gumbo was very good.\nBroiled scallops were very good, partner had sea bass stuffed with lobster, also very good. Vegetable sides were not as good as the fish. With two glasses of wine the total was $83. In and out in an hour.\nI'd go back because the fish was that good
Underated and ignored!  if you see this ol time pizzaria near Kennywood stop on by good crust nice and buttery in the sicilian style!  Better then DiSallas  the only thing I can say that is better then Latinas is Mineo's !  they say the best pizzarias are the little holes in the wall type places and this is one of those enviroments!  Small and cozy very nice and relaxing afternoon!  To just enjoy with yourself and a friend!
OMG good pierogis in a classic blue collar 'hood. At first glance, it looks like a place to get a flat fixed on your tire. Instead, I re-learn why I always avoid the corporate food franchises and seek places like this out. Just go there and eat whatever the nice woman behind the counter tells you to! It's well worth the mapquest ...
Have been here two times after stopping at Mancini's Bakery. Have only had the Hamburger/Cheese/Bacon w/ fries but huge portions and great price. Great Quality also. Server is really nice also. Will be eating here again. Heard the Breakfast items are also great. Saw the waffles and pancakes....were huge!
Very quaint! Stopped here for lunch while traveling for work, and I felt like I was in a diner in the 1950s. Had a grilled cheese and fries - the food was good and everyone was friendly.
A great little place. Delicious and affordable Italian food. Great salads and pasta. Try the pizza rolls!
came back to Pittsburgh for a wedding and couldn't find anything in my price range close to the city until i found this motel...it was very affordable....room was okay...cable tv and a/c worked fine....
Lincoln Bakery makes very delicious donuts, pastries, and desserts. Their bread selection, however, was very limited and upon making our choice the quality of the bread was mediocre. We were also disappointed that many of the things in the shop are not labeled and when the store is busy it can be difficult to find staff to explain what different options are. Still, this should be a go to for a local bakery if you are looking for something sweet.
I can't believe I've been here multiple times and haven't reviewed it yet.  I absolutely love this place.  It's a super thrift store if you will.\n\nNo matter when I come here, I always find something.  It quite the experience.  I always make sure it's a day when I am off of work because I can literally spend hours here just looking.  It's a good thing that I do this, you can't just show up here and think that you will be able to gran an item and then leave.  \n\nLike a fellow reviewer said, there are not fitting rooms here, so be prepared to walk into someone trying on a potential great new garment for them self in the middle of an aisle.  Sometimes you just can't avoid this, I blame the fact that they have mirrors set up throughout stores.\n\nThey have everything you can seem to desire here.  Clothing to electronics, furniture to bedding, books to movies.  EVERYTHING is under this roof.\n\n*Cash only, ATM on premise.
This thrift store is one of the best in Pittsburgh; it's huge and has a great selection of books, clothes and housewares.\n\nWith that being said, there are a number of drawbacks to shopping here because of its popularity. It starts with the parking. There are a few spots in front of the store, with two \"overflow\" lots that quickly fill up. Getting out is a bear if you're heading back towards the city, like I usually am, because to pull up to the traffic light you have to go the wrong way through the very narrow parking area in front of the store. Crossing three lanes on 51 without the help of a traffic light just seems like a bad plan.\n\nOnce inside the store, beware of other customers on the weekends. I've encountered aggressive shoppers on multiple occasions who are usually welding carts as weapons. Let's just say some shoppers think it's OK to block off entire aisles so they can peruse a section.\n\nOther notes: There are no fitting rooms. I sometimes try on clothes over the ones I'm wearing in front of a mirror, because hey, it's a thrift store.\n\nAlso, they're cash only.\n\nDespite these setbacks, I find myself coming back every few months because I've found some really awesome things here, from dresses to plates. Just think of the trip as a little adventure.
I've been going here since I was a wee tot.  I have always enjoyed their food even though there's nothing too special about it.  I really like their breakfast menu.  You always seem to get lots of food for very little money, which is nice.  \n\nMy only complaint is that it is WAY TOO SMALL and always very busy.  They should really look at expanding the restaurant.
I ate here this past Sunday morning for breakfast with my girlfriend.  I have been by this place many times and was excited to finally make it inside.  We were lucky that we went fairly early as a line developed shortly after we were seated at our table.  The Rusty Nail is prepared for this in a pretty cool way though as they have a list outside of the restaurant that you can sign into as well as some coffee to partake of while you wait.\n\nFor my entree I decided to go with one of the specials for the day which was the Rusty Nail omelet while my girlfriend decided on another special which was the a mushroom, spinach and feta junior omelet.  Her omelet is self explanatory while mine had in it some salami, cheese and three pieces of sliced pepperoni on top of it.  It was readily apparent that the pepperoni was not the cheap kind that you get on most pizzas as it had more flavoring and tasted much better.  Both omelets came with sides of home fries and toast for which we both ordered deli rye.  The junior omelet tasted good as the sourness of the feta played nicely with earthy mushrooms while the spinach made it feel like I was eating healthy.  My omelet was just as good if not better than the junior omelet as the cheese and meats combined to make it seem like I was almost eating a pizza.  Some of my hash browns were slightly overcooked and they had too many onions for my taste but we still decent enough to be a side to the main show.\n\nThe bottom line for me is that I would definitely head back here in the future.  Everything that I tasted was good and I would not hesitate to take any of my friends here for a breakfast.
Good selection, but it will cost you.\nMultiple fridges of cold beer, but only the cheap beer is cold.\nNice in person, but rude on the phone.\nParking lot, but none of the customers understand how to park.\n\nEvery good thing about this place is equaled with a bad thing about this place - hence it probably deserves 3 stars. I would really give it a 3.5 if available as this is currently my beer distributor of choice, but since its not possible I have to go with 4.\n\nWhy 4 you ask, when I just went through all that 3 star crap? Any place that offers beer samples provided by attractive women gets a half star boost for sure, and as long as I'm going there anyway it really makes for a more interesting trip.\n\nAfter all, if you don't like free beer, you are probably a terrorist.
We are fans of Pistella Beer Distributors simply because we needed beer one night while visiting some friends and family in Pittsburgh and they happened to be on the way to something we were doing.  It's a hole in the wall kind of facade but they do have a good selection.  I don't remember the price being that expensive but looking at the average review so far...it shows $$$$.  I'm sure they have some nice stuff, but we just got a case of beer (I think one of those Magic Hat variety packs) and it seemed similar to what we would pay in the other stores.  Anyway, we had a good experience with this place and don't really have anything bad to say about them.
Animal Elegance is not much on the outside but the owner was very nice & LISTENED to how I wanted my teacup poodle groomed and used the products that I requested.\nI was very happy with my services and I will return. \n My poodles groom was $50,including tip, which I think is very reasonable.
I went to Pino's to celebrate a friends birthday on a Thursday night.  I hadn't been in Pino's since they renovated, but I have to say that they made the interior beautiful.  We made reservations, but I don't think we would have needed them since there was just a few other parties seated when we came in.  \n\nMy two girlfriends and I always have a tough time deciding what to order...so naturally we order one of everything that looks good.  We started with the Charcuterie platter, which was a mix of absolutely delicious prosciutto, capicola, and soppressata with a bit of veggies and mozzarella.  This was an impressive way to start out the meal.  We all wanted to try the seasonal ravioli, which was pumpkin (too tempting for three certified pumpkin fanatics), so we got an order to share as an appetizer.  This was unlike other pumpkin ravioli I've had...very pumpkiny.  The ravioli was good, although we all agreed that we wouldn't have been able to eat a whole order.  It was very sweetly spiced and I was missing a little bit of savory with the dish.  \n\nI ordered the grilled sausage pizza for my entree, and was pleased with it.  I admittedly never get too excited about pizza, and this was good, but nothing that I was dreaming about later that night.  Overall, the food was a 3-4 for me.  \n\nThe service was outstanding.  Our waiter was very welcoming and knowledgable.  My friends got dessert, and when the chef (I assume Chef Pino?) came over to ask how it was, my friend jokingly said that it was delicious, but would be perfect with a bit of sauce.  Before she could take another bite, he whisked both of the desserts away and added fresh strawberries and sauce, saying that he would be serving the dish that way for now on.  Talk about service!  The whole experience was fantastic, service gets a 5.  \n\nAdded bonus:  Awesome beer selection, some brews I haven't seen.  Only place I've been that had East End Homewood Reserve on tap for me to try (exciting for a beer dork like me, and it is tasty, by the way).
I ate here this past Friday with my girlfriend and two other dining companions.  We decided to come here because it was Pittsburgh restaurant week and they offered a special 3 course $30 fixed price menu with 2 course wine pairing for $12.  It ended up being a small little restaurant in the middle of Point Breeze which I had been past many times previously but never really noticed.\n\nThe restaurant was swamped whenever we got there, probably due to a combination of it being Friday night and restaurant week, so thankfully we had made reservations and were seated almost immediately.  I decided to start off my meal with a salad while my girlfriend had the tomato garlic bisque.  My salad was good and came with goat cheese, pears and a vinaigrette which all tasted nicely.  It was nothing amazing but I think it takes a really special salad to be amazing.  I also tried my girlfriends bisque and unsurprisingly found it to be a bit tomato-y since I do not enjoy tomatoes very much but she really enjoyed it.  For my entree I decided to get two small plates instead of a larger entree and settled on the mac n cheese and fish tacos.  The tacos were a bit sloppy/wet but had some nice flavors (cilantro, aoili and pico) in them along with some chili sauce that gave it a nice little kick.  My mac n cheese came out in its own little cast iron type pot and was good.  There was an adequate amount of cheese throughout and I liked that they even had some ricotta buried inside the dish.  I was also able to try the Arrabbita that one of our dining companions had ordered.  Wow was it good and it packed quite the spicy punch too.  Immediately I regretted not ordering it although I still did enjoy my two small plates.  For my dessert course I ended up having the White Chocolate Creme Brulee.  My girlfriend decided upon the tiramisu while another at our table had the peaches and puff pastry.  All of the desserts seemed large and made sure that we did not go home hungry!  My creme brulee tasted decently and ended up being a good finish to my meal.\n\nThe bottom line for me is that I would definitely head back here in the future.  Their regular menu seemed reasonably priced and everything that I had tried throughout the night was good.
Good pizza and hoagies.  It is always busy.  Cash only.
This is a Pittsburgh/Shadyside institution.\n\nWhat can I say, this place is good-eatin' basic Italian food!  Not spectacular, but when you want a good nuthin-fancy dinner, this is the place to go.  The pizza is outstanding.
This is where I learned what good espresso tastes like. If you make it to Highland Park, stop there and get some great neighborhood atmosphere.
Maybe Tazza D'Oro doesn't need another review, but I guess it never hurts to lend your voice to the chorus of those praising a good, solid and well-run local business.  \n\nThe coffee selection is terrific.  The baristas are professional and courteous.  No, they are not chatty, but they are polite and friendly.  I'm not there for conversation, but for good coffee.  And that's what you get.  \n\nThe pastries and snacks are fine.  Good variety.  \n\nThe atmosphere is JUST what I want when I need a cup of coffee: relatively quiet, comfortable and calming.  \n\nWhen it first opened (how long ago how?) it was mobbed by some of my neighbors (I live in Highland Park) who adopted it as their private club and often seemed peeved at \"others\" who stopped by.   They've either relaxed or found other obsessions.  The clientele is, as folks said, eclectic and invigorating.  \n\nIt's become our after-dinner spot after a meal at Park Bruges or Smiling Banana Leaf, too!
Great variety of coffee and methods (press, Chemex, pour-over).  I did not get a chance to try to the espresso, but it looked very good as well. Verve and Olympia are two very solid roasters and provide a wealth of choices. \n\nStaff was very helpful, location great. All around a good place in Pittsburgh.
I had always meant to visit Enrico's, and since my friend recently moved to the neighborhood, it was a perfect opportunity to cross it off my list.\n\nSo here's what I liked: the cappuccino was perfect. It's an awesome cappuccino, topped with a cute foam art leaf.\n\nHere's what I didn't like: Sometimes I take my cappuccino plain, sometimes I take it with a shot of syrup. On this occassion I asked if I could get amaretto syrup, which they had. But the barista responded: \"No, you can't.\" He said they only make their cappuccino plain, and if I liked sweet, he could make me something special, but I would have to trust his taste. Here's the thing...I don't like sweet! I don't have much of a sweet tooth. I just wanted a tiny bit of sweet, so I didn't think trusting his mystery concoction was a good idea. I just got it plain.\n\nI'm not a big fan of coffee shop snobbery nor the fact that this guy seemed to have sterotyped me as a Starbucks-guzzling yuppie who had to be shown what a \"REAL\" cappuccino tasted like. Please, I lived in Italy, I've had a \"REAL\" cappuccino...but right now, I want a flavor shot in it. I still tipped because I wasn't sure if it was the barista or just a general rule at this place, and he did offer to make me something different. I just don't get what the deal is here...why do they even bother having flavor syrups if you're not \"allowed\" to add them to your drink? \n\nIt's a 5-star cappuccino for sure, but I had to subtract a star for the attitude.
Best coffee it Pittsburgh? Maybe, but this place is certainly competitive. French Press, Drip, espresso, or pour over? You name it they've got it. Only downside of this place is a limited food and pastry selection. If it is just coffee you want you this is the place. It is it a bit snobbish sure, but not nearly as much as many of the other coffee shops in Pittsburgh.
This is a quiet little nook in Highland Park that is perfect for tea, coffee, snacks and getting some work done or catching up with an old friend. I used to frequent this place much more when I lived in Pittsburgh, but I still make an effort to come back a few times a year for the ambience. It is great in the summer and fall because they have a few tables outside.  The staff is great and the prices are reasonable, too. The only change I could think of would be to put on some soft easy listening music. It'd make the vibe a little more comfortable!
Best Cafe in Pittsburgh - like a hidden gem. The sandwiches are delicious, you must try the chocolate chip brownie, and the coffee is great and made exactly the way you like it.
I'm a gym guy. I go 3 or 4 times a week among other workouts and activities. \n\nPros\nAlways towels\nVery clean\nAlways cardio equipment open\nPools/hot tub\nLots of lockers\nFriendly staff\nLots of classes\nLots of free wights\nNext to target and trader joes\nEven during peek hours it's never over crowded\n\nCons\nWhen the old lady's come in they take up all the parking spots some how. But that's not the gyms fault\nOnly one flat bench press\nSince they have pools and a kids activities some times kids wonder into the wight areas\n\nSo in the end more pros then cons.\nThis is more just nit picking but as all gyms have them. There are a few weirdos who are members and just take up space more then workout but oh well what can ya do about it.
In the last week I've been here twice, partially because I don't know any better and partially because it's actually pretty good! It's one of the few places that doesn't reek of cigarettes, it's never crowded and the open garage doors are great for fresh air.\n\nI tried their buffalo (boneless) wings last night in the jack daniel's sauce  - way better than Sharp Edge's. The sauce was pretty mild but still quite tasty and if you're not a super wings eater, you can get a fries/wings combo for super cheap. To wash it down I had Loose Cannon beer, how can you pass up a beer with a pirate tap handle!\n\nOur waitress was a little slow, she said it was her first night. Who makes a new girl work on a Friday night! She seemed to have gotten more attentive and fast towards the end, or maybe it's because I wasn't hungry anymore so I didn't care.\n\nThe beer was pricy - Tuesday night I had a maker's sour for the same price as a pint of beer...
Food: 2 stars. It's really not very good. Especially the entirety of the combination platter they make with chicken fingers and wings. Blue cheese wasn't bad though. My wedge salad was enormous- more like a half head of lettuce than a wedge. Nice and fresh though. \n\nDrinks: 3 stars, for the decent variety (better than expected from a place like this) and the game time specials.\n\nService: 3 stars. Could have been better, could have been worse. Friendly but unattentive and not good at realizing when to come to the table. (Hint: if one person calls you over for a drink, make sure the rest of us are set before running away.) \n\nAtmosphere: 4 stars - really good job of having enough televisions for everyone to see the game/s and marking each so you know what's on. \n\n1 Bonus star for accommodating the Pittsburgh area Buffalo Bills fans! GO BILLS!!!
Good fun place to watch games while drinking and eating chicken wings or sandwiches.They have a good selection of wings and decent beer. I try different kinds of wings  every time  I go in but so far spicy garlic has been my favorite. This is a typical sports bar.
Loved the hot vegetarian sandwich. Not easy to find veggie dishes which don't feel like a compromise. This was great. Excellent service from waitress Ariella with the long black pony tail (don't know her last name). Nice casual atmosphere. Resonable prices.
I have to say that I have had quick and efficient stops in here for all of my car needs. Firstly, walking into this building is quite a spectacle, from the beautiful exterior and interior. I have to be honest, my first trip in here I felt like taking my escalator down into the pit that is AAA was equivalent to taking a trip into the fifth ring of hell. I hate anything dealing with the DMV, registration, license, tags, blah blah blah. However, both of the times I stopped in here it was not crowded at all, and the women that helped me were very nice and thoughtful. The stations you must go through are quick and effective. Both times I had business here, I was in and out in less than a half hour- which was far better than the marathon nightmare I was expecting.
It's surprising how long it took me to get here, then I hear a rumor they're moving soon anyway! Geez... way to be behind the times Rachel!\n\nI've been interested in a bunch of the nights they've hosted before, but have never made way way over. I went to celebrate one Miss Aja J's birthday for Hip Hop vs House night. I'm a big hip hop fan, but not much into house. They had two dueling DJ's and an MC hosting the event. I actually liked the mash up of the two genre's. It was definitely better than just house.\n\nThey have about 5 beers on tap, which I think is impressive for a \"club.\" Especially different since it was much more than Miller Light. They actually had a Pumpkin brew on tap, which forgive me for not remember, I was into! At $5.50 it wasn't breaking the bank, but it wasn't a $3 Miller Light fo sho! \n\nWe came a little early, but it seemed like the night really started to pick up around 11pm. Yep, I'm old, I left at 11pm. Lame, I know! \n\nI hope they find a new home, because I think it's a place we don't have anywhere else and I'm happy to have been finally!
Most definitely, I'm a fan of this joint. There are fabulous, high-quality displays of glass art, and they offer lots of learning opportunities if you want to make your own glass art or functional glass pieces. Plus, on gallery crawl nights (First Friday of every month!) they have snacks galore.
I order from these guys on campusfood.com\nThey are pretty good .. i get my order on time and their quality has been pretty consistent\nI mostly get things like hoagies and pizzas.. they are pretty decent\nThis place is pretty convenient for me when I am working on campus late at night when most other places have shut down.
Compared to other Whole Foods locations, this one is tiny! For comparison, the Whole Foods in Las Vegas must be at least three times the size. Still, it's nice to have and it is pretty decent overall albeit pricey.
Hello!\n\nI work pretty close to Whole Foods so I frequent it about 3-4 times a week for lunch. If you're there M-F between 12-1, you can find me in the salad/bread area (on the north end). \n\nCompared to other Whole Foods I've been to, I would actually rate it a 3 but considering I do not know of any other Whole Foods around, I thought it's my duty to those that do not know about Whole Foods a chance to give it a try. If the zucchinis at Market District looked a little weak, give Whole Foods a try. Plus their pre-made food is actually yummy.\n\nI'm able to keep my lunch on a budget by only buying lettuce and chicken from the salad bar (typically under 1/2 pound). I stash dressing, cranberries, and cheese in my office. I've tried buying the bag of pre-washed lettuce but I never finish them and I hate seeing them go bad. $3 lunches isn't bad at all.\n\nOther notes: The tofu chicken is really good (part of the salad bar)! It's not always available though. Also, none of their bread varieties impress me. I like their sushi rolls. If I could afford $8/day lunches, I'd probably have it everyday. I'd give their cashiers 5 stars. =)
I like this Whole Foods location. I will tell you why.\n\nMany Yelpers have docked stars for the parking lot. I think that's irrelevant. The parking lot, which is actually shared by Starbucks, Wine & Spirits, Walgreens, PNC, and more is two levels and is enormous! Walk a little. You can even take your cart up the elevator.\n\nThe Pittsburgh location is not a superstore. Other Whole Foods have a restaurant, brick oven pizzas, smoothie bar, coffee bar, many more food bars, wine, beer, and so forth. This is a teeny weeny Whole Foods. For its size, the selection is pretty impressive. For example, my mom saw something on Dr. Oz called Lingonberry Jam and asked if I would look for it, and there it was. Never heard of it before, but they had it. \n\nWhole Foods has that \"whole paycheck\" reputation. Granted, this is true if you're spending your whole paycheck on rare, gourmet, specialty foods! If that's the case, you might want to rein in your spending a little. \n\nI actually took a notebook to Trader Joe's, Giant Eagle, and Whole Foods when I first moved to Pittsburgh to compare prices. Giant Eagle (Greenfield location) was the most expensive by an overwhelming margin! Trader Joe's was the best value overall, but Whole Foods was very close, and sometimes a little better quality might be worth it. Their 365 brand is especially reasonable for your regular grocery staples.\n\nAs for the occasional splurge, this is a good place to try something different. I admit it's hard not to get something extra, but I know I can only blame that final total on myself!
Parking is tough, the food selection is great, and if you call ahead they will set aside awesome moving boxes for you.
This review is for the buffet at Whole Foods. Overall, it is good, and there are lots of great options. The food seems fresh and it is a good place to get a quick, healthy lunch on-the-go. I went with a friend and we spent a little over $20 on lunch for the 2 of us, which seems a little high for what it is, but I think we must have just gotten a lot of food because $7.99/lb is fair. Plus it is hard to get lunch for any less than that these days without eating fast food.
Just wanted to write a review based on my experience today.\n\nEverything I went for was in stock today (which doesn't always happen). The place was crowded, as usual, but the line went fairly quickly. On my way in, I saw a $5 fish sandwich with creamy coleslaw advertised outside. Three guys were there cooking. Looked and smelled delicious, so I paid inside with my groceries. When I came out, I told the guys I bought one. They were really nice and asked me what kind of bread I wanted and what I wanted on the sandwich.\n\nSome lady that was \"in a rush\" was upset her sandwich wasn't ready when she came out (but they explained the fish was cooked, but they couldn't set up the sandwich without knowing what bread or toppings she wanted). Just watching the way they dealt with this customer was great for me. The guys were so friendly and patient.\n\nAlso, the sandwich was delicious! The coleslaw was also awesome! Yay! I am so happy I stopped by when I did.
I love Whole Foods, and I have been a fan for a few years now. I've visited Whole Foods locations around the country, but this Pittsburgh location is one of my favorites. It's a small store, but it feels homey and comfortable.\n\nStaff: Most of the staff members are super friendly and willing to do just about anything to help you find what you are looking for. I had one staff member begrudgingly help me out, but I assumed he was having a bad day or was very busy. Either way, it's nice to treat others with respect. \n\nThe cashiers here are so fantastic. They are never rushing and throwing food into bags. They take their time, ask you questions and treat you like a person instead of another number in a long line. \n\nDeli/Made-To-Order: The deli and made-to-order foods are currently my favorite. Sometimes I would rather spend $20 on lunch here with my boyfriend than go to a restaurant or get fast food. My favorite is the vegan chicken salad on foccacia bread. I adore this bread. It's just the right texture, it's nice and herby and deliciously buttery. Topped with swiss or muenster, it's a super delish sandwich. If I am extra peckish, I get extra veg. chicken salad. Yum yum yum! \n\nThe tomato bisque they have is something I newly tried. I'm very picky about my tomatoes and tomato products. This soup delivers. I wish I could have it every single day. It's so phenomenal! My boyfriend got it today alongside a cheddar biscuit that paired beautifully with the soup. \n\nCheeses: If you want fancy gourmet cheeses, the Whole Foods deli counter might be the best choice. We purchased a small amount of Midnight Moon Goat Cheese Gouda and made the most expensively delicious grilled cheese sandwich. We're grown-ups now, say goodbye to gross American cheeses! The cheese counter is so great because all of the cheeses are labeled with the kind of rennet used in the processing. You can easily find a high-quality vegetarian cheese with just a glance. The cheese experts are also willing to talk cheese to you for as long as you like. \n\nStore Selection: Overall the store has great options, but they don't carry everything that I wish they did. Unfortunately, they discontinued one of my favorite products - Field Roast Deli Slices. They bring in new and trendy foodstuffs though, so it's enough to keep me happy. \n\nWhole Foods can be pretty expensive, but if you don't fall for the tempting packaged foods, you can get away with a reasonable grocery bill! I primarily shop here for special items though. \n\nP.S. Their selection of natural body and haircare is great and affordable. If you have sensitive skin or don't want your products tested on animals, go here!
Yes, the parking lot in crazy. Yes, the prices are outrageously high (it's not called Whole Paychecks for nuthin'). Yes, the store is small and usually crowded and the majority of the people who shop who here completely unaware they are NOT the only people on the planet. All those things aside, I love Whole Foods. Most of the issues can be handled by slight changes in habit. For instance, park farther away instead of circling the GD parking lot for the closest spot!!! I get so sick of people complaining about that damn parking lot when all you have to do is park by Walgreens and walk. Seriously, the walk won't kill most of us. Stop being lazy. (Sorry, for the tirade; that's a pet peeve of mine). \n\nThe produce is fantastic, always. And not just the organic stuff either. The regular pesticide-laden produce is great. The quality of the meat department is second to none. Now, the bakery is a little 'Eh' for me. The muffins and cookies and cakes always look De-Lish!, but they aren't. Usually to dry or dense or flavorless. It really doesn't matter because the star of the show is...\n\nThe HOT FOODS BAR. The quality and taste of most of the hot foods/prepared foods bar is unbeatable. I lovelvoelove the breakfast bar. My dream weekend starts with waking up and taking a nice long walk, stopping for coffee then heading on to WF to pick up Eggs Rancheros Burritos and Sausage patties from the breakfast bar. I may get creamed by a bus the second I leave, but I will die happy. \n\nSome of my other favorites are a Vegan General Tso's \"chicken\" that has the BEST real chicken texture. It's really good! The mozzarella pasta salad, Sicilian cauliflower and the egg rolls which are seasonal. Don't forget to check out the packaged hot foods across from the salad bar; same stuff but pre-packaged. \n\nAs a note though, the chicken fiesta soup is nooooot good. Bland with a capital B! In general the soups are hit or miss, but a real hit is the triple squash or Butternut squash, something like that. It's next to sushi. It's very good
As a vegan (since 2008) we are a regular at whole foods. It's convenient since we live in Lawrenceville. My one and biggest complaint is that they need to carry more (if not all) organic produce. Not this \"conventional\" garbage. Other than that they have a huge variety of products and grocery items to choose from. Staff is always friendly and helpful.
I went here to get my serpentine belt replaced and a transmission flushed and these guys were friendly and efficient.  They took the time to explain things to me and I felt comfortable that they were making the appropriate recommendations without trying to charge me for things I didn't need.  It was ready in just a few hours as promised so I was able to pick it up same day.  Only complaint is that they left my transmission fluid dipstick out of place under the hood so it was just laying on top, but fortunately it didn't fall down and screw up anything since it was laying flat on the top, but if it had that could've been a more serious problem.  So I subtracted a star for that since it seemed a bit careless.
Hats? They got some sweet stuff. \nShirts? Stuff you won't get anywhere else. \nSocks? They got you covered. \n\nGreat staff and cool location. Go check this place out.
Great stuff here...The cheese plates are great and always changing. Awesome staff, and the menu offers an nice variety!!\n\nAsk for Tim for your waiter!
This place used to have a great bar/tapas menu with a decent selection of happy hour wine specials.  Now...  not so much.  Well, during HH, you can get any of the wines under $10 for $5.  Selection by the glass is limited.  \n\nAs for their menu/dinner - this is totally a different story.  I haven't really been disappointed yet!  The appetizers/small plates all pretty good, I really like the chevre croquettes ($7).  The salads are good and although I haven't gotten the soup anytime lately, I hear great things from my friends.  The entrees are always excellent - I usually tend to stick to the seafood (halibut, $29) and never have been disappointed (and importantly, nothing has ever been overcooked).  The signature orecchiette dish ($20) is soooo delicious - just ignore the fact that it is a heart attack waiting to happen - it's worth it.  The desserts are ok, personally, I feel that you would be better advised to stick to filling up on the entrees.  \n\nOh, and let me recommend the blood orange martini if they have it - very very yummy!  And it is nice that you can order Veuve Cliquot by the glass ($16).\n\nPrices are a bit high for what you'd expect for Pittsburgh, but considering the quality of food, I would recommend it.\n\nP.S. I have heard that they have a great brunch on Sundays. I personally haven't tried it, but with the number of compliments I hear, it's probably worth the try!\n\n-------------------------\nUpdate 12/9/07:  Went to the brunch.  What a great deal!  For $22, you get a choice of alcoholic beverage (bloody mary, mimosa, bellini) as well as a starter and then the entree.  They have a lot of choices, so be prepared to just try one and come back again to try the other stuff!  The smoked salmon appetizer was good although with too much mayonnaise sauce and for me, too much onion.  The truffled potato was yummy.  The arugula salad was as delicious as ever!  And for entree, we both got the Casbah benedict.  I have to admit that neither of us was blown away, but it was good and filling.  I think that we will both be back to try other things on the menu!
The food here is pretty good.  Comparable to any 3 to 3.5 star restaurant.  The lamb is definitely good.  And it is definitely a good date restaurant.  I would rather give it 3.5 stars since I've definitely eaten at better restaurants. But for Pittsburgh, it ranks pretty high up.
Can be moderately priced for lunch -- take advantage!  We had a cheese tasting simply because I *never* pass up Pleasant Ridge Reserve when given the opportunity.  They also choose a lovely soft sheep's milk and an herbed goat cheese from Cypress Grove.  Nice work but pricey -- only two slices of baguette and apple!  I had the romaine salad -- should have gone with a sandwich and the delicious looking truffle fries!  The feta and red pepper dressing were just too salty and rich for 1pm.  I spied a number of delicious looking sandwiches from my table...\n\nService was great and the waiter even went out of his way to answer a couple questions about the cheese selection.
Another great big burrito restaurant, Casbah offers some great wine and spectacular food in some great, and varied, dining rooms.\n\nThe three dinning rooms, \"outside,\" inside and downstairs.  While downstairs isn't always open when it is try and get a seat down there, it is beautiful and quiet.  Perfect for a larger group of people.  Outside is always open and you don't really realize you are outside aside from the non-padded patio chairs and heat lamps all around.\n\nThe food is Mediterranean fusion, not exactly sure what is meant by that but it is good. The hummus here was actually the first hummus that I had ever had and I am sorry to say it is what I compare all other to, few match up.\n\nThe wine list is extensive, but if you are going for an upscale bar this isn't the place, for that you'll want to go down the road to Soba.  If you want a nice place to have a drink and a conversation, Casbah is it.
Amazing brunch! I'd never been to Casbah before until this past Sunday when we decided to check it out for their prix-fixe menu.\n\nFor $22, you get your choice of alcoholic brunch beverage, an appetizer and an entree. An incredible price for a serious amount of great food. They had many options on their fixed menu - something for everyone. From huge waffles and omelets to lamb dishes, fish and the usual brunch regulars such as eggs benedict too. The appetizers list was equally as large. \n\nI started with a bloody mary. Was a nice middle ground between heavy and light - and it had some kick to it. Very good. For an appetizer I got the cheese and fruit plate with french baguette slices. There was a soft brie-like goat cheese, a blue cheese and a mild dry sheeps milk cheese as well. All were wonderful. For my entree I went with the Salmon Eggs Benedict. It was perfect. The fruit on the side was fresh cut, and the home fries were crispy on the outside, soft on the inside.\n\nI tasted a couple of other things as well. Both the polenta and the mushroom soup on the appetizer list were great. Didn't try any of the other entrees, but everyone seemed pleased. The only complaint was from a friend that ordered the truffle omelet - and it was that he thought they went too heavy on truffle oil, drowning out the eggs. \n\nAlso, service was absolutely perfect. We had a tall waiter, forget his name, but he was one of the most professional servers I've ever had. The table was cleared and cleaned immediately...he was never pushy, always friendly, and had great suggestions. One of the best experiences I've had for restaurant service anywhere.\n\nFor brunch in Pittsburgh, this is my favorite so far. Not to be missed!\n\nNow I just need to make plans to go back for dinner.
There is a disconnect here between this name, the decor and the food. That said, I had the best pork chop I've ever had here and for that I was endlessly thankful. Good salad, delicious bread and hummus. Great service. For Pittsburgh, top notch.
My boyfriend took me to Casbah for my birthday this March. This is one of our twice-a-year splurges and I have been wanted to go to this restaurant for ages.\nWe were seated outside, in the covered, heated patio. We were far enough away from the heaters that we didn't get too hot, and far enough from the doors that we didn't get too cold. The menu has changed slightly since we dined there, but some of the things have stayed the same.\nWe started with the sheep's milk gnudi, which is like ravioli without the pasta. I have a gluten allergy and I have missed ravioli quite a bit, so I was happy to eat this. The flavor of the sheep's milk is quite strong and unique, which I like. \nFor entree, I had the double-cut pork chop. This was absolutely great - the flavors and textures of the pork, butternut squash risotto, braised kale, garlic cream, and sage jus went really well together. It was an enormous portion, as well - I took some home and ate it the next day!\nMy boyfriend had the seared rare tuna. He was less thrilled with his dish, and when I tasted it, I agreed. I normally LOVE seared tuna but this was not the best treatment of it. It tasted a little too \"fishy\" and I didn't think the other flavors complimented the tuna. \nInstead of dessert, we sampled two dessert wines recommended to us by the server. I do think that $10 is a little much to charge for such a small glass of wine, but I guess that's what you have to expect when you dine at this level.\nWe are great fans of the Big Burrito restaurants, and I think we preferred our experience at Soba to Casbah. While our food was really good, the prices were a little unreasonably high. And I wouldn't recommend the seared tuna!
great atmosphere and great food. while the menu changes seasonally, my group all enjoyed the food - crab/scallop pasta, pumpkin risotto and rare tuna.\n\ncasbah also has a great wine list, and great service that is there when you need them, but doesn't annoy.
I've been here twice now, once for drinks and once for dinner, and I'd have to say that generally, I'm a fan.  Their happy hour has some good deals - $6 cocktails and glasses of wine, and $1 of bottled beer.  It was a fun, trendy atmosphere and a nice place to go for a glass of sangria after a busy day.\n\nI came back for dinner a month or so later.  We had reservations (on a Monday night) and were seated immediately -even though the restaurant was surprisingly busy.  We sat in the covered area out front - sort of like sitting in a dim, Mediterranean garden.  And yes - the lights are low throughout the whole restaurant.  Even with my young eyes, I still needed a candle to read the menu.  But it is romantic and a peaceful place to eat.  A little uncomfortable, as they have metal chairs (sort of like upscale patio furniture), but not a big deal.  Sit inside at a booth if you need to sit on something soft.\n\nThe menu is pricey and we're all poor, so we just got entrees.  I actually had a cocktail to start - the Perfect Pear - with elderflower liqueur, vodka, sage, pear, and vermouth.  There was even a little sage leaf floating in the glass.  It was a wonderful drink, with all the flavors I love.  Still, for the price, I think the portion was a little stingy.  When I buy an $11 cocktail, I like it to really fill the glass.  We nibbled on warm bread while we waited, and all tried their pesto on top - I think it was an unusual homemade pesto, something like walnut-watercress?  It was a bit bland - I think regular basil pesto would've been a better choice.\n\nThings got better during the actual dinner.  I ordered the Heritage Farms Chicken which was juicy and fresh, and served with a tangy pasta.  Each little detail of the dish was well-chosen - honestly, even the grilled baby squash was outstanding.  It's just squash!  But somehow, it was heavenly.  My friend enjoyed her Cioppino, and my boyfriend liked his veal tortellini, complete with rich pieces of lobster.  I tried a little bit, and it was tasty - very herbal and really bursting with flavor.  The only dish that fell a little flat was the potato gnocchi - my friend's boyfriend ordered it.  Actually he liked most of it very much, but he couldn't get past the aggressive bitterness of the turnip greens.  I tasted them too, and I have to say - it was off-putting.  Perhaps that's just the way turnip greens are, but it really didn't work for us in the dish.  Fortunately, the waitress was incredibly kind and helpful, and brought him out a new plate sans greens, which he finished happily.\n\nWe also had a few desserts - vanilla bean creme brulee for us, flourless chocolate torte for them.  I didn't taste it, but apparently it was incredibly rich.  I enjoyed our creme brulee - because I enjoy all creme brulee - although the roasted quince on top didn't quite work for me.  \n\nOverall, the meal ranged between good and very good, but the great service from our waitress really pushed this to a 4 star rating.  I had hoped to be a little more wowed by the food.  But this experience was definitely positive enough to warrant a second visit for dinner.  I think it'd be a nice place to go for a special occasion, or if you feel like a little splurge on a flavorful meal.
This place was recommended by an employee at Evolve spa across the street and I was very happy with the restaurant. The Salmon appetizer was delicious as was the gnocchi meal. I will definitely go back to this restaurant when I visit the area.
Food phenomenal! Service can be hit or miss.
Overall a good experience. Food was mostly very good. My sweet pea risotto was just OK. My wife's short rib ravioli was creative and very tasty. Neither of us are big eaters, but noted how small the portions were, especially compared to the price. One cup of risotto for $20+? Four ravioli for the same?\n\nThey altered the desert recipe on request, which for sure was over and above the call.\n\nService was attentive and the setting nice.
Service is a little slow but overall the best food I've had in Pittsburgh so far. If you're a seafood fan, the scallops are amazing. Very decent wine list and lots of parking.
When scoping around online for a good NYE dinner destination for my husband and me, Casbah's prix fixe menu really jumped off the page! Since the Big Burrito group is so popular, I was happy to get reservations, especially since a lot of times were already booked.\n\nThe hubby and I arrived a few minutes early for dinner. I had planned additional time to park and was delightfully reminded that Big Burrito restaurants have free valet parking -- so great, especially with slushy snow on the ground! Even though we were a few minutes early, the hostess took our coats and seated us immediately.  \n\nService was extremely attentive from start to finish. Waters were re-filled quickly. Bread was brought to the table almost immediately and we were offered another basket as soon as we finished the first. The bread came with a delicious spread - was it goat cheese? - that I just couldn't stop eating. Silverware whisked away with each course was promptly replaced.\n\nWe ordered both the land and sea courses to share so we could try the entire NYE prix fixe menu. None of the eight dishes disappointed! The first courses were Sea Scallops & Octopus and Duck Confit. The sea scallop was perfectly cooked, the octopus - thought not my cup of tea! - was also well cooked, and the balsamic flavor in the dish was very tasty. I absolutely loved the duck confit dish. It was served with mustard greens and fruit with a to-die-for dressing - a delicious combination!\n\nThe second courses were Potato Gnocchi and Mushroom Tortelloni. The gnocchi was served with lobster, which was a unique but nice paring. Though a strongly flavored dish, the tortelloni was delicious, and I enjoyed another unique paring, tortelloni with chunks of beef short rib.\n\nLake Ontario Walleye and Roasted Veal Strip Loin were the third courses. Both were cooked to perfection. The walleye's skin was perfectly crispy, and the veal strip loin was cooked medium well but was still deliciously juicy and tender. However, a component of each dish was disappointing -- a mustard flavor in the walleye and pickled mustard seeds covering the veal. I really can't hold this against Casbah though. I'm just not a fan of mustard!\n\nFinally, the desserts was fantastic! The Chocolate Ganache Tart was the ending of the sea courses. The chocolate was strong, even a little bitter, and was served with a little champagne strawberry compote. I grew more accustomed to the bitterness with each bite, and it was the perfect ending to three courses filled with fish. A Caramel Macaroon completed the land courses. The macaroon was delicious and served with a little apple sorbet and caramel sauce.\n\nOur experience at Casbah was spectacular! Based on this experience, I debated giving the restaurant five stars... but decided to wait until I returned a second time. And I can't wait to return!
- Great food. I had the Gerber's Amish Farm Chicken Breast and it was cooked perfectly and delicious =]\n- Nice wine selection. Though I'm a beer guy.\n- Friendly staff.\n- Okay atmosphere.\n\nThis place is definitely worth trying. Will be back for seconds!
Hey do I really need to review this place? Look at the previous reviews but I will let you know that they have a great lunch deal, the piccolo gusto menu. I highly recommend it because it is a heck of a deal and you can have tastes of a few different items so it pairs well with my self diagnosis of A.D.D. no offense to anyone who has A.D.D but it definitely kept my attention throughout my lunch experience. First off the service was excellent very attentive server who was really a foodie, which I really appreciated. She knew a heck of a lot about the seemingly simple dishes I had ordered. The Piccolo Forno allows for a choice of Salad or soup, a pasta or risotto, half sandwich. I went with a taste of the Pea Tendrils and Frisee Salad, while slightly complex to eat, it had a savory flavor from the light dressing and blue cheese crumbles, then I went with cauliflower risotto which was riculous. That is how you make risotto people. For the half samich I went with the half turkey. The turkey wasn't just a normal turkey slice from the deli counter this was actually very nicely trimmed meat off of a bird that was prepared in house and it was immediately noticeable. All this for $15 dollars, I'll take it....And I'll do it again many times over again. Come here for lunch sometime and check it for yourself.
Love this place. I've never had anything that wasn't tasty here. They do fish and meat very well. It's not obscure molecular gastronomy style, but dishes we have had here were all well prepared and savory. We have been to several business dinners in their space downstairs, and it really is my favorite place for these - even more than the pricier steakhouses 'dahntahn.'\n\nWait staff were very attentive, and really made our experiences here great. Food was served efficiently for large groups, and arrived at the correct temperature. They have a great wine list, and overall offer a comfortable space with delicious food and drinks. Try the lamb loin, chicken, and cioppino - my three current favorites. Their pork chops are the specialty of the house, I'm told.\n\nWill definitely be back.
A delicious menu with a twist. Unique wine list too!
Visited for brunch again on a rainy winter Sunday.  I reaffirm my previous comments.\n\nGood service.  Generally great food (the breakfast pastries, my breakfast polenta and the wife's scallops were fantastic), however inconsistencies still prevent the 5-star praise.\n\nWhile the coffee is great, the crud in the creamer and a dirty spoon to start the meal off were not.  In addition, I may have had one of the most bi-polar plates of my life...  braised lamb on grilled sourdough.  The lamb itself was kiss-yo-mama good...  seriously, this meat is a fork cutting affair.  However, the bread itself seemed stale and completely took away from the star in the spot light.\n\nAs with Eleven, you can't go wrong with the brunch pre-fix, so be prepared to need a wheel barrel to get yourself out the door!
I am definitely the salt queen.  I literally salt everything from pizza, McDonalds French Fries (even though I know that they already have tons of salt on them).  I also salt ham and processed foods.   I always salt food before even tasting it.  Nothing is off limits when it comes to me and my salt shaker.\n\nWell when my beautiful meal arrived I asked my server for the salt.  None of the tables had salt or pepper shakers on them.  As my server went to get me the salt shaker, I took a bite of my potatoes.  Whoa!!!!!  They were extremely salty!!!!   For the first time in my life,  I didn't add any additional salt to my meal.  For me to say something is \"very\" salty.... It is very salty. \n\nBeing the salt queen,  I stll  was able to enjoy and love my meal.  I am almost guarantee that the average person would not have enjoyed this food..  My friend also tasted my meal and immediately noticed the heavy taste of salt.  However he never salts anything so something with one grain of salt on it, he will be about to tell.  \n\nIt really suprised me that such an upscaled restaurant would have this much salt added to their food.  I am sure that it was an error or something.  I have eaten here in the past and never experience so much salt.\n\nStill my meal \"for me\" was delicious.  For the first time in my life, I am glad that I did not add any salt to my meal.\n\n  I do love Casbah alot.  It is probably my second favorite restaurant in Pittsburgh.
This might be the best food I've had in Pittsburgh.\n\nThe restaurant set up is a little odd in that there is a tented outdoor space that you walk through to get to the hostess stand. The hostess stand is located in the indoor space. We were seated in the outdoor section in a corner which was fairly drafty. This is the only negative point I have about the meal.\n\nWe ordered the cheese  tasting menu, the duck, the scallop pasta, and the lemon sponge cake. Each bite was perfect -- flavorful and expertly cooked. The waiter was friendly and knowledgable. We left feeling full and happy.
Though I didn't get a chance to visit this place when I visited last month, I really do love Quiet Storm and I will be sure I hit it up next time I'm in town visiting my friends there. The decor is adorable. The prices are reasonable. It was an intimate place to see a show and it's too bad they are no longer doing them here. I really feel like this place was one of the first things that made me heart Pittsburgh. It's truly a unique space.
Wondering where the Pittsburgh hipster crowd hangs out? Look no further than the fixie parked outside the Quiet Storm. \n\nAnd then go inside and have some delicious food and drink.
This place is cool!  But it is also 'cool'.  Service is so-so, but the staff doesn't have an attitude, they just aren't into serving.  And I'm not a vegan, but the food is so good that a carnivore like me doesn't even care. The menu is also huge.  \n\nFor those of you looking for an ATM- there's one a half block away if you just exit, go left and cross the street to the corer convenience store.\n\nI could always find a table and spread out with my books. Comfy, young, hip, worth it.  I wish they had alcohol.\n\nTry it!
Solid Milkshakes and Falafel - block from my house
We go here all the time and have ordered almost everything on the menu and never been disappointed. It's veggie diner food at it's best (at least in my opinion). My bf is a meat & potatoes man but he absolutely loves the breakfast  Homefries with tofu instead of eggs. The waitstaff have always been exceptionally nice and very attentive. This establishment is best described as a greasy spoon for vegans and vegetarians so if you go in expecting gourmet, you may find yourself disappointed.\n\nOn cold wintery days try a Mexican Hot Chocolate - it will surely warm your heart!
Aw it's places like this that make me love Pittsburgh. Its hodge podge decor and hipster crowd are what drew me here in the first place, but turns out the food and coffee is pretty decent even delicious. Since it's far from where I live I don't get to come here half as often as I'd like but I'm always pleased when I do. \n\nSuch cute boys.
Quiet storm is a really cool vegetarian restaurant. The time I was there the service was fine and the food was unique. Their menu is a limited on the weekdays, your best bet is one of their many quesadillas.\n\nI'm not as concerned about the preservation of vibe and atmosphere, as long as the food still tastes good. I was in love with the pierogidilla and happy to leave the table feeling full without having any meat.\n\nI wrote a review of Quiet Storm on my web site, Binge! http://eatinginpittsburgh.com/2010/07/07/ive-got-an-itch-for-kitsch-quiet-storm-in-bloomfield/
I didn't realize that Quiet Storm was a completely vegetarian restaurant until I noticed the word \"seitan\" printed after every meat item on the menu. Normally I'd find this annoying, as I'm an unabashed and unapologetic meat eater. That doesn't mean I don't love a good veggie dish, but fake meat masquerading as real meat is one of my pet peeves. If you're going to serve vegetarian food, don't try to pretend it's anything else.\n\nThat grievance having been aired, I ordered the Blackadilla, a quesadilla boasting no false meat items, but stuffed with black beans, basmati rice, sweet potatoes, pineapple and cheddar cheese. It was delicious and filling, and at $8 for the enormous quesadilla and a small house salad, a pretty good deal. \n\nThe menu at Quiet Storm is large, with breakfast and lunch/dinner items as well as an array of cafe drinks and desserts. In spite of the prevalence of seitan and tofu, there are a number of dishes that I look forward to sampling upon return.\n\nAnd I do plan to return. As those of you who have read my other Yelp reviews know, the atmosphere of public places is very important to me, and the atmosphere at Quiet Storm does not disappoint. It's got a retro cool '50s diner vibe and a more modern but equally cool soundtrack that entices customers to stick around. The wait staff encourages this practice, giving diners plenty of space to hang out long after they've finished eating.\n\nThe one downside of Quiet Storm is its location, floating among gas stations and abandoned houses in Garfield, an area sandwiched between the more pedestrian friendly neighborhoods of Bloomfield and East Liberty, but not quickly accessible from either. It has to be a pre-determined destination rather than a drop in for random passersby. But that might just be OK.
Quiet Storm occupies a special place in my heart compartment because, one lazy Sunday in 2004, I discovered Alfred Bester's The Demolished Man. Imagine my joy: a cyberpunk fan, finding a tattered copy of some anonymous-looking book in some proto-hipster cafe (this was back before it was toooo hipster), and discovering the glories of Alfred Bester. (Seriously, The Demolished Man is good.) It also fit in perfectly with the blue collar/gentrified charm of Pittsburgh in general, and the Hill District/Lawrenceville/Bloomfield in particular.\n\nAnyway. I have returned now in 2011 for a veg brunch, and it was a pleasant, if not-so-good-value-for-money experience. I got the True Grits (yeah, Jeff Bridges, yeah), which was a HUGE bowl of grits (some shaved, grocery store-feeling cheddar on top), a pile of delicious, chopped lemony kale, some pretty blah scrambled eggs and a large glass of cranberry juice (very healthy!). Overall, it was fine. I didn't like the $12 price tag so much (seriously, grits is pioneer food and you're charging me $12!), nor did I dig the shades of hipper-than-thou among the clientele, but shrug shrug.
They have these tofu tenders, which are akin to a vegan buffalo wing.  I can't put my finger on it, as there really doesn't appear to be much to them in terms of some sort of secret cooking technique, but holy crap, I can't get enough of them!  I had 3 orders in 2 days, and since it's tofu & not some greasy wings... it's a legitimately healthy meal/snack.\nThe Cheesy Snake -- a vegetarian cheese steak -- can be made with vegan cheese, and it's pretty slammin, too.  \nThe slaw tastes like liking a brick of salt, and the coffee etiquette -- pouring old pots into other, half-full pots -- leaves a bit to be desired, but overall, I know that it's one of a few places in Pittsburgh that serves vegan food that's pretty awesome.
Great cafe for brunch and coffee. Lots of vegetarian options and nice atmosphere. Come check out the place if you're in the area and would like to try some healthy foods. Was here for some brunch with friends and our food did take a while to make it to the table but everyone enjoyed their meal. If you come too late during the evenings for dinner the food options are less then what's on the menu.
Me and my kids got food togo from here, because it came recommended from someone at the local food co-op as a place with good vegan options.\n\nCute and attractive DIY style decor.\nFriendly staff.\n\nI really liked the food quite a lot (i'de give it 4/5 stars).  GOt a tofu banh mi with a side salad.  When I asked what dressing they had, I expected to hear the list of \"usual\" uninspiring dressings that vev/non-veg restaurants often have.  The first one she mentioned was a green chili dressing tasted as fun and yummy as it sounded.\n\nMy kids didn't really love their vegan homefries meal (with scrambled tofu and a weird vegan cheese sauce thang).\n\nAnyhoo.  Really pleasantly surprised with this joint, and the food was pretty reasonably priced.  \n\nAs with any place I review, I am subtracting a star because they aren't all veg.  Anyplace selling eggs dairy and flesh isn't perfect for me.  I'de probably really call this 3.5 stars.
The Quiet Storm was great. I started with the soup of the day which was something along the lines of a carrot pumpkin curry. It had an unexpected texture but I still quite enjoyed it. For my entr\u00e9e I had the Spinach Burger, which was quite filling. It is quite unique and comes with plenty of options for toppings. I couldn't resist putting cheese on the otherwise vegan burger, but still felt very healthy eating such a veggie-filled dinner! Their milkshakes also looked amazing - I would have tried one but I needed something to warm me up instead so I got a latte, which was also very good. One other thing I thought was neat was that the sell mixers and encourage you to bring your own champagne and/or vodka. I haven't seen that before, but it's a great idea!\n\nI was also intrigued by some of the other items on the menu, so I will need to go back to try more.
Sandy had me holed up in Pittsburgh looking for a flight and staying with my wife's aunt. She adventurously agreed to go with me to a veggie place and that's how I ended up here. \n\nNice layout with tables along the windows and more in back. If you're not familiar with this kind of scene it could seem a little rundown, but to my eyes it was fine. Really, it's kind of the proto-typical East Coast college town vegetarian hangout.\n\nThe aunt-in-law is a meateater and in her seventies, but she really enjoyed her tempeh Cubano. And she loved her lavender lemonade. No room for dessert though.\n\nI got the Banh Mi and it was very tasty. 'Nuff said.\n\nThe service was in my mind delightful. The server was engaging and welcoming to my somewhat timorous companion, explaining the dishes to her and making a recommendation that worked out. He was efficient and personable.\n\nToo bad I won't be back in Pittsburgh anytime soon, or I would make a repeat visit for sure.
My friend and I were having a weekend trip to Pittsburgh (first time!) and stopped in for brunch on Sunday before our visit to the nearby Pittsburgh Glass Center. We weren't familiar with the area & this looked like a cute place- ended up definitely enjoying our time here!\n\nWe weren't aware that it was a vegan place; regardless, the drinks menu & and the brunch menu both looked amazing. Friend ordered the Nyam, which she said was very filling (surprisingly). I had the the Country burrito, which definitely surpassed my expectations. Decent, good. \n\nFriend & I both ordered the Don Juan mocktail which was the highlight of the meal- holy crap! AMAZINGLY GOOD- I always think that horchata tastes a little too watery but the coconut juice & caramel helps round out the drink & make my tastebuds sing. I'm only sad that I can't keep visiting and trying more of their drinks. \n\nMight not necessarily go out of my way to come back BUT I would definitely go again if I were in the area. :)
Delicious!! Not a vegetarian, but this place might convince me to switch over. Had a few breakfast options and was blown away by the Greek plate and the QTF. Excellent coffee too.
This place is great! Cute inside, great milkshake and hot and cold coffee drink options. We had the horchata was didn't taste exactly like horchata but was delicious. We ordered the bah mi which came with two types of fake meat on it. It wasn't a traditional tasting bah mi as it didn't have enough jalepanos, cilantro and it was much heavier but the bread was good and all in all it was a delicious sandwich. We also had the flower salad which comes with a heavy dose of kale and smoked tempeh. Really really good with the peanut dressing! Tempeh is soft and very flavorful. Will get again. Found out that they are closing/ moving to an unspecified location next week so we hope that they will be there on our next trip through Pittsburgh!
I love N.Y. style pizza.  Could eat it every day.  On a recent to trip to Pittsburgh I tried alot of pizza and this was good pizza.  \n\nOne thing about Pitt pizza... it is slightly different than true NYC style:  the crust is not as thin and there's a whole lot more cheese.  As a rule Pitt pizza also has a slightly sweeter tomato sauce.  The sum of its parts is still a delicious close cousin to NYC pizza.\n\nThe pizza I tried in Pitt in my order of favorites:\nFiori's\nPizza Sola (Penn Circle Branch)\nPizza Perfectta\nAiello's (Murray Street)\nBeto's\n\nSave for Beto's, I thought they were all delicious.  Wish I had a chance to try Mineo's.  A Pittsburgh native friend of mine calls this his favorite but they were closed July 5th when I went by their place on Murray... I'll try them next time I'm in the 'burgh.\n\nPizza Perfectta has a few stools and a counter but really it is a take-out place.
For $10 you can get an 8 inch sub and a GIANT slice of pizza. Needless to say, this has become my favorite place to order dinner from.
I've really enjoyed their pizza so far. I also ordered a chicken salad and it was tasty for a pizza take out place, nothing too fancy. I have only had the food at this place by delivery and it has always come before and hour has passed. The pizza always comes warm and ready to eat. Nothing to complain about. I did give it only 4 stars because there are a couple of other places that serve homemade ranch on the side which makes the pizza taste even extra delicious.
The food and customer service from this restaurant are really top notch.  I am continually impressed with how fast the delivery is and how likeable the drivers are.\n\nThe pizzas here are excellent as long as you don't get the \"crab meat\" topping (I should have expected gross imitation crab meat since we're so far from the coast).\n\nThe breadsticks, jalapeno poppers, and wings are also delicious.\n\nSome of the best pizza in Pennsylvania.
All around delicious pizza, hoagie, apps place.  Always good. Consistent.  Can vouch for any pizza, Italian hoagie, jalape\u00f1o poppers and fried mushrooms. All good.  Do yourself a favor and order perfecta.
I guess I'm getting burned out on winter.  That's what made me think about this place.  See, as Julina below says, it's close to Frick Park and it's a wonderful place to pick up sandwiches, pop, or picnic supplies before going over there.  It's also a great place to sit outside with a cup of coffee or a cold drink or snack before going over to the Frick Mansion.  So you can stop here with your out-of-town guests while sightseeing.\n\nThis is truly a little out-of-the-way gem, located on a side street.  I haven't been up this way in awhile (I was also nosing around on Google Maps/Street View yesterday, so that's also why I thought of this place) so I hope nothing much has changed here.
I like this place; it single-handedly made me hate Pittsburgh just a little less.  In fact, this would be an easy 5 stars if it wasn't in Pittsburgh and therefore emblazoned with all manner of Steelers propaganda, and as a Browns fan I...I just can't do it.  I'm sorry.  The sandwiches were good and prepared with genuine care and attention to detail, the people were friendly and the prices reasonable.  Get the soft pretzels, toss 'em in the microwave and eat them with mustard.
As a displaced west-coaster, I appreciate a store like this in Pittsburgh. \n\nI like the bulk goods and spices because you can take as much as you need, you get the spices whole and they put them in big jars so you can sniff them if you want before you buy (the downside to that is that every time the jars get opened the spices probably lose some oils), and there's a huge selection. \n\nThis place has my quinoa, pearled barley, spelt flour, and nutritional yeast. \n\nSome of the vegetables pop out at me and I'm tempted to buy a lemon or some really ripe piece of fruit. Usually I don't though. During the summer they were selling fresh herbs in pots. That was really tempting. Once they sold kittens. That was amazing. \n\nIt doesn't hurt that its right by the climbing wall, fencing, gymnastics, and bike shop.
This is a good co-op, with a generous selection for it's smallish size. Prices are better here than in some co-ops I've shopped at. Competitive with the big boxes, as far as I can tell. I have tried some hot-bar/cafe items and quite liked them. The java jolt smoothie is amazing, as is the lemon pepper tofu sandwich!\n\nIf you can judge a town by its co-op, which I am prone to do, Pittsburgh proves to be a decent place to be a conscientious vegetarian shopper.
Kind of small, but I've had excellent luck with produce here: fresh and organic. In-store coffee bar is a nice plus.
This place has steadily improved over the years, and never fails to make me happy.  \n\nIt's stocked with every variety of weird hippie food.  It's also stocked with the best produce anywhere in the city in the winter months when Giant Eagle's selection looks beat up.  The prepared foods case in the back is deliciously weird.  And it's locally owned/operated, so you're not exactly sending your hard earned money to Whole Food's CEO.\n\nThe membership is lifetime, apparently, which the employees always kind of failed to express; I thought you had to pay for it yearly, and the difference is pretty big.   That said, I live far enough away that getting here regularly still doesn't justify the membership.
Lots of great vegan, local, organic, gluten-free, and/or raw food, though some items are quite pricey. Very good rotating-item hot bar for take-out lunch or dinner. Great bulk food selection, including diverse reusable glassware of known tare weight. Fresh fruits and vegetables are right-priced, but processed items like meats, cheeses, and frozen items can be surprisingly expensive. Fairly comprehensive selection, akin to a Whole Foods.
Just moved here from Baltimore and ran across this place.  Love it!  Watch yourself at the hot bar.  There's no scale (should be).  Your mea l(of veggies, tofu and kale) could end up costing $20 easily.  I usually grab a hot meal and play on my computer 1-2 hours.  Love the carrott juice with ginger YUM!  A small is $4.30 ouch!  Just found out they won't charge you for bags if you bring your own....COOL!
I really love this little place. The hot bar is almost always completely wonderful. I especially love the breakfast/brunch on weekends, it's one of my favorite meals. The potatoes and garbanzo bean patties are amazing.\n\nThe prices are pretty much in line with any smaller heath and local food oriented grocer. I can usually count on them to have specific items that Whole Foods is sold out of and sometimes at a better price. Plus, the Co-op hot bar is a million times better than the Whole Foods hot bar - quality over quantity all the way.\n\nShort lines, great staff, good for Pittsburgh.
It's disappointing that you got lukewarm service, Erina.  I've had pretty consistently good vibes (har har--get it?--hippie reference) there from the staff, who've been enthusiastic about helping me find what I need.  Hands down, this place beats Whole Foods for price and general atmosphere, and their salad and hot bar is my go-to when I don't feel like cooking.  Absolutely GREAT bulk section with a wide variety of grains, legumes, and pastas.  Killer cookies and baked goods.  \nOn the other hand--if I lived on my own, I could do all my shopping here.  But, since I don't--I can't.  It's tough to stock a household kitchen solely from the EEFC--I mean, I can't really afford to regularly buy $15 laundry detergent.  \nRealistically, the Co-op can't serve most of us for one-stop shopping.  But it's worth it to put down a few extra pennies for potatoes or juice to support a genuinely community-oriented business.
Pittsburgh doesn't really have its choice of indoor climbing walls, but I was pretty impressed by this location (though note, this review is just for bouldering). The bouldering area is huge, and on a Saturday afternoon surprisingly empty with no need to wait for any route. It's labeled from V0 upwards... although the floor is padded, the walls do go up pretty high (the 10ft estimate from before is accurate), so a fall would be pretty scary... they do give you an option to wear a helmet, but I saw nobody doing so.\n\nThe routes are all clearly marked, and difficulty seemed to correspond with rating - there are also a ton to choose from, so you won't get bored. One staff member in particular was amazing - Allen - who spent the time giving climbing tips and encouragement to whomever needed it. Costs are also reasonable ($12/day, + $3/shoes, $2/chalk), and it's located in a nice strip mall with the East End Co-Op nearby for food. Overall, not a bad place to spend an afternoon!
As a new climber I found the whole process intimidating, but the staff at The Climbing Wall helped me get on the right path. Also, the regulars here seemed very nice and always willing to help out a newbie. It isn't very expensive either, 10 or 12 bucks for a full day of bouldering is a very reasonable deal (I haven't seen many places which were cheaper). \n\nI'm sure a lot of people, including myself, wish this place was a little bigger, but for being in the city it's not a bad size. It's actually surprising how many routes they managed to plan out for the size of the place, there's more than enough to keep the walls feeling fresh even after many climbs. The diversity of the routes is really great too, there's plenty of routes for each skill level and climbing style. \n\nThe overall experience was wonderful: great staff, great people, and a great setup. \n\nTip: If you're a beginner without your own equipment, the shoe rental is worth the extra 3 or 4 bucks.
I like this place but the hours are inconvenient (top roping doesn't open until 5PM during the week!!!!) I wish they would expand their hours. Otherwise, they make a nice effort to change their routes relatively often.
I definitely got the best service of the restaurants on Ellsworth from this restaurant, and they also offer the best food for the price.  \n\nThe menu is creative and dinner (soup, salad and salmon) were delicious, but there is nothing that Portugese about this place (except the decor and a very sweet older lady hostess who may in fact be Portugese).  In fact, I think it would be considered a national security threat in Portugal to have a place that serves dinner NOT serve wine.  The government of this state is partly to blame though.  Since when did PA become goddamn Utah?!  But Rendell's gotta get his cut I guess...\n\nAnyway, the place is small and intimate, one server handles the floor.  Minus points for the lack of alcohol,and frozen butter with the bread, but this restaurant is a neighborhood gem.
The adjectives that come to mind when I think of Cafe Zinho are cute, quaint, cozy and in a random area. I don't think I would have stumbled upon this place just upon chance. I made a reservation for three on a Tuesday night at 7. My two friends were already there and then... there was just me in the restaurant, which scared me a little bit but I have to have faith in my fellow Yelpers. \n\nThe waitress was an adorable woman who was so friendly, helpful and enthusiastic about the dishes in a quiet manner. You just wanted to pinch her cheeks or something. Anyway she gave us some bread which was sweet, unlike many of the other restaurants breads that I have had, which I enjoyed. We ordered the goat cheese for an appetizer which was just so ooey and gooey deliciousness and then for the piece de resistance ordered the sea bass special that night which had capers, a potato, rice and some roasted vegetables. Great light combination and not too heavy. The size of the sea bass was like of the entire whole fish. To top it off we had the rice pudding dessert which was similar to flan but I thought this was so tasty. I kind of want one right now as I am typing this review.\n\n\nI am so glad I went to Cafe Zinho finally and would happily come back here again.
Atmosphere and service was great. Appitizers were good. For dinner We ate the pork tenderloin and a ravioli of some sort.  Both tasted good with the pork tenderlion being the best.
This is a cozy little place. I made last minute reservations for a Saturday evening because the restaurant we were supposed to go to  closed due to an emergency. Major bummer for us, but life goes on and luckily we were able to get a table at this place. At first we were seated by the register area and that was a little awkward because it felt like the hostess and waitresses were right at the table with us. I wasn't in the mood for a large group dinner so we asked to be moved, a request they graciously accomodated. Unfortunately, we were then seated pretty close to the door and it was a cold February evening so that was a little rough. Fortunately, we had a whole bottle of wine to warm us up.\n\nOK, so now let's talk about the wine thing: \nthis is the first BYOB place I've ever eaten at and I loved it! It's pretty great to share a bottle of wine that you can pick out yourself, rather than spend a fortune on some ordinary bottle offered by the restaurant. I didn't know if we had to open the bottle ourselves and brought a cork screw just in case, but turns out they open it for you; I can't remember if there was a corkage fee, but it they do it's a small fee.\n\nNow, for the food: we shared a sardine appetizer and it was quite good. The bread was also really delicious, very fresh and soft. For my entree I ordered the lobster tail and that was very tasty! The veggies served alongside were cooked perfectly and the sauce was light and flavorful. We ended the meal with a chocolate mousse, which my partner didn't love, but I thought it was pretty good, definitely not the best I've had, but good!\n\nTo sum it all up: good food, cozy place, and friendly staff!
The grounds are very nice here, but I have to say the part I loved best was the collection of cars. I've never seen so many antique vehicles in one place. Definitely makes it worth checking out. However. The location is a bit wacky. It's right outside of Wilkinsburg, which isn't a place to visit at all. But still, it is nice enough to check out. Especially if you want to just go have a nice lunch at the cafe.
A delightful (and free?) way to spend the afternoon. The grounds are beautiful, and the architecture is great, and the nearby Frick Park is a wonderful walk. It is quite a gem in the middle of this city. Didn't tour the Clayton (reservation needed), so can't comment on that building.
so...my Maytag Neptune front-load washer...is malfunctioning...again! Evertime I try to wash a load of clothes...some of the water goes into the washer...then the rest of the water which is a lot...floods out of detergent dispenser and all over the exterior washer and onto my basement floor... \n\ntried to fix it my self but unsuccessful...fed up with the constant flooding...I called the Appliance Service Center like I usually do when my washer goes hay-wire... Customer service lady was okay...no awards for customer service excellence though...lol :) the appliance guy gave me a call...staying he will be at my home in 10 minutes which I thought was very considerate... the appliance guy...i call him...Mr. G... shows up and fixes the problem in 5 minutes! (to include the time it takes for introduction, background, and for him to take the lid of the washer off, diagnosis of the problem, and fixing the problem). He was very friendly and personable. \n\nthe cost of the 5 min fix is $92 bucks! and I have been a customer with this company for while... $92 bucks is cheap...in comparison to their other fixes on that washer... \n\nbeing able to wash your clothes at home is a blessing but may break ur bank if you go with this company depending on the malfunction...but everytime they fix it...the problem never re-occurs but something else always manages to break on that washer! I would rather pay the price knowing it gets fixed right the first time than to find another person to fix a mistake and pay more in the long run :)
Best place close to the city for a Dippy cone! I grew up in small town that hosted a Whippy Dip! Every time I see this type of privately run ice cream shop it reminds me of home and lazy summer days with my girlfriends. Riding bikes to the local pool, playing at the beach on lakeside, or causing a ruckus at the Whippy Dip! Oh, sooo serious summer romances... flirting with boys while throwing ice from our slushies was a regular occurrence.\n\nFinally, a warm spring day on the books and the only place I want to go is The Page. The location is so weird! Under this huge bridge away from any greenery or picnic tables next to a low end used car dealer. I suggest grabbing your food and heading elsewhere. There is always some sort of line and it gets worse on the weekend. These guys and gals are pros when it comes to ice cream and will recite all the flavors with speed that you might miss them. It's kind of like the Cheese steak place in Philly. Know your order when you get to the counter, pay, and move OVER!\n\nThey have so many flavors of ice cream! The menu is extensive, you can get anything here, brgrs, fries, hot fudge brownie sundae, or a banana split! I will be back all summer!
This is one of many hidden gems here in the Burgh. Check it out, freaky good ice cream, better blizzards than Dairy Queen, shakes that would have Ronald McDonald spinning in his grave if he were dead. \n\nI love Page's dairy mart, and look forward to opening day every spring, then go at least every week on those warm summer nights and have a cone or my favorite, peanut butter chocolate ice cream with butterfingers and reeses peanut butter cups running through it. Then I go run for two hours to burn it off, but it's worth it.\n\nWhy four stars? Bad intersection (Carson and Beck's Run) and parking can be a motherbucket.\n\nYou're still sitting there reading this? GO TO PAGE'S NOW!
Damn good ice cream.  \n\nI love a great generational dining experience, my grandma took me here when I was a little girl and this past weekend I got to share the experience with my boyfriend his mom and nephews.\n\nI ordered a traditional banana split, but really I wanted to have one of everything on the menu. \n\nThe strawberries are real strawberries!!! That alone sets Page Dairy Mart a part from the rest.
Have driven by this establishment many times when I lived in Pittsburgh and in my visits, but I never pulled over to sample the goods. That is until today and it was really good!\n\nDon't be swayed by the lines. The staff is really efficient and move quickly. Prices are reasonable and portions are huge. \n\nAlthough I was really impressed by the different flavors of soft serve and that they are all homemade, I saw the sign for the apple dumpling sundae so I opted for that instead. My aunt went with a classic chocolate shake. \n\nThe sundae is massive and the ice cream was so good, some of the best vanilla that I've had. Only critique is that the core part of the dessert were canned and were too sweet and sugary(- a star)\n\nEven though I don't opt for anything vanilla in life, I think I might squeeze in one more scoop on this trip!
The best soft serve I have ever had. Some flavors are better than others. Of the mint chocolate chip, toasted coconut, and pistachio that I tried last night (what can I say, I was hungry) the toasted coconut was the best. It has real pieces of toasted coconut.\n\nA very good value for your money.\n\nDon't expect to find any seating here.
Page's is a Pittsburgh icon. The ice cream is good, the selection is vast, and the price is right. They have so many different things to try, it's nearly impossible to choose. I'm a big fan of the cookie sundae, brownie sundae, and cinnamon roll sundae. The options at this place are pretty much endless. But sometimes a regular soft serve sugar cone is the way to go. It's better than Dairy Queen, AND you support a local business by going here. What more could you ask for. \n\nI don't know if I would say that Page's has particularly superior soft serve, but it's the experience and variety that makes this a four star place. I do think the ice cream is better than somewhere like Dairy Queen, but not by much. What makes Page's special is wide variety of options and soft serve flavors. It's also the nostalgia that goes along with it. It's a business that hasn't changed much in it's lifetime, and that's what most people like about it. You can count on Page's to be there every March-October. They're going to offer the same treats you loved as a kid for your whole lifetime.  It represents the change of the seasons and brings back memories for people. It means a lot more to people than just a summertime ice cream stop. \n\nFor those who have never been there, there is no interior so you'll have to eat in your car or standing outside. I prefer to open the back of my SUV, sit there and enjoy the night while I eat my ice cream. The parking lot is hectic and downright scary sometimes. I typically avoid this place on busy nights just for that reason. \n\nBeware, they only accept cash. But there is an ATM on site!
Mmmmm. Their Egg drop soup is sooo good as is the General Tso's, and they deliver FAST!
The food is unforgettable, but unfortunately so is the bill.  Sicilian themed with fresh ingredients in an intimate setting all prepared in an open kitchen.\n\nAsk before you order a special, or you might be stunned when you are handed the check. But if you love food and money is no object, this is your place. A great place for Valentine's day or a special anniversary splurge, with the emphasis on the word 'splurge'.
I stopped by here this past Thursday with my fiance and 4 other dining companions for dinner.  Alla Famiglia has been on my list of places to try for quite a long time and I was eagerly anticipating eating a dinner here.  We arrived shortly before our reservation time of 7:30 at about the same time as another couple from our party. We were almost immediately taken back to our table which was on the first floor in a back room.  I honestly didn't notice too much while we were walking back to our table but thought there was not much decoration in the room we were in.  Yes there was a fireplace but nothing else really sticks out besides the fact that the lights would dim a bit for about 5 seconds before eventually brightening back up every 10 minutes or so.\n\nSince none of our party had ever been to Alla Famiglia before our server took the time to go over the menu with us.  Whenever he got to the veal chop and explained it was their specialty, I immediately knew that was what I wanted.  So I ended up ordering that with the pizzaiolo option while my fiance went with the seafood diavolo.  My veal chop was described as a double cut natural chop braised with hot and sweet peppers, homemade Italian sausage, and plum tomatoes while my fiances seafood diavola had many different types of seafood in it including a lobster tail.  All entrees also come with a first course of salad and a second course of pasta with vodka sauce, both served family style.  While we were waiting for our first course to come out they served us some crusty Italian bread along with a couple of different dipping sauces of which I remember one that had a couple of different imported cheeses, one with goat cheese and then another which was olive oil based and called the holy oil(?) due to a trio of herbs of which one was basil.  That one was my favorite and when combined with some of the Parmesan cheese that they had on the table was awesome.  After a short while our salads came out, 2 family style bowls for the 6 of us along with a dish of Gorgonzola so that we could top our salads with it.  The salad ended up tasting decent, I only wish that I had more of it.  The six of us quickly finished it all and then were in for quite a bit of a wait before our pasta with vodka sauce arrived.  It was long enough for all of us to notice and wonder what was taking so long for pasta.  Whenever it arrived, once again 2 family style bowls for the 6 of us, I thought that it tasted pretty good.  It wasn't the best vodka sauce I have ever tasted but since I was still pretty hungry at this point I really enjoyed it especially after adding some of the chili oil that they brought to the table with it.  The chili oil gave the sauce that perfect bite for me.  Almost immediately after finishing our pasta our dinner entrees arrived.  My veal chop looked impressive and was big enough to make comments about how it could tip the car on the Flintstones.  Most of that was due to the size of the bone although there was a decent amount of meat on it.  The veal itself was cooked perfectly as it was moist and juicy and I  ended up enjoying it. The pizzaiolo sauce was just ok though as some of the sausage that I had seemed to be burnt while others were fine.  Whenever I had the non burnt pieces I liked it but the couple of burnt pieces really made the sauce inconsistent from bite to bite.  I was also lucky enough to try some of my wonderful fiances lobster tail and thought that it was very good.  It was cooked perfectly and was tender and tasty while not being overdone at all.  After all that we had eaten our whole table ended up passing on dessert and I left the restaurant full but not overly so.  I am still wondering about all of these reviews that tell you how much food they received which was also said by the valet on the way in.  It made me wonder do they normally serve a family style portion to two people instead of the three like they did at our table?  Should I feel cheated on this one?  Maybe I will find out on a future visit but then again maybe I will not.\n\nThe bottom line for me is that I might come back here again in the future but I don't think that this would be my first choice.  Don't get me wrong, the food here was pretty good but whenever my food bill after tip is coming out to about $150, they had better either have impeccable service like the Capital Grille or Ruth Chris' or to die for food.  Sadly Alla Famiglia let me down on both accounts here as the food was good and the service average.
Words to the wise:\n1) Don't eat for approximately 3 days before having dinner here.  You'll thank me later.\n2) The bread and fixins (especially the bean and cheese gustoso), while EXTREMELY yummy, pale in comparison to the rest of the meal.  You want to wait for your meal.  Trust me.  YOU want to wait for the homemade pasta.\nThe smaller portions of veal are PLENTY and so unbelievably tender.  Also the preparation is really well balanced.  I had the Escalopes of veal (lots of mushrooms and spinach) and it felt like the veggies were integral to the dish.  Most places would have skimped . . . not Alla Famiglia.\n\nReally good.  So good that I ate till I looked like I had a food baby in my stomach.  Pretty?  No.  Completely worth it?  Yes.
Love it here. The food was great and had anazing service. Will be back again! Everyone was so poliet and greeted us with a smile.
Open 24hrs on Friday and Saturday how can you not love it. Total old school mom and pop diner. Wouldn't recommend anything other than breakfast. On top of everything else it cost nickels and dimes to eat here. After you've blown all your money at a bar in southside you'll still have enough to eat away some of your drunkness on the way home.
I love this place.  They'll all know your name after the second or third visit and people tend to be very welcoming and open without being too \"Cheers-y\"\n\nFood is above average for a bar, especially the Middle Eastern selections.
Went my first time for Thursday karaoke and had a blast!  They serve mediterranean fare; at least half the menu is vegetarian/easily vegan.  There are at least 2 bike racks outside, cars have decent options too.  At 10pm an improv comedy group showed... you can imagine the energy.  Super fun night, met some cool people, ate healthy food.  Oh yes, and it's no smoking!     \n\nDownside?  It's a little pricey, but the quality is there, so... you decide.
This place is like none other! Bar, yes-but so much more! Great food! Great people! It's the Pittsburgh CHEERS with a kick of Healthy! YEP-I said healthy. For example-the menu is limited, but everything is great!! How about trying the Golani Platter-veggie dish with wonderful spices! Hummus, pita, feta and an amazing spinach patty -the likes I've never had before!\n\nLove it there and would encourage those interested in a bar atmospher with a twist to try it. You won't be disappointed.
Real german food (sausage, etc) and decent beer in family friendly atmosphere.\n\nThis is one of the good joints.
I really like this Northside institution.  They serve the beer in jars and I had Spaten German beer- very good.  They put really buttery free popcorn on the table so be careful- the grease sticks to your fingers.  In the bar they have an old fashioned player piano.  I really like the German fare- big portions. The schitzel is good but not great but overall way better than Hofbrauhaus and not Disney- it's the real McCoy.
I've been going to Max's off and on for 31 years (I KNOW!  How could someone as young as I am been going there for THAT long?)    And I am not from nor ever lived in the North Side!\n\nThat said...i have always loved the food and the place.   I was great the first time and was great last night!   Most of the mains can be recommended without reservation....last night I had roasted pork with dressing and gravy.  It was deliscious!    As for sides....I ALWAYS have potato pancakes and sweet and sour cabbage.  (Because of my eastern european background I am partial to both cabbage and potatoes.   Do not be afraid of the cabbage unless you dislike sour! \n\nWe didn't have dessert, but did have beer and drinks.   They have a nice selection.\n\nMy only complaint was that the food was slow to come out.   It was a busy Friday night and I wasn't going anywhere so I had anover beer.   No big problem.\n\nGive Max's a try.....it might make your favorite like it did mine!
been here a number of times and it's my favorite German food in Pgh!
What to eat for dinner? Hmmm, a nearby German restaurant sounds good (and it was). There's nothing extraordinary to get into detail about so:\n\n1 star for free street parking\n1 star for ample seating/tables\n1 star for friendly service\n1 star for a very good meal\n\nSimple, yet effective. Danke.
First I'll start off with the homemade beer.  Nothing spectacular, but it has flavor and is very reasonably priced, as is the menu.  I went with the potato pancake Reuben.  HOLY CRAP.  Probably the most filling meal I've ever ate, but it was worth it.  My boyfriend was pretty happy he got to finish my leftovers.  The German potato salad I had for my side was equally as good.  It had a bit of a bite to it, which I really liked.  I also had to try my boyfriends meal.  He went with one of the wursts, but the exact name is escaping me.  It was made with veal, and was so light and tender - YUM.  That will be my meal when we return.  I can't believe it took me so long to eat here!
I ordered the Roast Pork loin with Apple raisin dressing, sauerkraut, and German potatoes. Oh yeah... Right Choice! Took a little longer than usual as there was a Large Party of 16 that ordered Just prior to us. Happy to say the waitress took Great care of us, plenty of rolls, drink refills, etc. as we waited. Apple Strudel for the Final Act. So Good, I forgot to take a picture. lol
I really like this place. It has a neat atmosphere where the entrance has a nice bar and then there are a few other rooms that have the feeling of a living room or dining room. I really enjoy their brunches, but their pretzels are amazing. The one thing I don't like, which is a bit disappointing, is their potato pancakes. They are a little lumpy and not quite fried enough. With that said, it is definitely worth the visit.
This place is awesome.  Authentic, home-made German food that is extra delicious.  Really neat place too!  Potato Pancakes are delicious.  Can't wait to go back.  I would take out of town people here instead of Church Brew any day.
Our first stop in Pittsburgh, what a great start! Had a couple of yuenglings, a warm, salty yummy soft pretzel and a big ole plate of German goodness in da tummy!\n\nThe Peasant Platter had knock wurst, weisswurst and a pork chop on top of heap of sauerkraut...with potato pancakes, spaetzel and a basket of baked breads!  So.much.food.  And oh soooo good!\n\nThe bar is cool, staff is really nice and I believe they offer their patrons a free ride to and from on game days!
My wife and I stayed at The Priory when we went out to Pittsburgh for Superbowl weekend. \n\nThe hotel is beautiful inside and out. We don't normally stay in nice hotels, so we were surprised by how nice it was, especially the extremely comfortable king-sized bed. It made for the perfect romantic getaway in a hectic weekend filled with bars, parties, and souvenir shopping on The Strip.\n\nThere are some things you should know before you book at The Priory, however. The hotel is right across the street from a housing project. There isn't enough parking, especially if The Grand Hall is hosting a wedding when you arrive. If you get a room that is street-adjacent you may be woken up by sounds like people talking or shoveling the sidewalk. \n\nOverall, none of these things bothered me that much (aside from getting woken up by the snow shoveler, but I suppose that was better than cracking my head on an icy sidewalk later!). However, if you're the type of person who gets easily annoyed at minor inconveniences or gets uncomfortable around lots of african-americans, you may want to stay at the Doubletree or Westin or something. \n\nIf you're looking for a charming boutique hotel and you're not afraid of being on the North Side, you should definitely check out The Priory.
After considerable research for a hotel on the night of a Steelers football game (a Sunday night against the Baltimore Ravens, no less!), The Priory was my top choice in that it was relatively reasonably priced and offered shuttle service free of charge to/from the game.  In spite of the hotel being located in the less-than-revered North Side of the city, the place has charm and character with a friendly, accommodating staff.  At no point did I feel unsafe, although in full disclosure, I did not spend considerable time in the hotel's neighborhood, other than to frequent a nearby watering hole, the James Street Gastropub and Speakeasy.  The hotel has ample complimentary parking nearby (one lot across the street, another around the block), including one lot that is only accessible to hotel guests.  The other lot is posted to only permit hotel guests to park there but there did not appear to be a way to monitor this, although it is possible (likely?) hotel staff does so.  In addition to the friendliness of the staff and shuttle service to the stadium, the continental breakfast that was provided was pleasantly surprising in that in addition to the typical fare (cereal, muffins, danish, hard boiled eggs, coffee, etc.), there was a generous selection of meats, cheeses, and fruits.  I would gladly stay at this clean, comfortable, and charming hotel again!
Breadworks has great bread although I usually only buy it in the summer because I make my own bread. I am rating it 4 stars and not 5 for one thing, the focaccia. They now stick it in pizza box and you can't see what your getting. The last 2 times I got it, the bread was burnt. At the price of this bread it shouldn't be burnt and it never was when you could see it before you got it home. I think I will stick to what I can see.
The boy and I spent most of a day here.  In the morning, we and his sister-in-law and 18-month nephew went through the Natural History museum.  The dinosaur exhibit was, of course, the highlight.  I was also impressed by the bird collection.  We were both a little disappointed at the botany display, which was only one smallish room.  I noticed that in a few of the displays, cards indicated that a certain number of artifacts were supposed to be on display, but some had been removed with no explanation or updating to the information.  Or maybe someone stole them and the museum hasn't noticed yet!!\n\nIn terms of natural history museums, I think we have been spoiled for all others by the Field Museum in Chicago.\n\nWe spent the afternoon on the art side, and only managed to get through a couple of the modern art displays before becoming overwhelmed.  There was one film about migration in the modern art room which we both really enjoyed.  I found the art involving the venetian blinds and various types of light bulbs to be fascinating.  We spent the last hour of our time upstairs in the Ancient Egypt exhibit.  Unfortunately, there seemed to be a corporate event happening that afternoon which involved a scavenger hunt; if you think that children's field trips and scavenger hunts are annoying, imagine a whole herd of businessmen and women on a scavenger hunt, and not using their indoor voices, either.\n\nOther than that, the museums were both quite pleasant and not too crowded.  Well worth the student price of $11.
I'm from Detroit. We have a decent art museum, but nothing this awesome.\n\nThe Carnegie Museum houses two very nice museums. Natural History and Art. The Natural History Museum is very impressive and it's cool knowing that all the specimens belong to the museum and they aren't on loan from some hoity-toity New York museum. It's not huge like the Smithsonian, but it's certainly cool seeing real dinosaur bones. My accompaniment had to stifle all my Jurassic Park \"Mr. DNA\" references.\n\nThe art section is also quite impressive. I personally still prefer my Detroit Institute of Art, but this museum is still nice. I got a little confused about how to walk around. I prefer my museums in chronological order, not cool to less cool, which is what this seems to be. The modern art is very cool, but after being at the Warhol the day before, I had my fill of high-concept stuff. There's quite a bit of Impressionism, which by scientific fact all women love.\n\nThis is great way to spend a long afternoon and there's plenty to do in Oakland afterwards.
The staff were incredible and very helpful.\nDinosaurs!\nGicometti!\nCarnegie International 2013 was trip! And to see CI from previous years...it was like a hot party that all the great ones are invited to!
Legends...interesting name. With a name like Legends, one would assume sports bar, but not so much. And I very much liked it that way! Let's roll into a pro/con list...\n\nPros:\n-Great, friendly service. Morgan was my server and she was super fantastic. Quick, efficient, sweet. She offered up helpful suggestions and even let me try a sample of the soup of the day before I placed my order.\n-Homemade focaccia: Mmmm rosemary! Tasty and free slivers of love to go with your meal. \n-Portions: Mammoth. From the bowls of soup to the pastas to the pies...sharing is caring.\n-Spinach ravioli: My main dish of choice. Flavorful spinach and cheese pillows of pasta cooked al dente and smothered with tomato basil sauce with a touch of cream. Damn good pasta, my friends.\n\nCons:\n-Menu items price out a few dollars higher than similar Italian joints. But, the value is here, though, because of the increased portions. \n-Restaurant set up/ambiance: Is a bit odd. It's kinda like a diner...with bare tables...and carpet...and a few random pictures on the wall. \n-No booze, beer or wine. It is BYO, but I didn't see the corkage fees listed on their menu.\n\nOverall, a solid place for homecooked Italian eats. I would sprint back to Legends just for that ravioli! Mangia!
This restaurant is a gem. Wanted to check out another neighborhood in Pittsburgh. To an ignorant outsider, North Side didn't seem much more sketch than South Side or Oakland. \n\nAfter picking up two bottles of red at Wine and Spirits on Ohio Street, my team and I got a table at the warm, homey Legends of the North Shore, where it's BYOB. For appetizers we ordered the margherita bruschetta (best choice), fried polenta, and greens 'n beans (mainly because we went on a Tuesday when they had a special deal for 99 cents with any entree). The focaccia bread is great with the homemade mixture of olive oil and herbs. \n\nI ordered the mussels bianca over linguine--terrific. Also comes with shrimp. The portions are generous but delicious, in part because it's clear that the tomato sauces are all made fresh and in-house. I tried my coworkers gnocchi--good, but I was quite satisfied with my own dish. My coworker who ordered the eggplant parmigiano really enjoyed her dish as well.
Four stars - not because the facility itself is stellar, it certainly needs updates and could use more space - but the staff was so friendly and helpful! The atmosphere was inviting and communal, really nice to see a Y that is still a full mission where men can stay and get on their feet. And art classes! And dodgeball! And I had a great workout in the gym.
Best place in the city to get a dog
I think the low marks for this place are unwarranted. Quality of food at this location is every bit as good as the other Atria's around town. Pot roast nachos are out of this world!
Good times for kiddies of all ages and grown up too. \n\nI especially love the art studio on the first floor, there is always 2 or 3  different art activities that are happening. \n\nMy niece had her birthday party here, in January, I felt a little rushed, because a few of our guests were late.  The Children's Museum supplied a craft and two party assistants, along with a large space for the guests. \n\nI don't know how much my sister in law paid for the party, but I get the feeling it was expensive. \n\nMy family and I get to enjoy this museum fairly often because it's across the street from my mom's house. It's a treat to have such a fabulous museum near by. \n\nBe sure to visit the water floor on the fourth floor, the kids never want to leave the museum after they've played in the water tables. It stretches from one way to the next. \n\nI have so many happy memories from this place, it totally rocks!
I've enjoyed the pizza, salads, and hoagies we've gotten from Pickles. Delivery time was decent. Fries are really tasty, but need to be blanched, or at least punch holes in styrofoam container.
We love the ribs here.  Watch out, the spicy sauce is really spicy.  The location is nice to grab something for a tailgate party.  Never disappointed, although the place looks like a dive, it's actually really really good.  I wish they still made pulled pork sandwiches, maybe someday...
Not much you say about the Steelers that the sports world doesn't already know. The Steelers are the model for what all Professional Football teams strive to be. From the ownership, the players, stadium, to the fan base we have it all. The ONLY downfall of being a Steeler fan is that trying to get tickets is about as difficult as trying to catch a cheetah in the open prairie. \n\nFor those that want to experience what this is like bad can't land tickets to the game I would recommend going 2-3 hours before the game and join in the tailgating festivities. Once the game starts take your friends over to one of the many northside bars to enjoy the game. McFaddens and Bettis's are tops on that list.
Hats off to the 2011 version of the Pittsburgh Pirates! for the most part, this team showed a lot of heart, they have a talented young group at the core of this team. What a thrilling summer it was with the Buccos near the top of the standings and even being in first place for a few days. Alas a bad losing streak towards the end of the summer brought the team down in the standings, but a lesson learned, at least they know they can win. A tweek or two here and there, maybe a little money spent on a free agent or two, and find that elusive home run hitter might bring us a title next year.\n\nI went to 12 games this year, and this team almost reached 2 million in attendance, I think next year we'll hit 2.2 million and a playoff!
I love the buccos, win or lose.  Going to the games are always a good time, and when they are on TV at the bar, I always find myself happy to enjoy my meal and watch the game.  Gotta love them battling bucs.  Please just let me see one round of Playoffs in Pittsburgh before I die..
I've lived in Pittsburgh for 20 years and JUST discovered St. Anthony's Chapel.   A friend of mine was visiting from NYC and, though not at all religious, he's an antiques and history freak.  He discovered SAC and urged us to take him there.\n\nThis is home to the largest collection of relics open to the public in the world and to a life-sized version of statuary of the Stations of the Cross.  The experience is breathtaking.   The tour guides -- free tours Sat through Thu at 1, 2, and 3pm -- are extremely knowledgeable and open to any and all questions.\n\nWe were just blown away by the rich history and beauty of the place plunked down in the middle of a rather ordinary corner of the North Side.\n\nIf you have guests in town looking for something out of the ordinary or if you've never been, it's well worth the schlep.
Review #200\n\nI got hooked on this bakery while living in Brighton Heights.  Now, when I drive past, I HAVE to stop.  I think this one is so much better than the sister store in West View.  I don't know why; I just like it better.\n\nThe sweetest ladies run this local bakery, and they always serve with a smile.  It's usually pretty fast too!  And they're CHEAP.  Doughnuts and giant muffins for $.65.  Cookies of all shapes and sizes are delicious and cheap as well.  It makes me so happy.  Some favorites:\n\nAll of the doughnuts:  Raised or cake, cream or jelly, chocolate or vanilla, they're ALL SO GOOD.  I wish I could stop and say no.  But I just can't.  The selection here doesn't go too fast.  I can usually still get one around lunch time, but if you want options, go early.\n\nLemon Poppyseed Muffin:  They run out quick, but they're so yummy!  It usually triumphs over the doughnuts.\n\nThumbprint cookies:  Maybe I just love the cookie, but I really like them here too!\n\nIs the cliental a little special sometimes?  You bet.  Are the hours old fashioned early to open and early to close?  Yup.  But I just view it as absence makes the heart grow fonder.... :)
Honestly, it's pretty unassuming from the outside. Inside it's a tiny greek diner, albeit some \"Americanized\" choices on the menu. Hello buffalo chicken gyro!\n\nBut if you are craving for a fixin' of some stuffed cabbage, potato pierogies, or halushki, this is your place. And for dirt cheap too. I think our total bill was like $10. \n\nObviously you'll get the traditional gyro's here as well, with the twist of the buffalo chicken one. Obviously, I'm intrigued. They also sell ice cream, which if I wasn't so full from my meal, I definitely would have indulged in!
The Apple Inn is what it is.\n\nAnd that is a bar in Dormont that you could go to any day of the week and have a good time among friends, ( whether it's a Tuesday or Thursday when they have karaoke.)\n\nThe Apple Inn always has decent drink specials, and the bartenders are always spot on, ready to hook you up with another drink when you're finished with your current one. \n\nI will, for sure, continue to come to the Apple Inn and get my drink on.
I love this store. They have a little bit of everything, and since they moved to a bigger location, they keep getting new stuff in. Check here for incense, jewelery, herbs, tea, books, minerals, crystals, and just about anything else you could want. They also offer tarot readings. Make sure you say hi to the cat (I think his name is Baloo) while your there!
I have to say, as far \"new age bookstores\" go, this one is the most impressive shop I have had the privilege to visit thus far. Moonstones is deceptively small looking from the outside, but on the inside there are as many things to see as there are spiritual paths. \n\nAfter years of searching, I found a pendulum! I was so surprised to find the unassuming tiny metal acorn literally jump at me! I had assumed that what I needed would be an ornate crystal pendulum, but \"great things come in small packages\". After I took it home it took no time to get acquainted with it. \n\nThe store contains many crystals, gems, jewelry, oils, and even jars of dried herbs. There were around 60 different bumper stickers to chooses from. And hard to find matchstick incense. It is exactly what you think, a match you strike that burns as incense. Speaking of which, I was disappointed to not find any \"pick your own\" incense sticks. My supply is quite depleted, and I need more. I did but a very dainty scarf from the selection of hats and clothing on the top most floor of the labyrinth. \n\nI hope to attend one of the interesting classes that I have seen mentioned. It does appear that the list needs to be updated. \n\nI also LOVE how the shopkeepers don't keep a hawk's eyes on you. Instead they allow you to spend your time browsing the merchandise alone. After all, it is difficult to hear a small voice when an item is calling out to you if you are anxious from unwelcome stares.
Thank God for Kuhn's. Seriously, after having to survive on Foodland, the only \"neighborhood\" grocery store in Mt. Washington, this is a welcome change. I actually was excited to move to Dormont knowing we'd potentially have a better place to grocery shop locally.\n\nKuhn's has absolutely surpassed Foodland. It's clean, has most everything I need and it's at the right price. I'm actually surprised how much variety they offer in such a \"small\" space. Small being the operative word, considering most Giant Eagle's are ginormous. \n\nI've even discovered new products here, like my delicious Lara Fiber Bars. I'm surprised at the nice gourmet cheese selection, the big deli area and even a counter for fresh seafood. So now I can just run down the block if I need to pick up something quick or do my whole week's shopping here. It's glorious! \n\nThe only thing I wish for is a better parking lot. Since I'm coming off Dwight Ave it's nice to sneak right in. But coming out is another issue. There's only one way traffic around the parking lot. So you're usually stuck waiting behind cars trying to park and pull out. This is very minor though... just an impatient person talking here.\n\nThe main point.. it's WAY cheaper than Giant Eagle! Neighbors rejoice!
So I have to ask myself, why don't I shop here more often? My family and I tend to shop at Giant Eagle, partly because of the large size of their stores and partly because of their GetGo rewards. Kuhn's has somehow become the place we stop when we don't have time to drive to Giant Eagle. \n\nWhich is totally a shame, because whenever I DO stop in here I'm reminded about how nice the place actually is. Today a simple trip for milk turned into a fall-themed decoration shopping spree that went really well (yay super cute owl pillows!) and I ended up picking some breakfast and lunch items as well just because of how cheap they were. I know from past experience that the produce is fresh, and between the wonderful aroma and colorful display the bakery here is absolutely torturous to pass. There's also a ready-made dinner/lunch shelf with sandwiches, chicken wings, pizzas and a few dessert items if you want to grab those on your way out; I've actually gotten dinner here a few times on my way home from the city when I was too tired to cook. What's not to like about affordable and delicious food, right?\n\nHowever, there is at least one thing that does keep me from wanting to be a regular here and giving Kuhn's a 5 star review: the blasted parking lot you have to deal with to go here, which I've cursed in other reviews. This lot is the one that fills up super quickly, creates miniature traffic jams like no one's business, and is a time-stealing trap. Sigh. Suddenly I think I understand why my family always goes to Giant Eagle.\n\nSorry, Kuhn's. Your prices are wonderful, your set-up fantastic, and your options well varied and impressive. But can you blame a girl for hating a poorly constructed parking lot? (Don't worry. You're still great. I'm sure I'll see you again!)
I haven't been to Kuhn's in months and forgot how much I prefer it over the other grocery stores in the area.  Once you get past the craziness in the parking lot it's not so bad.  It's smaller than the other grocery stores around but still have ample choices of all your produce/meat/dairy/deli needs fo sho.  Their prices are less expensive than GE too!  If only they had fuel perks...  The service is always fast and friendly.  I'll be doing the rest of my thanksgiving shopping there.  They have some good deals going on right now.  .99lb Honeysuckle turkeys no min purchase!
Good coffee, nice walking street, good selection of teas and little gifty things, good pastries, *excellent* scones, and it's not that other green-logo'd coffee place.
First,  I love CTR's coffee.\nSecond,  this location has great batistas and it's less congested than other CTR'S I've been to. \n\nThat about covers it
Good food. Reasonable pricing. Wings and rings were my fair my most recent stop here\nMy friend had a steak which looked and smelled delicious. She confirmed that it was.
I just got lunch from here today.  For $9.63, I got soup, salad, vegetables tempura, 6 avocado rolls, steamed rice, and pickles.  It was a ton of food and more than filling enough - I didn't even eat the salad and I was stuffed.  I will agree that the wasabi was pretty weak - I added tons of it and it added almost no spice or flavor.  Even though it was a bit pricier than I was expecting (my menu was outdated and said the lunch would be $6.95.  Oops.), it was also very filling and worth it for a once-in-a-while treat.
Just moved to the area, so I was looking for a good sushi place. This is a nice little joint.  It's very intimate, but they would have no problem seating a large party.  When my BF and i arrived we were the only ppl there (it was memorial day, so sushi isn't too high up ppls lists for dinner)  \nWe ordered the spicy Edamame and 4 rolls.  Everything was reasonably priced, and very good.  \nStaff was friendly!\n\nWill definitely be back!
The service here was outstanding with a very friendly staff. I could not believe the amount of food we got for $7 per plate. Great food. Great prices. A new Pittsburgh favorite of mine.
I can't comment on how it is for actual meals, but If you want food in the middle of the night, you can't really be picky and they get the job done.  At first I thought the price on the strawberry pancake breakfast meal was high (around $9), but it comes with lots of food (3 big pancakes plus sausage & potatoes).  Nothing special compared to other pancake places, but any stack of warm pancakes late at night is delicious to me.  The waitresses seemed nice and friendly, especially considering it was past 2 AM and they have to deal with all the drunk people coming in.  Overall, I liked it.
Open 24 hours is the key. Good food at any time. Gyros are their specialty and are very good. Remember it is a diner.  The decor is out dated.
Any place where I can crack up, cut up, let my hair down and be loose is a place I love to be. It's a diner , kinda of self explanatory seeing as to how that's part of the name.  So they have your typical dinner fare, breakfast items, sandwichs CHICKEN TENDERS.  You get it, I don't need to explain a diner to you. \n\n\n Don't judge me I'm usually wasted upon arrival to Tom's Diner it's not a place where I plan on ending up just a place that I manage to get lol.\n\nAnyhow the pancakes are good and the wait staff is down to earth and very tolerant. \nIn my opinion it's not worth a trip across town, but with friends in Dormont it's a sure stop if I'm visiting over that way. \n\nEnjoy!
Beto's is one of the childhood memories I'm most fondest of. I remember dear old dad and me getting in the car, driving to Banksville road and getting a few slices. I remember that crusty bottom crust, the simple sauce of just tomatoes, the cool cheese on the top, and gooey cheese closer to the hot crust. This is a unique pizza. You get crunchy, chewy, warm, and cool in each bite. Now if you take it home the cheese will melt,(by the way this is the best cold breakfast pizza you'll ever have!) but if you do like locals do, you'll eat it there and enjoy it the way it's supposed to be eaten. The bread fresh from the oven, cold, full fat mozzarella spread on top. Then when you order a slice or two, some very nice Beto pizza chef with a heavy hand will put at least a quarter pound of cheese on each slice. I must get to Beto's soon and have a slice or two and think back to childhood memories and dad.
This is my Man's favorite pizza place.  When he has visited Pittsburgh in the past without me, he sends me picture messages of his slices.  On the plane ride coming into Pittsburgh last week, all he could talk about was Beto's.  So, when we landed we of course drove right over (after being awake all night on a red eye flight) so that I could taste all that is awesome in Beto's pizza slices.  It was very good.  We ordered the simple extra cheese pizza.  For those of you who are like me (from Oregon where I guess NO pizza is good), this pizza was hot crust, sauce, and minimal melted cheese, with fresh cold mozzarella piled HIGH on top.  I have never had a slice of pizza put in front of me with so much cold cheese piled on it before.  I wasn't exactly sure how to eat it, but figured it out, and it was very good, different but good.  I would take Beto's pizza over Oregon pizza any day.
The thing about Beto's is you either love it or you hate. I personally love it. The uniqueness of the cold toppings on the hot pizza is something that Beto's does perfectly. I've been a loyal customer for 10+ years and have continued to order 3 cuts with extra cheese every time. One of the biggest perks to Beto's is that it's family owned by a great group of people. This place is sure to not disappoint.
Exactly what you'd imagine from an adorable neighborhood ice cream shop. When it's time to grab a cone, this is where my kid wants to go! Good s'cream too!
Sweet little shop - great place to take the kiddos, and nice to see a huge selection of hand dipped cones and it's a nice departure from the yogurt bars.
High production values, great plays, wonderful acting, PICT offers a lot to theater fans in Pittsburgh.  They perform at the Stephen Foster Memorial Theater on the campus of the University of Pittsburgh.  The season series is a good value.
Almost but not quite perfect. Cain's is a well-priced smoke free 1/2 bar 1/2 sports restaurant hybrid. The front has tall tables and chairs (like bar stool height) and the back has booths and 6 flatscreen TV's. The whole place was redone in 2009 when a new owner bought it, who bought Redbeards in Mt. Washington and totally redid it. The chef is from Grand View, a fantastic actual restaurant, not bar restaurant. So you're basically getting, at normal bar food prices, truly excellent bar food. Seems like the truly scuzzy clientele that someone 3 years ago mentioned have been evaporated to cheaper Dormont bars. The patrons here are more of the youngish (under 40) Mt. Lebanon variety.\n\nThe vegetable wrap is phenomenal, the burgers are great, and the \"Codfather\" gigantic fish sandwich is simply amazing, the best outside of Wholey's. The \"Codfather\" is prepared 3 ways - \"Part 1\" is tartar, lettuce tomato, \"Part 2\" is coleslaw, fries and hot sauce and I forget what \"Part 3\" is. The onion rings are beer battered (not breaded) and fried to perfection. They taste moderately of beer, the true hallmark of excellent rings. The food you're getting here isn't pushing any envelopes but it absolutely is the best bar food in Pittsburgh. Apparently they have a $5 \"express lunch\" that includes a 1/2 sandwich and soup or salad. Never had it but that's extremely cheap.\n\nBeer is fairly priced; Sam Adams and Blue Moon are $3.50 while Yuengling, Coors & Miller are about $2.50, $2 on special. Everything else is under $5.50.\n\nWing night Wednesdays the good: 25 cent wing night. Best wings I've had in the 'burgh. Wing night the bad: they charge 50 cents per ranch or blue cheese dressing, effectively making 10 wings (the minimum order, which they DON'T disclose) $3 rather than $2.50 which makes it more like 30 cent wing night. Nor do they include celery/carrots, as they do on the menu for regular wing orders. This is the first Wednesday (wing night) they've done this upcharge. I don't mind 30 cent wings, I just like honesty up front. They also don't let you take the wings home that you don't finish. Sorry, but I want two flavors and don't want to weigh 300 pounds so I'm only gonna eat 12-14 wings. We threw away at least a dozen between the 2 of us. People go hungry in this city every night and that's a crime.\n\nThe mild buffalo wings are more like medium buffalo wings and are excellent, as are the orange ginger wings. The bbq and honey bbq are what you'd expect. The jalapeno cheddar is fake nacho cheese and pickled jalapenos on top - NOT what we expected and not what we'd get again but still very good.\n\nService is good 4/5 times. It's slower with wing night; only 2 servers for the whole place.\n\nDefinitely go here for the Codfather and the veggie wrap. Get onion rings as your side. Oh! And get a salad too; they use spring mix and baby spinach and make almost all of their dressings.
Yum. \n\nI love when places surprise you! Brunch is my passion so I am always on the hunt for new spots. I love the Pamela's scene but sometimes you need that bloody mary to hold you off until you can dig into your home fries. \n\nBLOODY MARY BAR, O HEY! \n\nPros: breakfast and booze, huge portions ( I got a side of oatmeal and it was double a meal portion), CHEAP!!!!, Early hours \n\nCons: Parking is a bitch, slower (a huge party sat before us though) \n\nDef will be back for some day drinking
Cains had great wings and good service. The Jamaican jerk wings were very crispy as I did request them to be extra well done. The jalepeno cheddar could have been a little more crispy. The sweet potato fries were delicious, but they could have been warmer. Service was great, overall a great atmosphere and experience and would go back again!
Good, All-American bar food.  This is J and my go-to spot when we are in the mood for something good, reasonably priced and close to home.  We have been many times, but the last time was especially awesome. \n\nJ ordered the full slab of ribs which came with fresh-cut fries and cole slaw.  While there was a bit too much BBQ sauce on the ribs, they were cooked perfectly, fall off the bone good.  \n\nI was in the mood for a good beer of which they have plenty.  While I normally would order an Abita Purple Haze, I was talked into some shandy that was on special.  Thursday specials are micro-brews - which means that we should really go every Thursday.  But I am getting off track.  When the waitress told me that there were two shandies on tap, she offered to give me a taste of the one in which I wasn't familiar.  The beer that came out was big enough that I didn't really need to order a full glass, but it was good enough that I wanted several. \n\nWe decided to split an order of the pepper jack cheese bites which were served with unnecessary ranch dressing.  The bites were awesome - cheesy, not greasy and excellent breading.  I ordered the California Turkey Hoagie with a side spinach salad.  The spinach salad has feta cheese, walnuts, dried cranberries and warm bacon dressing - all in all, a delicious spinach salad with fresh, crunchy spinach.  The hoagie has fresh turkey - that is featured in several sandwiches and meals and always delicious - avocado, pico de gallo, swiss cheese and lettuce.  I would probably trade out the swiss for maybe pepper jack, but other than that - the sandwich is perfect.  \n\nI know that this place is not everyone's cup of tea, but for my husband and I, it's good food, good beer and decent service. \n\nThe one thing that for me stopped me from giving it 5 stars is that it is so freaking loud in there.  Apparently, this is the hangout for people that want to get really drunk and be really loud - even if there is no need for it.  You generally have to kind of yell over to be heard, but if you can get past it, the food is worth it.
Great food and very reasonable prices.   Really enjoy the sandwich and big orders of tasty fries.
I assume lots of folks have seen this place featured on Food Network's Diners, Drive-ins, Dives. This place is exactly as it is on the show, really tasty breakfast foods all made from scratch. Great family atmosphere with friendly staff.\n\nI had the apple cinnamon hotcakes and the cheese steak hoagie sandwich. \n\nThe hotcakes were just awesome. They came as a stack of three hotcakes with a lump of butter and a squeeze bottle of syrup.\n\nThe hoagie was just average, kind of small with lettuce tomato, green pepper seasoned with salad dressing and mayo. Kind of weird.\n\nCoffee wasn't very tasty either, or rather seemed to be on the mild side.\n\nNote their hours are 6a - 3p. Metered street parking and a metered public lot down the block.
This is what a diner should be.  Yummy, fresh(ish) food with staple american bites like burgers and meatloaf sandwiches.  Cramped, with experienced servers that leave the check on the table with the food.\n\nMy soup was the meal's highlight- obviously made from scratch in the kitchen.  Reuben burger- pretty good.  Side of fries- okay.  came from the freezer, but were served hot.\n\nI would dine again.  if i am ever awake during their hours of operation.
Oh man, this place is awesome! You get to choose what type of pancakes you want, so I chose banana chocolate chip and they were delicious and huge. You get three pancakes and I had to take two home to finish later. My friend got the stuffed French toast with bacon and again, delicious.\n\nThe food came fast but the waitress wasn't all that attentive. She was pleasant enough but we received no coffee or water refills. That's pretty much the only complaint. If you're in the area, definitely stop and check this out.
This is the second review of The Dor- Stop, I gave it another star this time.\n\nCanadian Friend of Joe (CFoJ) was getting ready to catch the 4:45 flight to Philly, and wanted to share one more meal before leaving the Burgh. He was hungry for breakfast, after all it was only noon and he was still in bed. So he calls me and says meet in Dormont for some serious diner food.\n\nHe's already at a table when I walk in, sitting there eating a huge cinnamon roll, split in half, grilled and looking soooo delicious. So he points to the wall and says \"Guy from Diners, Drive-ins, and Dives was here\". Spitting pieces of Cinnamon roll at me in his excitement, who knew Canada got the food network?\n\nI ordered the oatmeal pancakes, knowing full well there are eggs in the batter (somethings are just worth having as a vegan) but at least I was smart enough to have the butter on the side so I could discard it later.\n\nHe ordered the raspberry french toast, over hard eggs (Canadian for broken yokes) and bacon, a large OJ, coffee, and the cinnamon bun he was noshing when i entered. The man can eat, and he's so thin, I really hate him and his metabolism.\n\nMy oatmeal cakes were HUGE, and three to an order, I got the first one down without any problem, they were moist, chewy, flavorful with real oatmeal and cinnamon, and the syrup was almost not needed as they have a natural sweetness to them.\n\nHe devoured his french toast, eggs, bacon, saying it was one of the best breakfasts places he's ever been to.\n\nIt's a shame we take restaurants for granted, here's a guy from Vancouver, over 3000 miles away wishing the Dor-Stop was in his home town.
Ahhh Dor-Stop. A nice little brunch spot. I ordered the egg combo this time around. The eggs were average, and the bacon was pretty skimpy, but the pancakes. Ohhhhhhh the pancakes! If it wasn't for these scrumptious staples of breakfast I would never know why it was worth waiting 30 minutes for a table. I ordered the pumpkin pancakes. These this are filling! I could only eat 1 1/2 before being stuffed like the Thanksgiving turkey. Mmmm stuff a turkey with pumpkin pancake .............. anyway. I usually need syrup to add flavor to this sweet treat, but I didn't need any here! I also tried Darren's chocolate chip pancakes. The had so many semisweet chips in them I thought they were stuffed pancakes at first! Soooooo good but even one round cake would make me feel a bit sick from sugar overload. The staff seems able to keep up with the tidal wave of a crowd and get everyone in and out rather quickly. I like that! If you're looking for a place to relax and take your time, this ain't it. if you want some quality pancakes or French toast (poor man's egg sandwich as the Britts call it) and a show watching the cooks do their thang, come here and and be amazed!
Another DDD spot to cross off my list. First one in the East Coast!\n\nI was intrigued with their pumpkin pancakes and raspberry stuffed french toast when I watched the segment on DDD. Finally had the opportunity when I visited by brother for his graduation at Carnegie Mellon. The wait time is killer, so be sure to bring something to entertain yourself for the time being. I think we waited for half an hour, but we weren't terribly hungry, so it was fine. Finally sat down and looked at the menu deciding what to order. Both the pumpkin pancakes and raspberry french toast looked so good, but I didn't want to be a pig and eat both of them (well, I could if I wanted to). My mother suggested that we can order both items and split it from there. Brilliant! Get to taste the both worlds. :)\n\nPumpkin pancakes were delish! A bit on the dense side, yet still fluffy. Spices were so fragrant, like it was Thanksgiving! Not terribly sweet, but at the perfect amount where you don't need the syrup. Huge servings; your serotonin levels will rise. :) The raspberry stuffed french toast would probably have to be my favorite. The crusty/crunchy exterior of the french toast slices stole the stage. The whole dish was sweet enough that syrup was also not necessary.\n\nTheir peach cobbler french toast special looked tempting, but sadly they ran out right when we were seated. Sad. :(
My dad and I do a yearly trip to a different city to see the NY Mets play.  Yeah I'm a Mets fan and live in California.  Anyway back in May of 2012, we made the trip to Pittsburgh.  \n\nBased on Yelp and local recommendations, we drove out to the Dor-Stop.  In the four days we were in Pittsburgh we ended up going two times for breakfast.  \n\nJust awesome pancakes.   First time, I got the banana pancakes and my dad got the oatmeal raisin.  I love banana pancakes and these were pretty good.  But the oatmeal raisin were fantastic.  Next time both of us got oatmeal pancakes.  I opted for no raisins.  \n\nOn a side note, we frequently hit restaurants covered on DDD but I no longer trust that show based on some of my experiences and the Yelp reviews I've read.   I now will look up the Yelp review and ask locals if the restaurant is featured on DDD before going.
great breakfast place...period. worth the wait. had the stuffed french toast, and the bob's special. french toast was crisp and cooked perfectly, although not really stuffed, just an extra slather of raspberry jam. Bob's special was very tasty, German potato pancakes were a little under cooked but great tasting.  Service was quick and brisk, waited about 25 minutes on a Sunday morning, which was not bad but it was raining this day.
Shortly after moving to Dormont, while browsing the shops on Potomac, I came across the this gem of a diner. It was a Sunday after church and the line was wrapped around the block; as a diner enthusiast this was a fantastic sign. \n\nA few days later I brought a friend there for lunch the feta burger I had was amazing. The next time I went ,with my sister and nephew,  I got the burger again and an order of their famous pancakes. The flavor options were long, but I choose banana walnut. These where hands down the best pancakes I have ever consumed. \n\nThe atmosphere is wholesome. The waitstaff is not friendly but accommodating. Honestly they don't have time to be overly friendly they are too busy. However they do a fine job serving you. \n\nAll in all this place is an A-. The only downside for me was not having The cast from cheers welcome me by name. But the food is remarkable.
Great pie...I could eat a whole large though...if you like a thin crust, you will love this
Consistent and quality.  Although it might be a love it or hate it thing.  I love it, so there ya go.
I really liked this food. I'm not Indian, but my boyfriend is. He liked it too! \n\nWe stopped in on a Saturday afternoon. We ordered from the menu instead of the buffet. We ordered the chili chicken, chicken 65, lamb biryani, Lamb vindaloo, and tadka dal. It was delicious. The chicken 65 wasn't spicy or flavorful enough, but everything else was incredible. We spiced everything at. 7/10. It had a bite, but wasn't too hot. \n\nErythema was freshly made. There were only two other families in the restaurant when we were there, both Indian/Pakistani? \n\nService was slow and grumpy. But it was totally worth it. It's hard to find good Indian food in Pittsburgh. Udipi is ok for pure veg... Corriander is greasy... India gardens dishes all taste the same... \n\nI would return. \n\nPortions were small, but I like that because then you can order more things to taste! Although, prices were relatively high. Every entree was about $12 and were ordered 4. It was worth it regardless.
Just to let everyone know, Namaste Indian Restaurant has moved (January 2013) from it's old location in the Banksville Plaza to 1150 Banksville Rd, adjacent to The Days Inn. I've notified Yelp.
I have been a patron of Bado's several times now, and this is a great spot to have few beers, watch a game, and meet up with friends.  Their beer selection is commendable and is frequently updated.  I have sat a the bar and had a table.  I've never had a problem with service.  Staff is knowledgeable and makes great suggestions.  \nNow for the food...their pizza is so yummy!  I love everything about it. The cheese, sauce, toppings...all great.  Their wings are also good.  \nIt can get quite packed during a game or on a weekend evening, so there can be a wait.  Grab a beer and wait b/c it's worth it.
If I lived in the South Hills I would come here all the time. I am not even sure how the pizza place across the street stays in business. I suspect that after the locals are done getting hammered off of Bado's awesome beer selection they need to order some crap when homebase has closed. Or it is a front for the mob.
best pizza on beverly rd
I had a positive experience with this shop. I needed something framed at the last minute, and within extremely precise parameters (that weren't easy to abide by), and they not only got the work done correctly and on time, but at a reasonable price. \n\nThe staff is a little gruff, but not at all unfriendly, and I am happy to have found a local shop that I will return to.
Come here instead of D's if you need to buy cases of beer. They're cheaper than D's and everything is easy to find. Thanks to the peeps at D's for the referral.
This place was great! I was a little bit let down by the Chicago hot dog as it had too much mustard. That said, however, I was really excited by the beer selection and the neon green relish. If you're looking for a chill meal, this is a great place to check out!
This place is no longer the cool hole-in-the-wall place to get a hot dog and beer (from a good selection).  They've expanded and that is both good and bad in my mind.  I liked the small, personal feel to the old place, but it definitely limited how many people who could be in the shop at a time.  So, now they have a much more extended seating area with a bar area and a back room devoted to brews.  I brought my friends here who like beer, and they were ecstatic to find a fave beer that they haven't been able to find anywhere in the DC area.  (Go Pittsburgh!).  The selection is nice and its good to see that I can find those out of the way beers so that I don't have to get just the norm from a beer distributor.  \n\nThe hot dogs?  None of us were gushing about them afterward.  But they're ok.  4 stars for the beer selection.
good beer selection- both on tap and in the beer cave. located in a nice neighborhood.  the chili cheese dog is fantastic and so are the fries!!
Their chicken BBQ pizza is among the greaseiest I've ever consumed, but their beer selection is good, atmosphere is pleasant, and service is friendly.
The name itself is pretty self explanatory.  You can pretty much get a hot dawg any way you like it.  Although I've never tried a Chicago Dog in Chicago, D's Chicago Dogs are one of my faves on their menu.  D's also makes a mean chili which is good on your dawgs or pomme frites.  Not to mention the plethora of beer!! They have almost every beer imaginable (unfortunately not on tap). D's is a local favourite and is definitely worth a try when visiting Pittsburgh.
I come here for the veggies dogs. My husband comes here for the beer cave. The beer is a bit expensive (compared to buying it in stores in NY). But if you're craving your favorite difficult to find because of the crazy PA licquor laws, this is your place. \n\nThis place is family and group friendly, so sometimes you might have a wait.
What a cool place.  The beercave was very unique.  If I hadn't just had my wisdom teeth out, I would have totally sampled some of the fine brews they had stocked away.  What I did enjoy was the friend zucchini.  It was hot from the fryer when it got to our table, and it absolutely hit the spot.  I'd never had it before, and zucchini is one of my favorite vegetables.  My friend said that the service can be slow, but we didn't have any problems.
In my final meal in Pittsburgh, I finally had the closest thing to a Pittsburgh sandwich and that was the Big Ben Hot Dog with cole slaw, fries, and a cheese sauce. It oddly worked and I enjoyed the meal before I had to hit the road. The fries our table shared was also a winner as they were crispy and uniformly cut and fluffy potato goodness in the middle. Definitely a great cheap eats spot.
This place is one of the reasons we decided to move to Regent Square. I am not really a huge hot dog fan, but the BEER CAVE and FRIES keep me coming back (not to mention that it is walking distance from our house). We lived in San Francisco for several years, and this place also reminds us a bit of some of our old haunts in the Mission. :)\n\nIn the summer, they open up the garage style windows, so this is a perfect spot to sit, sip beer (skip the wine though-- its not great) and work on your laptop or newspaper. If you are not into sports and just wanna chill, D's has two sides, so you don't have to feel outnumbered by screaming Steelers fans.  D's always has a nice mix of people as well- from young couples with kids, students, hipsters, to elderly folks. The staff is really nice and friendly and the large mural of local Pittsburgh celebs is pretty neat as well!\n\nYeah, this place is one of the best, laid back spots here.  I am in love with the FRIES! I know I said this once, but they seriously do something very special to them that I cannot figure out.
This place is pretty good! they serve a selection of creatively topped dogs and some of the best greasy fries I have had in awhile. enough said!  Time to go drink some beer and devour this dog!
D's has so many great things about it, it's hard to pick which one's the best. The whole atmosphere of the place is great, very laid back and everyone there is always enjoying themselves.\n\nObviously, the beer selection is great. I don't know how many different brews they typically have on hand, but it's a lot.  And you're encouraged to go pick out your own beer from the walk-in cooler, even if you're sitting at the bar.  The staff there is always friendly and you can sample some of the beers on tap if you're unsure of what you want.\n\nThe food is pretty good too.  The dogs can be simple or loaded with all kinds of toppings, and are a staple of D's.  They also have a good selection on the rest of their menu too.  Chili cheese fries - great.\n\nIf you haven't been there yet, stop by in the afternoon on a Saturday or Sunday for a great local vibe.
I go here a lot.  I think most folks who live in Regent Square/Swissvale/Edgewood area do too.  And it's probably not because the food is so utterly delicious.  It's because it's a groovy little place with young hipster (and some not so hipster) bartenders and waitresses that serves up an endless array of beers in a funky loud space.  I love Regent Square and always saw the potential for the grand old days of Hippy Free Love lying dormant in her quaint shops and family eateries ... until D's sprang to life in a former dry cleaner/gun shop space.  Oh yes, how the times have changed and we are all so thankful for it.  Big KUDOS to the D's Empire in Regent Square -- the Beer Distributor, D's Six Packs and Dogs, and the newest entrant Cibo!  Well done!  Stop on in for a nice hot pizza (I loved the Frickin Parker with meat balls and hot peppers but alas, it has been banished to the basement beer dungeon for-evah!) or a mediocre hotdog and languish in the beer heaven known simply as D's. They also have a smoky dark strange but intriguing (if you've had enough beer downstairs) bar upstairs now that serves alcohol.
D's quite possibly has the best beer selection in Pittsburgh. There are always 20 micro brews on tap and they rotate seasonally. Last time I went they had a variety of pumpkin beers and I pretty much tried them all to figure out which I liked best. If you aren't feeling any of the beers on tap then take a stroll to the walk in cooler in the back and take your pick of hundreds of bottles. Bring the one you like back to the bar and the bartender will open it for you and bring you a glass. \n\nThe bartenders are really chill, and though the service isn't overly attentive, it is perfect for the vibe of D's. And speaking of the vibe, D's has this old pub style feel with the walls meeting at strange angles making cool little nooks and crannies where you can sit and sip your beer with friends or maybe just read a book.\n\nD's is also known for their hot dogs, and while good and inventive, in my opinion are a little overpriced. For some reason I have trouble spending $5 for a hot dog. I've tried their wings and fries too, both good standard bar food, but again a tad overpriced. My friend and I drank beers (a good amount) and ordered food and our tab was $100.\n\nD's still remains the gem of Regent Square and is worth the pilgrimage to Beer Mecca if you have never been.
Sometimes the service here is hit or miss...they can get pretty busy. It can also get pretty crowded. But the food is good and the atmosphere is fun and laid back. And can you beat a room filled with beer? Can you beat mix and match six packs? Nope. 35 cent wing night, yum. Crazy deep fried, bacon covered hot dogs, yum.\n\nI will say though that I could not go here while I was pregnant...you can smell the delicious beer in the air and the Beer Cave taunted me mercilessly with that which I could not indulge...sigh. That was a tough nine months.\n\nThings I don't like so much...tables too close together and too small. The macaroni and cheese is bland, although you can't ask much for two bucks. There is nothing on their website right now other than the menu. Servers can be a bit brusque or forgetful and not refill your drinks without asking, but it kind of goes with the atmosphere I suppose.\n\nAll in all as a Regent Square resident this is our go-to place to hang out and bring friends and visitors.
I am not huge on hot dogs or beer. However, I am huge on add-ons. This is where D's comes in. I totally recommend the chihuahua hot dog. It has avocado!!! The wings are delish too. This place is a must go for beer lovers. I am still the light and sweet kinda beer person, so I tried something with raspberry notes in it, and LOVED it! Oh and the fries are awe-frickin-some!! My second fave in the city after Point Brugge.
I have been to Pittsburgh several times in the last year and this place is one of my favorites.  Not just because the hot dogs are good and variety or them is pretty good too.  I come just for the beer cave!  Plenty of choice in there and the ability to pick your own is awesome!  It gets pretty packed in there on weekends.  Service is no nonsense.  Best is the beer selection in the cave.  This is the reason for the 4stars.
Something different here.\n\nFood, schmood, go there and drink the beers from the beer cave.  I don't think you have to wait for the server to open your beer, they'll notice and charge your accordingly.  It's all walk in and self service beer, why don't more places do that?!\n\nMike
The mac n cheese dog I had was just ok, but the Mason Dixon with its slaw and chili was killer. The fries and barbeque wings were just as good. I also liked the atmosphere, the mural, and the employees who were really nice and honest and helpful. It's in a cool neighborhood too. Go!
Yum! Great little find just outside of the city....especially if you are Chicago dog fan
UPDATE: July 2013\n\nWent back for a visit to the alma mater and decided to stop in at D's before heading out. I have updates on the gluten-free beer situation and the nacho situation.\n\nGF Beer: MUCH improved from what I remember. They had at least three varieties of the \"deglutenized\" beers - Estrella Damm Daura and both the Amber and Blonde Brunehaut (from Belgium!). They MAY have had Omission as well. \nThey also have at least three varieties of New Planet, and at least two of Greens. Dogfish Head T'weasonale. Possibly New Grist and Tread Lightly? I was in a haze of deliciously non-gluteny beer at this point. \n\nNachos: Maybe I'm recalling incorrectly, but I think when I've had these in the past they are made with real cheese - you know, shredded and melted. This time they were served with that nasty-ass liquid cheese goop, like you get at a ballpark. Blegh. \n\nStill four stars overall! Avoid the nachos though.\n\n---\n\nThe only food I've ever had here is nachos, so I can't speak to that. I WILL speak to the beer selection, though! I've managed to collect quite an assortment of beer snob friends, who love spending hours (literally) in the Cave o' Beer. I have to eat gluten free, so most ordinary beers are off-limits for me, BUT, they have an enormous selection of hard cider! Many many different kinds, including my favorite cider in the whole world, JK Scrumpy. Totally reasonable prices, too.\n\nNow the bad:\n1. They close at midnight! After the downstairs closes you can take your drink upstairs to a little bar, but it's super loud, has no seating, and you don't have access to the magical treasure trove of beer. Boooo.\n2. This is totally a niche thing, but I wish they had a better selection of gluten-free beers. There are lots of tasty ones out there, but they often only have Bards and Redbridge.
I like it. Veggie friendly too.
Chicago dog was awesome. Great selection of craft beers on draft too!
New menu! Check it out!
I'm subleasing an apt across the street and have been in a few times now.  Hot dogs are good and cheap but the burger options, although still good, are close to $10 each.  Nice draft selection but also pricy.  Their happy hour is $1 off drafts 4p-6p everyday, so that's still $4-5 for a beer.  I'll be back though.
While I'm not much of a beer fan, I appreciate that this place would appeal to both the beer snob and the casual drinker. Enormous selection of beers in the Cave as well as on tap. They have Arsenal Cider, which makes me very happy (although I wish they carried the Bone-Dry). \n\nThe hot dogs and fries are amazing. I had an Angry Tiki. It sounded like an odd combination - pineapple, hoisin sauce, and bacon on a hot dog - but it was delicious. The only thing I might change next time is asking for a side of Sriracha (would have put this hot dog over the top). \n\nIt's cheap, it's a good set-up for going with a group, and I will definitely take any of my beer-loving friends here.
Came here for lunch after a long day on the road\n\nIt's a beer and bar place.\n\nThey have a variety of beer, they have a room all the way in the back with lots of different beer and a separate room displaying other kinds of beer.  They also have outdoor seating.  It's like 2 shops next to each other separated by a hall way.  I didn't even know there was a spot next door until I went to the restroom.\n\nThe fries are good.\nThey offer pizza and other goodies too.\nThey have many types of different types of dogs.  I had the veggie red alert which is spicy.  They have 3 kinds of hot dogs so it caters even to the vegetarian.  Regular dog, beef dog and veggie dog.  You have unlimited toppings - mushrooms, onions, creamy avocado etc.  The dog came in this little boat sized paper tray.  I find it very hard to eat because all of the toppings would fall off to the table, but they do have paper towels for you to put underneath if you want to do this so you can eat whatever falls off.  The veggie dog tasted like the real thing.  They also have dogs of the day.  \nQuite an interesting place but worth the visit in a little town.
Last night was my first time at D's. The beer cave was amazing! I'm not a fan of beer but can appreciate a vast selection. I went straight for the cider. The lively energy of this place was incontestable. No frills, down-to-earth place where you can kick it back with a beer (or in my case a cider) and enjoy company with friends. It was a perfect ending to our movie night at the Regent Square Theater. With smiles planted on our faces after watching a dark comedy, going to D's only extended our happy mood. Before leaving I went back to the beer cave for more cider. Good stuff, good stuff!
I am a fan of this place.  I love the dogs, of course.  I love the beers, of course.  I love the Beer Cave the most.  I'm not sure if it's the largest collection of bottles, but it's pretty impressive nonetheless.  I just wish that the beers I wanted had the prices labeled.  I swear, every one I grabbed for had price tags on the beers surrounding it but not on the one I wanted.\n\nAnyway, the dogs are tender and juicy.  Even the veggie dogs are pretty convincingly \"dog-like.\"  The fries are plentiful and pretty damn good.  Greasy and salty (but not too much of either) and a perfect accompaniment to beers and hot dogs.  The servers are friendly and helpful with the menu.\n\nPros: great beer selection, wonderful food, friendly staff\nCons: I was here after brunch to catch the hockey game and they had NCAA basketball on instead; not a big deal, but enough to be annoying
D's has been hovering among my Pittsburgh bookmarks for a couple of years now, so I was happy to finally stop by for a visit and late lunch recently. After squeezing into a parallel parking spot out front, I had two things on my mind when walking in here: hotdogs and beer, both of which they have down pat.\n\nSince it was mid-afternoon, few tables were filled, but the front patio was open to allow in some fresh air during the nice day. I first looked around at their extensive beer selections; \"six pax\" in the rear \"Beer Cave\" and individual bottles in the middle cooler. I found something to my liking and grabbed a high table and menu.\n\nA \"Big Ben\" dog sounded appetizing (and mildly appropriate), but I ended up going with the \"Mason Dixon\" topped with chili and coleslaw. Knowing that one dog would not be enough, I also went with a small order of their \"Pub Fries\" covered in cheese and bacon. (Forgive me Father, for I have no restraint.)\n\nHoly Moley! Both the dog and fries were excellent and down right tasty. Thank God because my satisfied stomach was smacking down the guilty part of my brain that was subconsciously calculating the summation of calories shared between the meal and two bottles of liquid refreshment.\n\nOh well. I definitely heart D's, even if my heart now hates me in return. 4.5 Stars.
D's is a great place to drink to your heart's content with any darn beer you please! They have just about any beer your little mug could possibly conjure up. The service is quick, not overly friendly but they get the job done- what you expect from a pub type atmosphere.  A great after-work unwind.
My first visit was tonight, on wing night. I got barbecue wings and a side salad. My son got parmesan and garlic wings. Large meaty wings with flavorful coatings. I asked for ranch and blue cheese for dipping and both were delicious. The salad wasn't real special but it had a nice combination of greens. Waitress was friendly and efficient. Nice neighborhood feel. So glad my son brought me here. It was his 5th wing night visit on a row.
I decided to visit the reagent square location after reading the great reviews on here and i wasn't disappointed. Parking was relatively easy to get (Tuesday afternoon). The store is well organized not too overwhelming like most thrift/vintage stores. They carried alot of Jcrew, Ralph Lauren, Ann Taylor stuff...cashmere cardis, blazers blouses etc.  But they also carried a range of  high end stuff, i spotted 2 Oscar de la Renta sweaters, some St Johns blazers, a Prada bag. They also carry some vintage jewelry, scarves and handbags. \nIf you take the time to go through the racks you will definitely score some unique HIGH QUALITY , no funky smells goodies.As far as their prices i noticed that average price was 23-35 and the major designer stuff was between 60-100.They also have a sales rack at the back (was 75% off when i was there).  I knocked off one star because i thought the prices were abit higher than i'm used to in Denver (esp on the jewelry) \n I walked out with a vintage (60's) Pucci dress($88) in perfect condition and an Adrienne Vittadini sweater ($17).  All profits go to a women's shelter which means minimal buyers remorse...hell yess!!!
Huge, huge \"battleship\" sandwich w Italian meats + bologna, exotic malt liquors, craftsmanship, and a barred window entrance hiding it's charm. Great experience.
A couple times a month there is a swing dance at Edgewood on Sundays. Frequently featuring a live band, there is a small cover charge (cash only) and a friendly atmosphere. The level of the dancers attending can be hit or miss but its a relaxing sunday evening. There is an area with tables, chairs and a snack table with beverages for an additional donation fee. \n\nThe parking can be difficult (it is a residential area), so it would be smart to try to get there early. \n\nI believe they also have a dance lesson for beginners before the dance starts run by a group called Coal Country Traditions which is a Pittsburgh based group of older dancers that do swing dancing as well as folk dancing of different sorts, there always have pamphlets at the dance in regards to other dances and events going on within the city at a table in the back of the dance.
Fair prices.  Consistent Octane rating.  I've never been inside.  Also I think this station is very busy so the premium my car burns always seems to go a little further on a tank from here.  Not sure why but I also always get 20 more miles out of a tank if I fill up here instead of getgo or costco.
Love the food, but we get take out to the office and every time its a bit of an ordeal.  \n\nEat in.  If you're planning on take out make it simple.
We celebrated my daughter's 12th Birthday at Benihana on 10/16/14.  The food was delicious and the chef was very talented and entertaining!  He did things with the food on the Hibachi we hadn't seen before...a big heart made out of fried rice and made it \"beat\" using the spatula.  \n     The only negative was when it came time for them to sing Happy Birthday our waitress was the only one around so our poor waitress was stuck doing the birthday songs by herself\nSo we joined in to help her.  No wonder our waitress seemed so unhappy with her job.\n    I was happy that we had the option of brown rice and not just white or fried rice.
I read a few of the reviews of Mad Mex and quite a few reviewers called their food Tex Mex and I don't see it that way. I see Mad Mex as more Cali Mex with the accent being on fresh ingredients, healthy cooking, and excellent service. The black bean soup is almost fat free and the best I've ever had. (try it Joe D style with a dollop of guac on it instead of sour cream) The lime cilantro salad dressing Is amazing, I've had it on the grilled portobello mushroom salad for a meat free meal. The grilled fish tacos are every bit as good as the famous fish tacos in San Diego. The fish is grilled perfectly, plenty of home made guac, pico, and sour cream accompany this dish. The beer list is a who's who of some of the finest micro brews across the states, including many IPAs which are rotated monthly. You can watch the bartenders squeezing fresh fruits and melons for their huge line ups of margaritas flavors. This little Pittsburgh gem of a restaurant is now opening locations in other cities like Columbus and Philly. There are many locations in the Burgh.
When I was living in Wheeling WV, my friends and I would always go to this place for special occasions. They have an awesome beer selection and all kinds of great food! Plus most of their food has a vegan option!\n\nThat being said the food is really good but not great. The tofu is bland and the salsa is not very spicy. But who needs tofu when you have beans and guacamole? They make a good salsa verde as well.\n\nThe place has seating inside and out side, both with plenty of seats. There is all kinds of unique south western inspired art all over the place and it makes for a lovely atmosphere.
I love this restaurant and I probably go about once a month; however, there's just something about the inconsistency that gets me to just feel like it's not quite there.\n\nMad Mex offers a funky decor and typically quick service.  If you plan to go on a Friday or Saturday night, I suggest reservations because there's nowhere really to relax indoors when you are waiting for a table.\n\nBeing regulars, we have settled into a few choice menu items.  If you bother to read the menu, you'll notice a few jokes hidden in the description of items, so even if you are a regular, it's worth a read.  We always start with some chips and pico or the Picka Dippa and some margaritas.  The black bean dip is to die for.  Slight bit of spice, creamy black beans and a little bit of melted cheese.  The beer cheese isn't my favorite, so that one is never ordered, but we regularly switch up the salsa choices.  For margaritas, we have settled on the Ultimate margarita or the Don Julio VIP.\n\nThe burritos are huge.  Seriously, as big as your face type of huge.  At this restaurant, you will definitely use your silverware.  Of course, they are filled with a lot of rice and beans, so I recommend to pay extra for double meat to make a more desirable meat to starch ratio.  The chimichanga is great, but pre-made so they can't accomodate any changes.  The tacos and fajitas are good and come with nice warm flour tortillas.  Enchiladas tend to be oversauced, but overall good.  \n\nThe food tends to be quite consistant and you get what you expect, but other parts of the meal tend to be hit or miss:\n1. I think it's the sour mix, but something about the margaritas tends to be really inconsistant.  Sometimes you get a strong one, sometimes not so strong.... Sometimes you get a sweet one, sometimes you get a sour one.  It's never terrible by any means, but you really never know what you are going to get.  The Greentree location has the most variation in the margaritas while McNight road's margaritas tend to be better more often.\n2. As off-season tomatoes tend to be finiky, sometimes the pico is fresh and flavorful, sometimes you get the gritty or cardboard-ish tomatoes.\n3. Some of there servers are great while other times you get one that leaves you wanting more from the service.\n\nIn contrast to another review, YES, they do appreciate you on your birthday.  None of that childish singing or a flamboyant dessert... if you are on there list, you get a birthday card for a free burrito.  That's better than any of that cheesy crap.  Although a casual dining chain restaurant typically isn't worthy birthday dinner fare, if someone's giving away a free burrito, I am there.
Burritos are huge! Margaritas are good,  and they have a good selection of tequila!
This place is hard to find in this crazy plaza, but the food makes it all worthwhile.\n\nThe Herb O'Vores Tacos are one of the most delicious things I have ever had. I've had them twice in State College and once here. I was tempted to try something new on the menu but our waitress said you can never go wrong with the tofu tacos and she is right. I didn't regret it one bit. I can always try making my own thai burrito or spicy buffalo wrap at home.\n\nYou get three tacos filled with fried cubes of tofu which have been tossed in a light sweet General Tso's type sauce topped with bean sprouts, a green salsa with avocado and served with lime wedges, rice, and black beans. So delicious and it all came out of the kitchen pretty quickly.\n\nI love reading their menu. The Mex-Asian dishes all sound awesome. If I lived in Pittsburgh, I would come often to try everything.\n\nThey also have Daiya cheese and vegan cheesecake always on their menu. How sweet is that?\n\nMy only complaint is that we went just after 5 and it was so dark in the restaurant I could hardly see the menu.
I love me some Mad Mex but, I have to say that I have never had anything but the grilled fish tacos.  They are so good that I never felt the need to get anything  else when I order.  Why mess up a good thing.  This specific location is very nice and out of the way but I have to say that the fish tacos at the location in Monroeville, PA are much better than here.  Not sure if it was just an off day because I have eaten here before, but at Monroeville they are VERY consistent on delivering a darn good grilled fish (mahi-mahi) taco.  Today's dish was still very, very good but the fish was slightly dry.  I'm being picky here but that is only because I have eaten at least 50 or so grilled fish tacos from Mad Mex.  Now, in giving my review, know this .... I still got an order to bring home.  YES, I did.  For some reason (like lasagna) they are better the next day.  I will be eating them for breakfast.
I love kitchen stores, and Crate is one of the best in pittsburgh. Recently I read a few articles about the dangers of non stick cookware. None of them are really any good for any of us. I won't get into what the dangers of them are, but they are real and most non stick cookware will be off the market by 2015.\n\nI started looking into enamel coated cookware, Crate has a number of different varieties and bought myself a 3 piece starter set with an 8, 10, and 12 inch pans. Like non stick, no oils are needed and clean up is pretty quick.\n\nCrate in itself is a cooking gadget Mecca. If you love stainless steel cookware, they have anything you want from All Clad, made right in Canonsburg Pa. There's Fiesta ware from Wheeling, and If you want Emeral's professional cookware , Crate has it.\n\nYou can take cooking classes here as well, they have a full service kitchen in back. Classes are limited to certain amounts due to space, but everyone sits after and enjoys the food they've prepped. \n\nIt's top of the line cookware so it has top of the line prices. But well worth it!
Crouse's beer distributor is a good, convenient place to pick up a case. The prices are affordable and the staff are friendly and helpful. The selection is also pretty decent.
good burgers and soup!!!
Oh, I like Panera. I love their you pick two combos. Awesome grilled cheese and tomato soup and desserts. It's a nice place to hang out while you're waiting for your car to get inspected.
I wish more chains had great quality foods and ambience rich environments. I thoroughly enjoyed my roasted turkey, avo blt!
Once enjoying my crisp cool water. Our orders were taken promptly, I ordered the chicken club and customized it with a side of coleslaw. My better half had the fish sandwich with a coleslaw as well. The food came like the wind, the coleslaw was damn good! The best. Our sandwiches couldn't have been better if Jesus himself made them. All around it was the bee's knees.
When trying to think of where to go for a steak dinner The Greentree Inn came to mind. I had never been here in all the years of living so very close. I was glad I chose this establishment. Food was excellent and I loved the feel of the place
Nice, clean local place in Green Tree. Might be a little pricey but the food is good and homemade.
I'm usually in Pittsburgh once a year and each time I come to town I typically have Vincents. Their NY Style thin crust pizza is just awesome and the service is typically pretty good. Regular crust is good as well if you want  something a little bit thicker.
Who knew french fries came on salads? Pittsburgh did.\n\nSalads are good. Pizza looked tasty. Service is helpful (when you can find it).\n\nThe pepper steak salad is pretty good - get it with ranch. Or instead, just get a plate of those garlic knots. They're the best thing there.\n\nAnd the comment about helpful service - when I went to pay the bill it was too windy for me to leave it out on the table. Instead I went inside and it was a no-man's land. No person working could be found for a good three minutes while I stood there with my bill in hand. I mean, what kind of place is dead empty of all wait staff, bartenders, or any person who worked there for that long during the lunch rush? Seems odd.
We stayed here in an effort to cut costs (being competitors, we are always trying to cut costs...), and we weren't disappointed.  Our room was clean, the fridge was an adequate size, and we had a microwave and coffeemaker, plus free internet.  Another bonus was that we were relatively close to the downtown area without being part of that congestion.  The decor was pretty neutral, which was a nice surprise.  The staff was also pleasant and friendly.
The service was great while we were here. The food was average. And the parking was bad.
Although I walked in with some hesitation (after a less than great stay at a Holiday in Columbus, OH) I am forever grateful for Chad who worked his magic and secured suites for my coworkers and I after a literal nightmare booking at the nearby Clarion (misrepresented on Hotwire).  This is the most fabulous H.I. Ive seen anywhere and the service is fantastic to boot.  This is a newly renovated space (used to be Best Western) but i love the lobby, the rooms, the free wifi, shuttle service, free breakfast and the fact that an elevator is always waiting for you in the lobby! If Im ever back in this neck of the woods Id be happy to stay here again. Keep up the good work guys and gals!
Beautiful hotel exterior and lobby. clean, spacious rooms, lots of closet space, 24/7 fitness hours, extended pool hours 6am-11pm.   Great complimentary breakfast.  Close to tons of chain restaurants and fast food and a couple of family-owned italian restaurant (Vincent's was delicious). I loved the location, access to parking, convenience,  friendliness of the staff.  It was almost perfect! \n\n The only downside (that's why 4 instead of 5 star) is that the rooms are DARK.  I had every light on and it was still pretty dark during a cloudy day.  It probably doesn't bother most people who will just come back to their hotel to sleep.  It is not too unlike other hotel rooms but it seems TOO dark. Not enough light to read from unless you are in the bathroom.
The only reason I like this Salon is because I've finally found a stylist that cuts my hair okay, Kara. I used to go to one of those grandma salons that only old women go to and cuts your hair for cheap (I even got a discount for being a student).  However, since it closed down, I hadn't been able to get a decent haircut in Pittsburgh (I've had to wait to go back to California to cut my hair).  I've actually tried this salon prior to getting Kara and I left very unhappy (my hair looked like it hadn't been cut at all and I had to pay $50+ for it).  However, I decided to give MCN another try and get an appointment with Kara based on other Yelp reviews, and I was not disappointed.  She didn't require a lot of instructions regarding what I want and she cut my hair just the way I wanted it, even better.  I love her!
Excellent Salon.  I went to Kara for curly hair as Nicolette was not available (this was my first visit:  I recently moved to PGH and used these Yelp reviews to help me pick).  She was perfect:  friendly, professional, and gave me the exact cut and color that I asked for.  It was just as I'd imagined it, only better because it was on my head!  And she KNOWS curly hair -- how to cut it, manage it, style it.  It is rare for me to feel so confident in a stylist. Absolutely worth it.  No complaints at all. Thank you Yelp!
Newly relocated to Pittsburgh's east end from Miami, I wasn't sure where to turn for my hair.   I was nervous about finding talent, especially since my last few hair appointments in a new city had been less than stellar experiences. I was worried I would never find another stylist on par with the super star I had in Miami.  I couldn't let worry prolong the inevitable, however, with grey starting to peek out and ends beginning to split,  so  I did what anyone would do by asking around, reading reviews online and praying.   Upon leaving MCN Salon with my hair cut and colored to perfection, I can tell you my prayers were answered.  After reading other positive reviews about Sarah here on Yelp, I decided to book with her.   Although, I have a long, classic hair, I watched her work on a variety of other clients while my color was processing.   Her vision and talent seemed limitless as I watched her style a young child to a very punk rock female and an older more traditional man. It was very cool to watch her use her talent to shape each individual's cut to their preferred style and preference, which is what we all hope for in the chair but don't always get.   And, she does all of this for a phenomenal price.    I had full color, hair cut and blow out for $130 and was blown away.  I don't remember the last time I left a salon with the complete package for less than $200.\n\nFrom the check-in to consultation to payment and yes, rebooking I had an exceptional experience.  If you are looking for a salon and stylist in Pittsburgh, look no further than MCN Salon and Sarah!
I'm in search for the best stylist when it comes to curly hair. \n\nHere's is where I met the charming Kara last week, with whom I had a great consultation. I explained that I needed a haircut that was intended for curly hair, with layers and not so symmetrical. I wanted a cut while the hair was dry but I let her do what was best for her, knowing that most stylist don't work this way. So she cut my hair wet, dried it and finished while it was dry. I got a cut that's a bit too short (that's the problem with cutting curly hair while wet - it \"shrinks\" once it dries) but I really like it!\n\nThe hair salon is very trendy. It was busy at the time I showed, one weekday afternoon. Two bulldogs came in after being walked and hang out at the back of the salon. I'm assuming they're the owner's dogs. \nHairdryers hung on of the mirrored walls. Very nice staff, specially at the reception area where they had beverages and pastries.
So I was walking around downtown wanting to find a place that does Shellac nails. I tried looking on Yelp to identify if any salons downtown offer it, but with no success. So off I went, and I stumbled upon Kenny's Nail Center/Salon. Apparently right now they are the only nail salon in downtown Pittsburgh that has shellac. \n\nAt first, I passed it b/c I didn't see any bright flashing lights saying shellac, but then I did a double take b/c on the window there is a small poster advertising that they do shellac. So I went in to confirm that they do shellac and to get the costs - as some of you know it can be pricey. \n\nThey did confirm they did shellac and that without a full manicure that the cost would be $25 (slight grooming and painting only). I'm not sure how much the manicure and shellac would cost, but I thought $25 was a good deal for getting a 3-week polish job. And from what I heard it usually costs $35-40 bucks a pop. \n\nThey were very busy and asked if I could come later in the afternoon around 2:15 PM (I went there initially at 12:30 PM) and I said that was fine - luckily I have some flexibility with work. So around 2:00 I departed work to go back to Kenny's. It seemed even more crowded so I was worried that I'd be overlooked, but they asked what I was there for and I said shellac and they said, \"oh yes, 2:15 sit down\" and pointed towards a nail chair. \n\nSo I sat down and was greeted by Kammy - she was super nice and did an awesome job. I get a bit worried about some of these nail places cause they can do a pretty crappy job, but Kammy took her time (although it was clear she was very busy and people were waiting to see her). \n\nShe's the only one in the salon that does Shellac and she is there on Thurs., Fri, and Sat. So for my downtown working ladies (or men if you're in to that sort of thing) in the house - stop by and see Kammy to get a polish job that will be chip and smudge free for 3 weeks! \n\nMy nails look aaaaawesome! I got the bright pink color - I think it's called tutti fruity! \n\nOh and there was also a cute little girl that helped out after Kammy was essentially finished who put the oil on my cuticles and did the alcohol finishing step to make the nails all glossy. Be a star and make sure you tip her as well!
SoHo is always a great place to start out at before heading to a Pirates game, or anything else going on in the North Shore. My networking group had a social here a couple of weeks ago - and it went awesome! We provided appetizers for the group - and they ended up bringing more than what we had ordered as a thank you. Also, we had almost 100 people They sectioned off part of the bar for our group, and were able to accommodate everyone with their drink orders in a quick fashion. They are SUPER easy to work with, and we are looking to hold more repeat events here because of that.
Stopped in for lunch before a Bucs game. Great service and food.  Hamburger was thick and juicy cooked perfectly.  Service is excellent.  I can highly recommend SoHo as your pre Bucco stop.
Very good bar in Pittsburgh's North Shore. Nice draft and bottle beer selection. Had a Pittsburgh salad and burger. Both first rate! Great service and a lively atmosphere full of friendly customers enjoying themselves. \n\nFull menu including steaks, seafood and pastas. Calling SoHo a bar is a misnomber.\n\nThere are a few mistakes you can make selecting a bar for dinner in this neighborhood. SoHo isn't one of them!
We were looking for food late night on Thursday and nothing was open.  Since we were staying at spring hill suites we thought we'd give it a try. We were afraid it would be expensive. \n\nFlipped menu to sandwiches.  Had a burger or turkey burger or hot dog or chicken sandwich with side for $9-10.\n\nWe thought that was good and we had no other late night options.  Food came out hot and fresh. My chicken sandwich was grilled nicely with plenty of juice left in. Homemade chips as side.\n\nPlace was large and clean. Pirates out of town so we walked right in at 10am on a Thursday night. Full bar but we didn't order anything.
Good restaurant with a diverse menu, I've been here 4 times now and always had a good meal. The Tuna appetizer is awesome, if you like heat get a burger with the ghost pepper cheese its hot but great, tuna entree is good as well as the steaks. I'll be back again.
Surprisingly (or not), I had a great time here.  True, this restaurant offers little bang for the buck, but that doesn't mean that the quality of food has suffered.  The sushi was surprisingly good.\n\nMy dish was a bit oily.  The risotto was nice, but was a tad big on the salty side.  That's okay, though, because I still enjoyed it.  I imagine that it'd be a great place to take someone for a date at con.
From March 2013 visit: the food was much better, good enough that I want to return. I had salmon, quinoa, spinach, pesto, bread (that's all I remember). I'm upgrading to 4 stars.\n\nFrom Aug. 2009: The most disappointing thing about this place is the temperature: uncomfortably cold.  Probably 60 degrees (on a warm day in August!).  The whole dining area was cold; it wasn't just our table.  When we brought it to the attention of the waiter he said there's nothing they can do about it; it's the hotel's cooling system.  That's insane!  Don't they care about the comfort of their customers?\n\nThe food was good, but the waiter did a poor job: he got one order correct, but they botched Jo's fish dish (she asked for the rice pilaf without tomato, and they brought her the standard rice pilaf with tomato), and they botched my order (I didn't order the prix fixe dinner, but they charged me for it (at a cost of $7 more), even though I communicated my order clearly.
I like it here...\n\nI've only visited in the past for happy hour or drinks out with friends. Recently, both times I came late in the evening after work functions and arrived hungry. Coincidentally, both nights I was there was also salsa night. It's an interesting crowd, all ages, just gettin' their salsa on. I enjoy the music, but will sit back and let the \"pros\" do the dancing. They have friendly service, a few outdoor tables and a huge bar. It's a pretty lounge-y vibe. \n\nThere is a decent wine/beer list, and also specialty cocktails. Both times, I tried the sushi, which was not bad at all - not comparing to a Japanese restaurant, but for a bar it was done well. The spicy one was really hot, topped with a jalepeno: nice touch. I also ordered the house salad, which was a meal in itself. Seriously it was huge! The ingredients were fresh, and with some balsamic and olive oil, it was very enjoyable. \n\nFor drinks or light fare, Bossa Nova is one happening spot in the downtown area, which seems to be on the up and up!
I was there in November 2009, what a great little place! It's laid out like a shotgun house, long and narrow, and it fills up pretty quickly at night, but if you appreciate industrial spaces, exposed brick, etc., you'll really dig the vibe at this place. Plus, they had the Great Lakes Christmas Ale on tap, just when other places were running dry of it, so it got extra points for that! Calamari is pretty good, service was excellent. If i had one criticism, it's that the place is bit *too* dark, even for a bar -- but very clean!
Sooo blacked out here that\nWe heckled the guitarist.\nNot sorry. He sucked.
Bossa Nova's step-sister bar, but not the evil jealous step sister more like the older a little more mature caring step-sister. At least in the way of making a carefully crafted unique martini or cocktail. \n\nAtmosphere is a little more cramped, but usually you can still find a table late on a week or weekend night if you do not mind sitting in the back. It is fine for me because I don't like being sandwiched at the bar with other people's conversations in my face. \n\nI didn't try the food but my friend ordered the Tuna appetizer and she said she loved it just wished the portions were a little better. But for the price it wasn't bad. \n\nI ordered the Perfect Pear cocktail with Pear Absolute Eldleweiss flower liqouer and a splash of pineapple juice it was delicious! Not too sweet and I despise sweet drinks. The perfect blend of soft tangy tartness. Much more creative then the drink menu at Bossa Nova.\n\nFor the drop in spot after a show or just happy hour with friends I found this to be a pretty down to earth and decent spot. The waitress was not that great but she was young, some things are forgiven if the product is just right.
Went to this place for lunch. My wife order a wrap and I order a salad. Very nice food. The sweet potato fries are wonderful. My smoked duck break salad is wonderful too. Highly recommended.
Found you on Yelp and weren't disappointed. Very friendly waitstaff and good food (bar fare). Yummy desserts. The acoustics downstairs were terrible. Exposed brick everywhere and no noise dampening.  Not the best place for an intimate dinner or quiet conversation on the weekend. But a young, fun, party like atmosphere. Convenient to cultural district.
The Partner In Cuisine (PIC) and I had an early dinner there recently thanks to Groupon and we were not disappointed.  Since we weren't sure what to get and were just generically hungry, we decided to just let the menu decide for us and we ordered one of each of the highlighted items on the menu - the \"house specials\" according to our server.\n\nThe calamari was excellent and it was apparent that it had been hand breaded.  The Asian fusion made for a delicious alternative to the typical calamari that was reminiscent of a General Tso's squid.  The main dishes were also good, but nothing in particular stuck out about them.  I also had a red-velved martini which I thought was probably the best part of the meal.\n\nOverall, I would definitely go back on a weeknight for happy hour or on a Tuesday to try the variety of mini martinis, but I think I'll leave paying $9 for an alcoholic beverage to \"special\" nights and not just a typical weekend dinner.\n\nThey do lose a star because even though we were one of three occupied tables and a few taken seats at the bar, the service was incredibly slow.  It took so long for our appetizer to come out, I began to question whether the cook had to get in his car and go down to Wholey's to buy more squid.
Try the sweet potato fries with a side of honey mustard instead of ketchup. Linda and the rest of the ladies at the bar are awesme.
I love Olive or Twist. Absolutely love it. As I'm sure everyone who has been here has mentioned, it has a fantastic drink menu that offers a decent variety in terms of its alcoholic beverages - everything from various delicious martini-style drinks to the standard favorite beers. The place also features a really good menu; I'm very partial to its crab cake sandwich, which really hits the spot and has a perfect balance of crabcake with toppings and dressing. I especially love how any sauces or dips with appetizers are usually served in a martini glass. It's a cute and well-thought touch.\n\nThe only drawback here is that Olive or Twist is pretty darn popular; this place gets very noisy after 4:00 very quickly, especially as the happy hour prices kick in. This is even assuming you can get in - I've tried to go here on nights when it's completely booked. Completely. Every table, top and bottom floor, with only standing room near the bar.\n\nI will continue to be a major fan because the drinks and eats really are fantastic, but will probably avoid coming here during its busiest days and hours (i.e. the end of the week and beginning of the weekend).
Girls night had to happen. We decided to go to Olive or Twist, because it was close and I did have a coupon. \n\nI was delighted with this bar/restaurant. I never knew that they had an upstairs! Upstairs they have couches and comfortable chairs with coffee tables in between them.  So much more comfortable than sitting on wooden or bar stools. And after a long day at work, being comfortable is really all that I am about. The music was slightly loud but still tolerable, and enjoyable because it was older rap music that we started to then sing and dance to (in our chairs!).\n\nWe all ordered food and drinks. I got the burger, which wasn't anything special, but I wasn't expecting the sun and the moon from it. My friends ordered the jerk chicken and the bean quesadilla. The jerk chicken was amazing. They had this jalapenos sauce on it, wooo hooo. It was so good. A perfect mix of sweet and spicy that was mouth watering. I kept on dipping my fries it in. Yummy!\n\nThe drinks were also perfect. I ordered the Wild Tea Mojito and the Pink Lemonade. Both of these drinks were refreshing and delicious. I just wanted to just go down the drink menu and check off all each and every one of those cocktails! I wanted to know if all of them could be as good as the two that I tried. \n\nIt was a great and comfortable experience for a bar. I will be going back soon!
Great atmosphere, took us even though we were an hour early for our reservation, the steak salad was amazing. Service was awesome. Only thing that could have made it better was more tv's for football that was on!
This place is pretty good. The buffalo chicken spread and the jerked salmon are awesome. The service is always good especially at the bar. They have an upstairs lounge that is open for happy hour during the week. If you are looking to grab a few drinks after work with friends, the lounge upstairs is a good choice. Everything on the menu is reasonably priced with happy hour specials M-F. ($2 off all martinis and half price buffalo chicken spread)
Hands down one of my favorite restaurants in Pittsburgh! The atmosphere is great and the martini list is extensive. I've ordered the cake batter, caramel apple, and s'mores and haven't been disappointed in any so far. The buffalo chicken dip appetizer is what keeps us coming back! It is served cold in a martini glass with warm pita chips and is just amazing! I've ordered several dishes and haven't had a bad meal either!\n\nThe only thing that lacks sometimes is the service, especially on my last visit. We were standing at the hostess stand for a couple of minutes and no one came over. Finally a girl did but she just looked at us, got something, and walked away. Not even a \"someone will be right with you\". Then another girl came over and said \"do you need a table?\". I wanted to respond with \"why would I be standing at a podium that says let us seat you\", but I refrained. We were seated, it took several more minutes for our drink order to be taken and it was subpar service the rest of the night. Waiting, waiting, and more waiting. \n\nOther than that, love the food, love the atmosphere and especially love the martinis!
Fantastic martinis!!
This is my favorite Italian market in Pittsburgh.  I buy food from here almost every week.  It doesn't have the crazy selection (or crazy crowd) of Penn Mac, but what it does have is a serviceable meat and cheese counter, a good range of olive oils, a few different brands of canned tomatoes, nice pepperoni, and a tiny little produce section which is heavy on the peppers.  I usually get my pasta from here rather than Penn Mac.  They have a few different choices of brand, all of them decent, and you don't have to fight a hundred out-of-towners if you want something.  The people are friendly, and if you stop in frequently, they remember you (Penn Mac and a lot of the other stores are just too crowded for the level of fussing-over that you'll get here).  \n\nJimmy (the guy with the cigar permanently ensconced in his mouth) also makes fabulous pepperoni rolls and sandwiches.  We like to eat lunch here as a break during our grocery shopping.  During the warmer seasons, you should sit at the outside tables and people-watch, because you will see and hear some truly hilarious stuff (this is the place where I heard the guy from Hermanowski's corner store chatting with the nun selling raffle tickets about another nun, Sister Dominica or something similar, who had won $50 on the scratch-off lotto and blown it all on more scratch-off tickets).  There's also an upstairs dining room for when it gets colder out, though.
I need to indulge myself on the rest of this establishment but review is limited to the bread they sell on the street.  On a crowded street you will find a very funny bread-salesmen gunning for your attention to be focused on the racks of bread loafs behind him.  Well sir, you are in fact an excellent and carney-esque salesman but you need not do much.  The aroma emanating from the bread itself on a busy street is enough.  Goodness is the smell of freshly baked bread amazing.  And this place has a few standard options and some excellent \"different\" options.  The cheesey jalapeno bread was incredibly delicious.  However, my favorite selection of the day was the freshly dressed (I want to say with some fresh tomato sauce and basil) toasted  bread.  WOW!
Don't go if you want a nice dining environment.  To say the furnishings in the dining area are spartan would be an understatement.\nBut, the food is fantastic.  Fresh made, fairly priced, and delicious.  Get a dessert cookie or cannoli to round out your lunch.  \nI hit this place every time I'm in Pittsburgh.  Everyone hears about Primanti's (which is good, dont get me wrong), but this place is every bit as good.
The Port Authority bus system in Pittsburgh gets a lot of attention. There are lots of articles in the newspapers, regular protests, petitions, etc over route reduction and fare hikes and so on. Some people think its slow, unreliable and overcrowded.\n\nThere's a general sense that its unfair that Pitt students ride for free while much of the Pitt staff do not. And, of course, the rest of the city has to pay too. \n\nBut I think all this is just a testament to the health of the system. People - students at all the college and universities, long-term residents, downtown commuters, school kids - actually value and use the bus system. \n\nIn other university towns (not to name names) the schools just give up entirely and shuttle their students around in private buses, which means, in the end, less ridership, fewer routes less frequently and less money for the public transportation. \n\nI also found the drivers to be considerate - especially of the elderly and disabled - and as helpful as they could be, given the demands on their time and attention. \n\nDepending on your living situation, the buses make it possible to live in Pittsburgh with one car, or none.  And I found that it's safer to take a bus in the snow, too, (if not quicker, which it *sometimes* also is).
Very nice cheap quick bus service to airport. (28X).  but i think i've found out what happens to all the old buses in Seattle, they are shipped to Pittsburgh, old polluting diesel buses seem to be the norm.\n\nthey also run the inclines, which are pretty cool if not old.
I called Pittsburgh my temporary home three summers in a row. I went to the University of Pittsburgh for SLI: Summer Language Institute from '05-'07. The university, in an effort to accommodate out-of-state students as much as possible, provided \"free\" bus passes (these were factored into your cost of attending). With my full scholarship and pass, I had every intention of keeping this trip on the cheap by walking everywhere I could and using public trans for everything else.\n\nMy first experience with the Port Authority was taking the 28X Airport Flyer from the International Airport to the Oakland campus, which is roughly 20 miles away. The bus runs from 5:20am to 1:01am every day of the week. The opposite direction is just as convenient and starts at 4:25am with last pickup at 11:51pm. The trip takes about an hour and there are buses every 30 minutes or so. The drive is very scenic and gives you a good feel for all that Pitt has to offer.\n\nThroughout the week students of Serbian, Russian and Bulgarian came together and went on little excursions to pass the free time. The major super market in the area is Giant Eagle (\"Jynt Igel\", if you want to get local). There was one within walking distance of campus, but it was much more of an adventure to take the 61A, 61C or 61D to Squirrel Hill (\"Skvirel\", if you want to get Slavic with it) and shop there. We also preferred this since the main street is lined with Greek, Russian and Jewish stores and restaurants. There is also a good number of family owned arts and crafts shops, handmade goods stores and other small businesses.\n\nIf we were feeling like we really wanted a change of scenery, we'd ride the 61C or 61D farther down SW and cross the Allegheny to Homestead, PA. There is a large shopping center with all the luxuries of corporate America from AMC Loews Waterfront 22 and Target to Chick-Fil-A and Dave & Busters. The distance is only 6 miles, but it always took forever and a day. You're looking at 45 minutes in perfect traffic conditions.\n\nAnother shopping option was the Southside Riverfront. It was a mere 3 mile ride and could be accessed by hopping on the 75 or 54. We rode it many times to visit H&M for cheap clothing and REI to get travel essentials (many students end up going abroad through their respective language programs). This area was also the place to be on weekends and has a number of eateries and dive bars.\n\nOne little known fact about SLI is that you are not saved by the bell. When class is over you are still a student of the linguistic arts and expected to practice as much as possible. This includes lunches with your professors and peers, dinner dates with other students, and cultural excursions. The American Serbian Club was considered the mecca of the language students, regardless of which language they were studying. It is also located in South Side, so the 75 or 54 will get you within blocks of its doorstep. Both run pretty frequently, all day and all night.\n\nBut my absolutely best memory of the Port Authority has to be my first day back in Pittsburgh in 2006. I had decided to skip staying in the dorms and opted to go even cheaper by renting an apartment nearby. I had just arrived and was getting to know my roommates. We went for a walk around campus and ended up somewhere just NW of the school. It started to downpour and as we were scurrying for cover, a little shuttle bus driver pulled over and offered us a ride. We asked him where he was headed and in perfect Pittsburghese he replied, \"Wherever yinz is a goin'.\"
The store is small, but it carries specialties that are difficult to find in Pittsburgh. I was particularly excited to find middle eastern chili sauce and chocolate covered Turkish delights.
Pastrami and cole slaw and fries, oh my! \nI'd heard about all the hype and this place lived up to it.\n\nTo have it all piled up into one sando is a midnighter's \"raid the fridge\" dream. A nice combo of pastrami & corned beef, a layer of good cole slaw and topped off with some golden fries makes for one tasty sandwich. Had it been after last call somewhere I'm sure a fried egg on top would have been thrown into the mix.\n\nCouple this with a 23 oz. beer for $2.50 and what more could you ask for. Actually only minus 1/2 star because of their chili, other than that, scarf up people.
JR H and I seemed to miss each other this weekend in Pitt. Always going to the same place yet not really.  Our little group, which inlcuded the parents(yeah i still get free food) went to the Market Square location. The location is nice. Market Square is a nice area. Brick inlaid street. Clsoe to 3 river point park and my hotel.\nThis restaurant is something one must do when in town. It was also on Food Network, and man times reviewed here at Yelp. The food is pretty good. Where else can you get a \"value meal\" between to slices of bread. The sandwiches for those just learning. Your choice of meat with some nice itailian deli selections, kolbassi(haven't seen that  on a menu i around SF), or fish, below a nice bed of fresh made and not too dripping wet coleslaw. Fries with that? Heck yes and they sit right on top.  All on a Itialian sliced bread. The have a daily beer special 24oz beer for about  $2.50. \nNow this place and the food is fun. The food gets better tasting as the hours get late on a night out. Think how great a bacon wrapped dog is after \"dancing\" the night away. You know that fun 3 step dance. Raise beer, tip glass, put back down. The kind of food and place you want to head when you cheat on your diet, watch some footbal and chat up with the locals.\nThe staff was very good. The food came quick. Best of all. It had no kick back later or the next day.
One night I was watching the Travel channel, they had a show called Top 10 Places to Pig Out.  Of course I paying attention and taking notes :)  When they mentioned Primanti's and Pittsburgh I was like Yes! I'm there!  I could not wait to get my hands on this giant sammich of all sammiches.  My only regret is that I couldn't get it with a Yeungling :( All the more reason to come back!  Ok, so I went here with my host and we decided to strategize.  I got the capicola ham with provolone and he got the steak and cheese.  We got two sammiches and two cokes for $16, what a deal! We were supposed to share but ended up downing our own sammiches. I forgot to ask if the coleslaw was sweet before I ordered so I was a little worried, not a fan of sweet coleslaw.  Luckily, it was great! \nHere's the nitty gritty.  The sandwich bread is two thick slices of soft, white italian bread.  They put at least half a pound of meat on it, plenty of cheese, tomatoes, and a fresh coleslaw (not the mayonaissey type that I was expecting).  It's more like a marinated shredded cabbage, the marinade is tangy and vinegary.  The piece de resistance is that the sandwich also contains a huge mound of fries right in the middle.  The fries taste fresh, reminiscent of boardwalk fries back in the day, only better.  At the table they had ketchup, mustard and apple cider vinegar!  Any one from MD would appreciate that ;-)  All I needed was Old Bay seasoning and it woulda been heaven.  Maybe next time I'll take that in my purse...ssshh! Needless to say I devoured this bad boy and desperately needed a nap afterwards.    I came. I saw. I ate.\n\np.s. You can get it topped with a fried egg! I didn't see that on the menu until I was leaving! doh! next time!
Dude. A meal on Mancini Bros. bread. Not much to say, except I'll have to book more trips to Pittsburgh to eat here again! Definitely a good way to gear up for or finish a night of drinking. The cooks were hilarious and only added to the post debauchery atmosphere. The fries and slaw on the sandwich are something I will absolutely have again. Go. Do it. If you can.
Update.  Went to a different location.  Non-smoking location.  Got pastrami this time instead of the bland sausage.  Added a fried egg to the sandwich as well.  I forgot how huge this thing was.  I could only eat half.  I am now a fan of Primanti's.
Stopped in here while passing through Pittsburgh without knowing anything about the city or this establishment. Like gnats, we were attracted to Primati because their neon sign was... pretty.... soooooo pretty!\n\nAnyway, stopped in here and order the Pittsburgh cheesesteak which was quite tasty. We also got the Cajun chicken sandwich with cheese... because everything there comes with cheese. Everything. Need salt? Even that has cheese on it. It's kinda awesome.\n\nAnyway, both sandwiches were quite tasty and with the fries on top... yummy.  Would definitely come back here next time I'm coming through Pittsburgh, hopefully for longer than a few hours.
This is my second dance with Primanti's.  The first was at the Pitt location, which has a better atmosphere in my humble opinion.  I had the #2 most requested sandwich, Cheesesteak.  I asked the waitress what was the most requested item and she said, \"You're drinking it honey.\" pointing to my Iron City pint.  Which was $2.95 by the way.  God bless the Burgh.  \n\nSo the sandwich is as I remember.  Huge, but if you squeeze you can get your mouth around it.  I realized my second time around that there's a reason they can keep prices low.  There's not a whole lot of meat in the sandwich.  It's dwarfed by the coleslaw and the fries.  I'd also pass on the cheesesteak next time.  It was a square beef patty which didn't seem right and there wasn't a lot of flavor.  Would get pastrami next time for sure.  \n\nSo the sandwich and decor of this location would rate 3 stars, but the concept of a restaurant that serves you an oversized sandwich with coleslaw and fries on it for  around 5 bucks rates 5, so it equals out to 4.  This sandwich and chain are one of the reasons I love the Burgh so much.
Everyone that comes to Pittsburgh must try Primanti Bros at least once. I have been there multiple times but this is my first review of the place. The sandwich is something to see and eat especially after a night of drinking. The original location is definitely the best especially for the people watching aspect. \n\nI chose the sandwich with bacon and cheese and it was definitely consistent with the other times I have been there, but I will say this after you have gone once you will never need to go back unless its late and you need something to soak up the alcohol.
There were French fries on my sandwich!\nThis is my first time in PA, so I wasnt sure what to expect when we were sent to Market Square for \"the greatest sandwich in the world!\"\n\nThe prices were dead on - about 6$ for a sandwich and 1.5$ for a tea.  I split a ham and cheese with my friend and we both left full.  I had the cole slaw (which was more like sauerkraut) and it was yummy.\n\nI am docking them a star because the service was less than desirable, even after the lunch rush ended.
an efficient way to eat - meat, cheese, fries and slaw! all the food groups in one delicious huge bite.
Based on what I've read on yelp, I tried the Pastrami.  The cole slaw, fries, meat, and the italian bread all came together in a really HUGE sandwhich that was really good for a few reasons.  Flavor, texture, quantity, and presentation.  Ordered a couple of Yuenglings to wash it all down...not bad.
yikes!! just make sure you don't go there during lunch. it's def a ton of food and sure cause for afternoon food coma. \n\nthe food itself was delish. never really thought of putting everything, including the sides, in a sandwich... but it works. def something to try if/when you're out there.
Primanti Bros sells sandwiches. Only, calling these sandwiches doesn't really do them justice. And I think there may have been salads and some other stuf fon the menu... but really, it's all about the almost famous sandwiches!!\n\nThe sandwiches come with fries and coleslaw (vinegar based not mayo based!!). No, not on the side, but on the sandwich. And as weird as it may sounds, it tastes really good that way! \n\nI didn't get anything to wild, just a turkey sandwich. The bread was fantastic, soft but still sturdy, and there was plenty of turkey. The fries could have been crispier, but they weren't limp and soggy so I can't complain too much there! My husband had a bowl of soup in addition to his sandwich and I stole a taste... Very flavorful! \n\nService is where a star is lost... We had to flag someone down to get my water refilled and my mother-in-law had to ask for tartar sauce for her fish sandwich twice. Our waiter was friendly and took decent care of us other then those 2 minor hiccups. \n\nI can definitely see why these sandwiches have the following that they do. I can see myself going back next time my travels take me to Pittsburgh.
Mmmmmm, so much deliciousness. Cole slaw and fries on top of food that will elicit a chorus \u00e0 la Handel's Messiah from any drunkard worth her salt. \n\nGlasses of beer that won't stop urging you to take a gander at their naked bottoms.  \n\nAll the goodness of tasty food that compels writers to make exclusive use of fragmented sentences.\n\nI wanted to have an orgy with all the Primanti Brothers as a token of my gratitude, but since I almost fainted due to claustrophobia in the narrow stairwell on my way to the pissah, I suppose a thank you will just need to suffice.
Fries were kind of bland and the coleslaw was just ok but the meat was very good. Overall, it's a tasty place with good prices
my friends at Pittsburgh said that it must a try! that was I went there! I had an steak sandwich, greasy but delicious and with the fries and slaw are on the sandwich! which was strange! It was not easy to eat it, but it was fun! apparently pitts folks really love fries :)
I have seen many food show on the Primati famous sandwich, so it was a must try while I was in Pittsburgh. I was not disappoint. I would come back the next time I am in Pittsburgh.
I am a foodie so when I travel, I must try foods that are famous in the city that I visit. So, Primati Bros is a must on my Pittsburgh trip. Well, I was not disappoint after eating their #2 almost famous pittsburger.  Next time, I will try the pastrami. My friend had the pastrami, and it looked tastier.
When I first moved to Pittsburgh 2 years ago, I visited the Strip District Primanti Brothers location several times before trying this location in Market Square. I was initially a little skeptical but highly recommend this location over the original!\n\nThe sandwiches are just as good, if not better, in Market Square and actually bigger. I attribute this to the mostly male staff here vs. female in the Strip District since they seem to make most of their sandwiches based on \"handfuls.\"\n\nI also enjoy the atmosphere at this location best. Yes, it's still a bit divey, but it's less diner and more bar than the Strip District Primanti. Overall, I recommend this restaurant as a great, inexpensive place to grab a sandwich and beer in Market Square.
Definitely a fan of all their sandwiches. Worth the drive from anywhere. And if you're a local and have never eaten here you don't know what you're missing. Definitely a lot of sandwich for the $.  A legendary Pittsburgh establishment through and through.
I loved my Pgh-style sandwich with cole slaw and fries in it. Wish I could have my sandwich like that everyday! The quality of the bread, and everything in general, was excellent. I would give this place 5 stars instead of 4, but the server was a little out-of-it and didn't get our order right in a couple ways.
Good beer and food was really good but the service was mediocre at best. But I love that I can here the game and not random music by Rihanna
How are there only 5 reviews?  As I understand it, it's a Pittsburgh institution, and who doesn't love french fries on top of a huge sandwich?\nThis particular location, right on Market Square, has great, picturesque dining (though the seat yourself policy is a little difficult, as it's hard to tell who's been waiting for a table and encourages you to hover over other diners to snag an elusive seat on a weekend night).  I loved my bologna sandwich, you can't beat the prices for a place that's loved by locals and demanded by tourists, and I'd be sure to stop back (at any location) when I'm back in the Steel City.
Good sandwiches as you expect, but a bit of a touristic atmosphere.  I'm a stickler for the original in the strip!
Nice menu and good service \nI recommend
This joint makes excellent sandwiches. \n\nI ordered the fish sandwich and it was delicious! First off, its huge, and cheap. They stuff the sandwiches with cole slaw and fries (yummy). \n\nYou really can't go wrong here. \n\nThe place is usually packed to the brim, so you need to get in early before it gets full, which it will. Once it gets busy, the service gets worse. \n\nIf you're in the area, its definitely worth a try.
I heard this place stacks fries and cole slaw onto your sandwich so I gotta try it. I ordered the drunk duck drink and it was fantastic. I got to keep the little rubber ducky on top of my drink too :)  As for the sandwich, I got the deluxe double egg and cheese.  The portion was HUGE and very messy!  More messy than boogers coming out from a runny nose.  The sandwich I got was really good and filling.  I would recommend this place for visitors from afar and who happens to be in the neighborhood.
My partner wanted to try a Pittsburgh cheesesteak sandwich and we read this was the best place to go. I don't like fries and I don't eat cheese, but I still loved my sandwich! I ordered the chicken sans cheese and fries, of course. The cole slaw was very good; I loved that it didn't have mayo in it and the flavor was great. Our waitress recommended that we try their hot sauce on the sandwiches and so glad we did because it really spiced it up and made the sandwich even better. My partner ordered the real deal and said it was delicious as well! We also ordered a \"small\" beer, which is a full 12 oz glass, pretty sweet deal. \n\nHighly recommend this place
I was pleasantly surprised!  I went in with low expectations after seeing the so-so reviews and hearing from people that it's not all it's cracked up to be.  Got the steak sandwich with everything on it.  I ate most of it and wasn't even that hungry to begin with.  Definitely needed salt/pepper and the hot sauce they had.  When you add potatoes to a sandwich it tends to make it taste bland unless you have a killer sauce.  The sandwich could feed most people for two meals and it's only $7..great value.  23 oz miller lite was only $4..also so cheap.  We enjoyed sitting at the bar and watching the head cook make quick work of 100+ sandwiches.  These people got the routine down pat.  I would definitely eat it again and appreciate the history of the place.
I go to Point Park so this Primanti's is a staple for me and my friends. We go here probably 4 or 5 times a semester - always in groups of at least 4 and often more. The food is so great it's hard to care about anything else. I usually get the capicola with an egg, or pastrami with an egg. I have realized recently that the service is getting worse and worse (last time I went there I wasn't able to get a refill on my drink because our server never even came by our table after he served our food). Also, I was super upset that you were completely out of malt vinegar for my sandwich. Other than that, it's always great.
I've eaten here several times.  Their pizza is good.  The only annoying thing is the small fountain drinks that come with the lunch specials (and no refills).  But the best thing, that brings me back time after time, is their chicken salad.  Its topped with crisp fries - Pittsburgh style - plus melted mozzarella cheese.  Divine.  Just a warning - don't make a mistake thinking the steak salad is just as good.  The steak has a musty taste.
Awesome tortillas, awesome salsa, pretty good selection of Latin American food products (mostly Mexican, but lots of S./Central American and Caribbean).  I'm spoiled from all the Hispanic grocery stores in Atlanta, but this is the best one I've found in the 'burgh.  Prices are average for the Strip and Pittsburgh, but a little high for a Hispanic grocery store.
I've been to the taco stand now!  Yaaaaaaaaaaay!  On our way out of town for the holidays, we needed a quick snackie and made a stop at Reyna's for taco deliciousness.  We got four - two chicken, chorizo, carrnitas.  YUM.  They were so fun to eat - messy, sitting in our car, hot sauce dripping down our fingers - who doesn't love street food?  Seriously, this is the only place I've laid eyes on in Pittsburgh that appears to sell tacos of this kind.  I kind of want to go back....like, now.\n\nOH BUT WAIT.  Stop.  the churros.  On a whim, I ordered some churros real quick, and watched the guy pour the batter into hot oil right before my very eyes.  They floated around, browning and sizzling, then he took them out and put them directly into cinnamon sugar, into a paper plate thing, and then into my hands.  They were the best churros ever.  Love at first bite.  Love just watching them sizzle! \n\nI think I want to try empanadas next time if I can tear myself away from the tacos.
Beans, glorious, beans! So many many beans. Great Northern, Black, Kidney, Pinto, Pink (pink?), etc. etc. and so forth.\n\nOk ok, Reyna's is more than beans. Lots of different types of dried chillies, prepared salsas, chorizos, frozen tamales, different types of soda pop and drinks that you won't find in a regular grocers. \n\nI haven't tried the taco stand yet but the coup de grace of the grocers itself though is the fresh tortillas, both corn and flour. Delicious! (And beans).
Good: Mexican groceries in Pittsburgh\nBetter: The chipotle tomatillo salsa, homemade by Edgar.\nBest. The taco stand.  Seriously, if you're here, get a damn taco.
Reyna's Food saved my life!!!\n\nOk, not really.  As a recent transplant from Colorado (having been born and raised in New Mexico) I was really homesick for some actual Mexican food, which you can not get at any restaurant out here.  \n\nI was so excited when I saw the sign outside that advertised actual Hatch Green Chile (it's chile - not chili, people!).  It was pricey - but that's to be expected.  It was also very tasty.\n\nI was impressed by the wide selection of Latino Foods, and while their tortillas aren't what I'm used to, they are quite good.  I'll be going back again and again!
Very good Mexican place! I got the enchiladas verdes which were a little too spicy for me but very good. My boyfriend got a steak quesadilla which was AMAZING! I wish I ordered it. Friendly staff and comfortable setting!\n\nBeen here twice... The second time I ordered the guacamole which they made fresh in front of u! We loved it and will order it again.
I went here for the first time on Saturday night. I had to go & try the famous Giant Fish Sandwich! When it arrived, I was impressed. The fish was even bigger than I expected & the batter was perfect. Also, the beer menu is lengthy! They serve beers from almost every corner of the world! I thought about trying something new, but turns out I was homesick for a good old Pennsylvania beer... :) Roland's is definitely a cool place in my book. I'll be back! :P
We spent a few hours here on the day of the St. Patrick's Day parade, and had a great time.  The space is pretty large, with indoor and outdoor seating.  They have something like 500 beers; a major plus! We sat upstairs, and because the kegs are kept in the basement, they can't get beer all the way up there.  That means you have to order bottled beer from the waitress but can go downstairs and order draft beers.  That's sort of weird.  Anywho-- I had a caesar salad and french onion soup.  Both were tasty, and the other people in my party liked their food too-- pizza and burgers.  The waitress was super friendly.  I'd like to go back and enjoy their upstairs patio & a lobster roll!
Not as good as Wholeys but awesome patio and the best service. Go here for the atmosphere, the staff is the best.
If you're a coffee drinker, this is the spot for you. I believe in freedom of choice, and i'll defend with my life your right to choose. But if you're going to drink coffee, drink coffee, not the flavored foo-foo stuff.\n\nMy first visit here was before Yelp was just a glint in it's founder's father's eye. And i listened as an old man (The founder?) was telling me about the old days, and how many men died when coffee roasters would catch fire and explode. Not sure how true those stories were, but hey, he was an old man, and I was fresh out of college. Like most college students my common sense eventually came back, but that's another story.\n\nWell he took me back and showed me the raw beans, and how they roasted them. It was very interesting. Then he made me a cup of coffee with bean just out of the roaster, slightly cooled, he ground them in front of me, then put them in a french press and let it steep for 4 minutes. Damn, that was the best cup of Joe I ever had. So the very next day I bought a french press, went back to Nicholas Coffee, and bought a pound of espresso roast and I've been hooked every since.\n\nThere are many places to get coffee in this city, but this place is the tops on my list!
Great coffee and Tea selection.  Good prices for latte's, cappuccino, ect...
This hidden gem, tucked away in the corner of Market Square in downtown Pittsburgh, offers more than just coffee.  Sure, it's easy to be lazy and unadventurous and go to Dunkin Donuts or Starbucks, but why not take a chance and support a Pittsburgh staple since the 1800s?  They must be doing something right to stay around that long.  They also roast their beans in-house...in Market Square.  Amazing.\n\nNicholas Coffee Co. has a unique ambiance.  I'd say it's vintage bookstore chic, but your opinion and description may differ.  With a HUGE selection of coffee, fresh baked goods from local vendors,  friendly staff, and a humidor for the casual cigar aficionado, there's a little something for everyone.  \n\nThe coffee by the cup is very reasonably priced, and you can buy coffee in bulk, or buy a few sample packs to find your favorite brew before buying by the pound.
I have eaten at Salonikas on 6th St. over a dozen times over the past three years.  I would eat here more often if it was more convenient.  To me, the gyro here is the best in Pittsburgh.  Better than ANY other.  Until someone can point me at a Gyro place that makes them like they do in some of the larger cities in the U.S., or like in Greece or Turkey, where they hand make the meat on a spit, it is lamb sliced thin, and placed in layers on a skewer, then slow roasted, and sliced and served while you watch, then Salonikas will remain the best.  \n\nSeriously, every single Gyro place around here just buys that big round slab of processed meat, and puts it on a spinner. Folks that say \"Oh it is seasoned so perfectly at XXXX\" are nuts.  No place around here makes their own lamb gyro meat. If you know of one, put it down, I want to go there.\n\nI like Salonikas because I like the pita, it is nice and thick and chewy, and they fry it on the flat top.  Places that don't heat the pita (like that place on the Strip that sells Gyros for $5 and he don't even heat the pita?!?!) They STINK!  \n\nI like the tszaziki (however you spell it).  It is nice and thick and well seasoned.  It does not go running down your arm when you take a big honking bite of your gyro.  \n\nI like the meat, it is seasoned so perfectly!  (!?!?!) Actually, they cook it long enough to make it a bit crusty, and they slice it nice and thin.  And they put on a LOT of it.  \n\nAnd all the veg is just right.  I wish they used hotter onions, but oh well.\n\nAnd best of all, they have a bar, that is VERY fairly priced.  Especially considering it is located so near the theatre district.  I also absolutely like all the other stuff they have, the spanakopata, and the moussaka, and the grape leaves.  Pretty much anything they sell.\n\nAnd keep this in mind, this place is inexpensive.  I mean seriously, the negative reviews this place gets all seem to say \"the prices are cheap, and tastes it\".  Well, bull.  The food is inexpensive, and what you get for what they charge, is way above what you expect.  Like, instead of ground lamb in some dishes, you get ground beef.  Still tastes good to me.  Not as great as it would be with ground lamb, but it keeps the price down, and it still tastes good.\n\nMy favorite time to eat here?  New Years eve, or Pittsburgh Light Up Night.  I have been here every one of those the past three years, they are packed, you get to have a gyro and a beer.  It is just a nice fun time.  And considering how busy they are, the staff are all way happier that at some of those pinky-in-the-air joiunts in the theatre district.\n\nOh, and the customers are all friendly.  Nice mix of blue collar and cops and folks getting a bite before or after some event in the cultural district.  I REALLLY like this place.  \n\nNow, next reviewer who throws down some ignorant review about how some other gyro is better, first, is it a REAL gyro, made with REAL thin sliced lamb, slow cooked on a spit and sliced off fresh and juicy, then PLEASE put the name of the place in your review.  I have tried EVERY gyro spot in the city, and quite a few outside it.  And I am STILL looking for a REAL gyro made like that.  Until then, this place is the best for me.
I like Salonika's.  I've been here a few times over the last couple months, and the food is consistently good.\n\nSome of the winning dishes are the baked chicken, chicken gyros, and definitely the lemon potatoes.  The salmon in pastry shell is also very good.\n\nThe staff is rushed but efficient.  Given how busy they can be, they get you in and out.\n\nEven when other lunch places are empty, you'll still find a restaurant full at Salonika's.  Part of it is the prices, which are reasonable. Part of it is that the food is mostly ready to serve, so it's fast.\n\nBut overall, the quality of the food is what keeps bringing me back, anyways.
Went here before the regatta yesterday, was my third time here...consistently great, best gyros around!! Thanks.
Great food, fast service and the price is right. Perfect stop for a quick lunch in the downtown area.
3.5 Stars\n\nChristos is a sort of charmingly run-down sort of place, particularly given that many of the other offerings in the Cultural District are pretty new joints.  The food is better than average.  Having just eaten at DC's supposedly cheapest and best Greek restaurant the week I was in Pittsburgh, I found the food to be more authentic, better seasoned, fresher and definitely cheaper.\n\nWe had a group of 10 on a Sunday night.  The restaurant owner/manager/old Greek guy came out onto the sidewalk as we were walking by and practically begged us to come in.\n\nI had a grilled fish dish that was nicely cooked along with a glass of the house red wine.  At the end of our meals we decided we had to try the famous \"Jackie O cake,\" which was, sad to say, nothing particularly special.\n\nBest of all, we had no problems splitting the check multiple ways when it came time to leave.
Went tonight for $4.99 rollback Wednesdays. Not very many people at around 9p, so service was really excellent.\n\nI only ordered the $4.99 spaghetti with meat sauce which comes with salad and bread. Even ignoring the price, I really enjoyed the whole meal from start to finish. I suspect true Italian aficionados will be upset that the pasta is cooked through, but it really reminded me of home growing up in the Midwest.
If you are in the mood for Italian, give it a try. They have a dinner for two that includes all the favorites...sausage, meatballs, lasagna, chicken Parmesan, spaghetti, and cheese ravioli. The prices are right. This is a great family restaurant.  The kids are given a wooden nickle to turn in at the front desk for a candy stick, and  Wednesday nights they have a balloonist and magician.
I liked the food here. We got the $25 deal. Salad was good but a little dressing heavy, stuffed mushroom appetizer was simple but very good and the 15 layer lasagne was very rich and hearty. The hostess was a ditz. He seated a couple before us that we arrived before and then seated us at a table that was inconvenient with a post, cutting off part of our party. We asked to move and she just moved the table. The kicker was the place was empty!
I just can't help but love Spaghetti Warehouse! So many memories at this restaurant, not to mention the vintage decor is so nostalgic! There is a train (complete with vintage ads and posters!) in the left portion of the restaurant that patrons can have dinner in, which is an absolutely amazing experience! The food is always pretty good and there are deals for certain days of the week that your wallet will thank you for. And let's not forgot to mention the mouth watering sourdough bread and garlic butter! It is so amazing and addictive! The wedding soup is phenomenal! Though, I most recently ordered steak and vegetables, and the presentation was thrown together and unappetizing. There were two small pieces of random steak on my plate, as though they were leftovers. The waiter was odd and rude. He asked if the birthday dessert was on my boyfriend's dad in front of the whole dinner party. Usually, most restaurants will give you a little something for your birthday, or at least be a little less blunt about the cost of the dessert. I wouldn't recommend sitting by the door that the staff comes out of either. It's really loud and they will have full conversations right by your table. Other than those two experiences, I've had a great overall experience at Spaghetti Warehouse and would recommend it to others!
There is nothing really to complain about here.  This Mortons is like most in other cities.  It's definitely for the expense account crowd.  It's fun to go to a place and to know exactly what you are in for.  I've been to Mortons all over the country and this one stacks up pretty well.  It's like most other high end chain steakhouses (Palm, Ruth's, Capital Grille, etc.).  The bar is pretty lame, but I'm guessing most go here for a sit down dinner.  Capital Grille or Hyde Park bar is much better for bar scene.  But, one thing I definitely appreciate about the bar is  the bar menu.  If you've never been to Mortons and you are watching your budget go to the bar have a cold beer and order the PRIME cheeseburger trio or the Filet sandwiches for only 6 DOLLARS.  Plus, the fries are awesome.  The dining room is really nice with dark wood and lots of leather.  The service is awesome because I'm guessing you have to be pretty good to land a server position that might end up paying you 6 figures.  The food is great.  However, my opinion is that most true high end steakhouses all have similiar quality steak.  I eat here a few times a year and my favorite first courses are the lobster bisque (Very good, but not as good as capital grille) and the tuna tartare.  Stay away from the filet.  I mean it's tender and delicious, but try a steak with a little flavor.  I'm guessing if you're like me you don't go to Mortons often, so try something that  is hard to get elsewhere.  Get the Cajun ribeye.  I can't remember if Pittsburgh location does a bone in ribeye, but if they do I would say a cajun bone in ribeye will be one of the best if not the best steaks you ever try.  I also suggest getting the \"lazy\" lobster.  There are few things in life more indulgent or enjoyable than having a two pound lobster cooked perfectly already cracked for you.  It's pure indulgence.  The asparagus is great and as big as a baseball bat.  The spinach is great and the hash browns are a must have.  You should definitely save room for desert and there is no better desert here than the chocolate souffle'.  Remember to tell them that is what you want for desert when you order your entrees.  I wish the bar was better, because if it was I'd go here more often.  This place is exactly what you would expect.  And, that's a good thing.
Unbelievable! We were in town for weekend and looked up the reviews in yelp for a nearby steakhouse. Service was top notch, wine list extensive and above all an excellent meal. Would definitely recommend it for a special occasion and great meal out.
This review is for the Sam Bok food stand.  I found a review (kind of) for it but I feel as though it's good enough to have its own review.  PLUS, my gal from China Express (now closed, was downtown) cooks there, so I had to make it happen.\n\nThis place is simple.  It has chicken on a stick, mung bean pancakes, & I think some sort of spring roll.  The only thing I've ever tried is the chicken on a stick, and really, it's all I need.  these little thingers are delicious, and they're only $3.  \n\nThey have two different sauces to dump on it, and I get it with both; one is some sort of Korean BBQ sauce & the other is just Sriracha.  Then it's wrapped in foil, and handed off.  Make sure you get extra napkins, as they're messy.  Any time I run to the strip to get a few staples, I inevitably swing through and get a chicken on a stick.  You should too...you won't regret it.
I was first introduced to Korean food my freshman year in college. It was a match made in kimchi heaven. This love affair has now extended to the Korean culture and language. Sam Bok is the perfect venue to get anything Korean cuisine related and has some wonderful Ahjummas (ladies) who will let you try out you newly mastered though limited skills at speaking Korean. \n\nI love making my own kimchi chigae - not proficient enough to make my own kimchi though. Sam Bok sells really good cabbage and radish kimchi that you can pick up anytime. It's available in several sizes. I also like their black bean sauce, yam noodle packets, spices and spicy ramyun packets (Asian ramen that will blow your socks off). I recently picked up a couple of bread rolls with cream filling which is a Korean delicacy that satisfies your sweet and savory cravings. Sam Bok's bread was wonderful, I will definitely go back for more of those. \n\nI suggest giving Sam Bok a shot, it's unique, local and always inviting.
I come here for chicken on a stick & mung bean pancakes every time I am in the Strip District. I don't know what else to say about it besides that it's awesome--everything is prepared quickly and the little Korean woman who I always see working the stand is very pleasant. I always recommend the food here to everyone I know whenever they say they're going to the Strip. It's cheap and delicious. This would be a five star rating if I wasn't considering the grocery store, but this place IS indeed a grocery store and not just a street vendor (unfortunately). \nThe grocery store is very poorly organized, things are dusty, and many of the things don't have expiration dates. That's actually pretty typical of imported Asian food, but I was really skeptical about buying anything from the grocery store because no one really shops here (there are better competitors down the street, like Lotus Food Co) and that means that the food remained on the shelf for who knows how long. The first time my friend and I came here, she purchased a pack of mango mochi ice cream and found that it had freezer burn and smelled a bit off as well. The store manager/owner kindly refunded the purchase, which was nice, but I would still never buy anything. Also, compared to Lotus Food Co, some of the items in this store are more expensive. The mochi ice cream was definitely more expensive--I can't remember exactly how much, but after we realized that we bought a bad item, we went to Lotus Food Co and bought a box of mochi ice cream that was perfectly fine, delicious, and less expensive.
I really like this Saks. It's close to my job so I am in there all the time! \n\nAntoine takes care of me with my clothing purchases every time I am there. Tom is my guy for Bond no.9. He sends out postcards telling me about new Bond fragrances and in store Bond events all the time. He always is hooking me up with a free sample when I come in! Reshonda is my girl for all other fragrances. If I want to try something and they don't have a sample she will make me one right on the spot! Now that's service! \n\nI would give the store a 5 put the interior SUCKS! It is too small and needs a major updating. It looks like Kaufmann's, Gimbel's or Horne's from back in the 80's. The fragrance counter is too small. The men's section is down in the basement and only half of the floor is men's. The rest is house ware. The majority of the men's section is suits. Can we get some Gucci or Prada clothing not just shoes? They really need to expand or move across the street to the old Lord & Taylor building!
Fair well old friend. You will be greatly missed. After being in downtown Pittsburgh for 60 years, Saks Fifth Avenue is now closed. :(
Great pricing on food! A hoagie, fries, & drink is $6 & some change. They have different daily specials for each day of the week. Monday= 6in meatball... wed =I love the buffalo chicken horead agie and chicken parm hoagie. Their calzones look good. I often order a cash fry (chicken, fries and melted mozzarella cheese. You can add veggies for a small price) Also, if they seem full downstairs, the entire 2nd floor is seating. No worries!
You just gotta have a Peppi's hoagie...especially on your way to a Steelers game.  The guy stands under the bridge near Reedsdale shouting, \"Peppi's.....hoagies....\"  They are damn good.  Talk it into the stadium and enjoy :)
I have eaten at the one on the Strip, and the one on the North Shore across from Nicky's Thai.  Both are great.  All I ever get is the steak with American cheese with onions and mushrooms.  They ask if you want tomatoes mayo and lettuce.  Have no idea why, that stuff should never be on a cheese steak sandwhich.\n\nAnyways, much better than Primanti's for a cheese steak.  primanti's you go to if you want say a steak hoagie (which is not steak but actually one of those rectangular seasoned beef patties on a hoagies roll.  Get that at Primantis with a fried egg, and fries and slaw, and you got a good sammy).\n\nFor a cheese steak, this is the only place in Pittsburgh to go.  Peppi's.
Overall, a friendly and fast environment. Great music always playing on the speakers during the lunch rush hours, marked by good service/communication by the employees to customers. Fantastic food at all four locations; is a great place to walk down to on your lunch break/late afternoon hunger. Reasonably priced food, with a 'chill' atmosphere.
Peppi's rocks! Why do I say that you ask? Let me explain.. \n\nI was walking down Smithfield during my Friday lunch, which is later than my lunch during the rest of the week & I'm realllllly hungry!  I head down to Peppi's after hearing so many people rave about it.\n\n While walking into Peppi's I think I took a step back in time because every worker is literally jamming to \"Funky Town\" & I'm at a dive sandwich shop. All of the workers were extremely friendly & happy (what's your secret?! I need to know!) \n\nThe cheese steak was delish & I'm pretty excited that I can get grilled onions without an awkward up charge. A cheese steak, fresh cut fries & a drink comes to $8.. extremely reasonable. I ended up only eating half of the hoagie & enjoyed the rest later in the day. \n\nThe staff were chatting & joking with me again as I was leaving. I must say for a lunch by myself I laughed a great deal during that hour. I'll be back!
A good spot for a cappuccino on a Sunday morning. Expect a good crowd and enjoy sitting outside at their wrought iron chairs and tables watching the Strip activity.
Wonderful selection of _Real_ espresso drinks; espressos, machiatos, cappucinos etc. Awesome La Cimbali machine, friendly staff. No frills standing tables to drink your espresso the way it's done in Italy. Highly recommended!!!
Best latte and cappucino's! ... Although the one from last Tuesday was a bit eh. I grab a couple bags of Paulie's Blend every time I'm back in town for my friends in Houston and they always love it.
Surprisingly authentic and inexpensive Italian coffee shop in a downtown area. I heard actual Italian spoken here with a news channel from the motherland on the TV. The place was packed on a Saturday afternoon and appeared to satisfy everyone who stood inside. My espresso was just as good as those I had in Europe. Hats off to La Prima!
I happened upon this place for an elite event.  Would I go back...yes!   Would I be glad that I now know these little tidbits...yes!\n\n-  They serve food before the event...all of it looked good and the prices were pretty average.  \n-  They serve drinks at the bar out front and also provide table service; BUT when the show starts, the table service stops.   So if you want to drink later in the show, you need to plan ahead or get up and go to the bar.    \n-  Some of the seats are tables and some are rows.   The tables are pretty nice.   I liked the raised platform area, but those chairs lacked arms that the ones on the floor had.   I think I'd go with the raised bar tables on each side next time.   \n-  They bring around the checks after the show.  If you don't want to wait forever, ask for the check early (before the show) or bring cash.  \n\nFour stars instead of five because the will call staff was really rude.   I won free tickets (plural) or so I thought.   When I went to will call, there was only one ticket.   I asked about it, but she was super unhelpful.   I ended up having to buy another ticket, which was at a different table, because she wouldn't move my comped ticket.   Lesson of the day...skip the will call window.
Excellent casual business lunches - salads, sandwiches - always freshly prepared and consistent quality.  Family owned.
I've never had a bad meal here. I usually come for lunch, whether it be a quick  bite or a more relaxing meal. They also have breakfast if you want a tastier egg, meat and cheese sandwich than your typical Dunkin or McDonalds excuse of a breakfast.  \n\nThe food comes out very quick out of respect for your time. It is most popular during the workday lunch rush. I would say that they are most famous for their salads and sandwiches. They are unique Italian/Greek creations with either feta or or red peppers on everything. I particularly love their pasta de la Sandra, which is a penne pasta with mushrooms, sausage & peppers in a balsamic blend. Yumm! The Italian soup and the turkey feta, hummus, pepper sandwich with risotto, are also among my favorites! \n\nSo go to Buon Giorno Cafe on your next lunch break to enjoy great service, a fresh meal, and at a very good price!
This store is a foodie find!  They stock lovely Asian veggies, sauces, meats, and desserts.  I mainly come here for garlic, ginger, and bok choy.  I heard they have some very good frozen dumplings though.  And they sell steaming hot fresh tofu for $0.30 a block, YES $0.30!!  Everything here is priced very reasonably.  \n\nThis is a great place to shop, but don't expect too much help from the staff.  Most things are not labeled in English, and the majority of the staff doesn't speak English, but hey that's half the fun!  You'll never know what gem you'll find.
Lotus Food is still my go to for cheap vegetables, tofu and Asian ingredients however the workers aren't the friendliest - don't take it personal. I went to a register, said hi to the woman and she gave me a glazed over look, not scanning anything which confused me. Behind me comes another customer who apologies and tells me he forgot some items. I told him that I was sorry too as I was not aware that he was still being checked out and he replies \"You wouldn't have known\" with a smile. And even through my transaction I continued to receive a glazed over look.
I go to Lotus foods for the fresh chow mein noodles and the selection of Japanese pop.
Put some time into learning how to shop this store and you will be greatly rewarded.  Excellent values all over the place, and things you can't find anywhere else.  I especially like the produce department.  \n\nLotus is one of only 4 stores I always have to shop when I visit the strip.
This is a great Asian food store and they have a lot of fresh vegatables.
This is our stop right after Stan's Market for all the other \"uncommon\" fresh produce. They offer a wide variety of fresh produce including some that are unfamiliar to most Pittsburghers. Besides produce,  they sell all sorts of asian packaged foods and goods.\n\nOur bi-monthly visit here is mostly for the super cheap fresh produce and tofu. Our list of Vegetables usually include the Mustard Green, few different types of bok-choy and spinach along with some herbs like cilantro, mint , basil etc. Like Stan's the vegetables here are super cheap and fresh but unlike Stan's you don't really need to double check them :) since they're usually very fresh and of good quality.\n\nIf you're not an avid cook - you might want to try some of the wide varieties of Ramen and packaged food this place has to offer.
This is a tiny place tucked into some snazzy downtown complex. Its cheap for downtown, and the portions are generous, so I suggest getting only the smaller sizes.\n\nI had a rice and beans burrito, and they let you take one of their hot sauces to the table. I asked for something really hot, and I actually got it. This is surprising for Pittsburgh, because I've noticed overall the town is weak on spice (even the Thai restaurants). \n\nAnyway, the beans in the burrito were fresh and cooked perfectly, and the rice was also plump and lightly spiced. The place is tiny and clean, and I got in and out for under five dollars for lunch.   \n\nThis place is really a gem--its cash only though, so bring that with you.  Good find. A lot better than some of the other places higher up on the list.
It has been a while since this place has been reviewed.  I'm happy to report the service isn't as ornery as some of the people experience in the past, so YAY for improvement.  I eat here a couple times each month since they have their Gas Crisis lunch menu entries.\n\nTheir sandwhiches always have fresh ingredients, and healthy portions of meat & cheeses in them.  The fries always come hot and not soggy, although sometimes I'm not a fan of their thicker cut selection for the fries.  I'm a shoestring width fry all the way kind of guy.\n\nTen bucks (tip included) got me a grilled cheese with bacon, double order of fries, and a drink.  I was in and out in 35 minutes (which was nice since I wanted to go for a walk) and the service was decent.  They aren't rude or dismissive but they're also not going out of their way to sprinkle petals as you walk about the premises.\n\nFor a quick decent meal at a good price, this place is certainly an option.
It's been a crazy week in my office, what with it being the end of our fiscal year and all.  So I just had to get me out and have me some good old comfort food for lunch today.  Alone!\n\nSo I had me a good ol' fashioned cheeseburger and fries with some coleslaw.  It really hit the spot so I'm upping my rating to four stars.
The Adventures of Susan the Zombie on a Monday-After-Holiday morning.\n\nSusan get up.\nSusan get showered.\nSusan get dressed.\nSusan grab purse, briefcase, and coat.\nSusan get out of house.\nSusan get on bus.\nSusan get off bus.\nSusan go to Cool Beans.\nSusan buy black coffee.\nSusan go to office building.\nSusan get on elevator.\nSusan go into her office.\nSusan ingest heavenly coffee from Cool Beans.\nSusan human female again!
fish is about as fresh as you will find in Pittbsurgh. Andy makes waiting in line a joy. Very generous portion sizes, and unbelievable value (2 large pieces of toro for $5 is unheard of! Not to mention I was given a third 1 at no additional cost)\n\nThe presentation itself leaves something to be desired, not the most skilled with a knife, but the guy has to pump them out fast enough to keep the line moving. - and lets be honest, you're not going to a stand in wholeys for presentation.\nHis special sauce is tasty, some sort of sirracha-esq conccoction, but make sure you make note of it if you don't want this on your fish.\nUses a bit too much rice for my liking on the nigiri pieces, I think he could use about half as much. Though I understand he is located next to a primantis, and this is pittsburgh.\n\nFantastic value, great guy. Will return.\n\noh, and I really mean he's a great guy beyond the generosity with the fish. Today he temporarily stopped service to help a little girl find her mother.
It's really not clear what to rate for this one.  Andy or his Sushi.  Both have flair, flavor and personality!  I swear he remembers everyone, but even if he doesn't it doesn't matter because he makes you feel like you've been sushi besties forever!\n\nI love going to his stand in Wholey's where he'll just randomly hand me a sample roll.  And the rolls he makes are MAMMOTH!  I don't know about everyone else, but I can wolf down my fair share of sushi and it's really hard to finish a full 2 rolls from him.  \n\nThe menu is pretty standard but I'm sure he could whip up any kind of specialty roll you'd like.  Plus, it's all reasonably priced.  It's just great to have this stand in the middle of the fish market to grab some quick sushi from a very friendly face!
Andy the Sushi Guy.  \nFast, entertaining, friendly and did I say fast?  No worries about standing in line and taking a few minutes of your busy day to watch Andy work his magic.  After all, it's not often one can find a fresh fish market with the freshest sushi ingredients. And you can bet Andy the Sushi Guy won't skimp on ingredients.  \nWe stopped by on Saturday about lunchtime when Wholey's is packed with its Saturday shoppers, which is it's usual crowded busy-ness.  Andy's Special for the day:  Tuna & Kiwi  or  Salmon & Avocado FAT Rolls.  Yes, the special of the day is usually a FUTO maki extraordinaire.  \nWe ordered the Tuna & Kiwi and Andy's Sushi Combo.  \nTuna & Kiwi began with crispy dried nori (seaweed) topped with an ample amount of fluffy sushi rice.  Smeared on is Tobiko (flying fish eggs) with its bright orange color. Just as you're admiring his steadfastness, POP goes the rice ladened seaweed as  Andy flips the seaweed to create a reverse sushi roll.  Folks, I'd have to disagree with another Yelper when they say that nori goes on the outside. What's not to like about creativity? And personally, what's not to like about more ingredients that you can stick on the outside of a sushi roll?  Like Tobiko or sesame seeds? hhmm...???? \nContinuing with the innerds of the Tuna & Kiwi roll, more Tobiko, asparagus, seared tuna with a light breading, red leafed lettuce, fresh tuna and kiwi...a la Andy's Special of the day.  Roll up all of these and keeping it in tact so when the slicing begins, all of the innerds remain in tact. Whoosh!  Did you see how he picked up the whole futomaki (fat roll) and placed it in the clear togo container, fan it out, add an ample handful of shyoga (thinly sliced pickled ginger) and a hunk of wasabi (no explanation needed) with soy sauce in a mini condiment cup. Sushi a la Andy the Sushi Guy at Wholey's~~It's what's for dinner!\nIf Andy didn't cut the roll, it would take two hands to pick it up and eat it like a ginormous fat burrito, kinda like you'd get in one of them hole in the wall Tex-Mex joints down close to the border (the US Border, that is).  But it is cut into yummy 8 slices and is done quickly without smushing down the circular form. Instead, admire the sliced sushi serving as you lay it flat and be amazed at the color and textures of the ingredients. Not only does it have fresh fish, but some veggies to add to your daily vitamin intake.  \nThe only 'drawback' and I think that is what some of the sushi connoisseurs are quick to point out, is that the sushi rice is not seasoned.  Yes, folks, traditional sushi rice is seasoned with a slight glaze and a very subtle sweetness.  Now, if Andy seasoned the sushi rice as sushi rice should be seasoned, then I'd have to give the guy at least a 4.5 star rating (fresh ingredients, ample servings, creativity, appearance or presentation and seasoned sushi rice on top of all of that). \nI think I'm going to have to defend Sushi a la Andy against the folks looking for 'traditional sushi' in a sit down sushi bar.  You ain't gonna find it here.  And if that's the limit on your sushi palate, then you're certainly coming to the wrong place!  For if you're looking for fast, fresh and ample, this is it.  The bonus:  Andy treats you with friendly hospitality and part of the Wholey's family.
I love this guy!!! I come every Sat. morn , tell him the ingredients I want for the day and I come back from shopping with a great lunch waiting for me. I am never disappointed.
Eating at Andy's Sushi Bar was always an experience.  Probably the worst part is the long line, but in a way that is good because I always felt that sushi was very fresh with lots of turnover.  The prices are excellent and Andy is hysterical.  I wish I could eat here more.
Sushi Kim is one of those Korean restaurants you'll find in most N. American cities that don't have a really big Korean population. They tend to diversify into sushi as well as Korean food, which is probably a good move considering the American palate and their general unawareness of Korean cuisine outside of the major Korean enclaves. It's pretty obvious by their name, they aren't trying to hide the fact they are Korean.\n\nI've been there for both Korean BBQ on the second floor and Korean food on the main floor.  I wouldn't trek all the way from CMU to have sushi there since sushi can be more easily had, but definitely for the Korean food. Some would disagree, but I have friends from Seoul who even think Sushi Kim has the best Korean food in Pittsburgh.(Granted we are speaking for Pittsburgh) It is pricier than Korea Garden, but the atmosphere is slightly more \"upscale.\"\n\nThey also have at least 3 brands of soju(Charm, Cheoeum cheo reom, and  Jinro Chamisul), which for Pittsburgh is quite exceptional even though I would only drink the Chamisul. They also have Korean noraebang, which you have to reserve in advance. However they only have Korean songs, so if you can't read Korean you're out of luck. They charge $30/hour. I'm not sure there is any other Korean noraebang in the city. I didn't try it, so I can't say what kind of selection they have for songs.\n\nThe BBQ is a great deal and though not the best I've ever had. It may be the only Korean BBQ grill place in the city. The staff is quite attentive and is pretty good about replacing the grills. I would prefer a different sahm-jang and more variety in the non-BBQ items in the buffet. The BBQ is great for groups and seats 4 people for each grill.
I'm visiting Pittsburgh and I found this place online with several good reviews. It's a small family owned restaurant and had a very friendly staff. I found that there was a small number of specialty rolls that have a variety of ingredients and sauces, which commonly are much larger rolls. These tend to be my favorite, so I was disappointed. The rolls that were more simple had large pieces of fish and were quite delicious. Overall a great place for sushi.
good Korean food, killer miso and seaweed salad - we'll be back.
One of my favorites in the Burgh for almost 20 years.
I cringed when I saw that their BBQ buffet price went up to $24/person, considering that I can go to a seafood buffet 10 minutes away for much less. Sushi Kim is a clean and bright place with seats on all two floors. The Korean BBQ buffet is on the second floor and only available on Friday and Saturday evenings starting at 5pm. \n\nThe service was wonderful and the servers really helpful. The Korean BBQ is buffet style, so you help yourself to the raw proteins and vegetables at the buffet bars and then cook them on your hot plate at your table. It's a really fun and interactive eating experience. There weren't that many choices for proteins, but the choices that were available were all delicious. Protein choices ranged from mussels and shrimps to pork, chicken and beef. My favorite was the bulgogi beef. \n\nThere were a few things I disliked about the Korean BBQ at Sushi Kim though. First off, they offered no butter or oil for the BBQ. I understand that they are trying to keep things healthy and all, but without any grease, the food was easily burnt. Butter or oil should always be an available option. Secondly, I did not like the design of their hot plates--the interior cooking area was way too tiny so it took forever to cook the food. And finally, they need to add a DESSERT BAR. After eating all that grilled food, I craved something sweet and refreshing. But, Sushi Kim left me hanging. Sushi Kim is already charging a whopping $24 per person--it would be nice if they throw in a dessert bar to sweeten up the deal (pun intended). \n\nOverall, I'm very thankful there is a Korean BBQ place in Pittsburgh. For being the only Korean BBQ buffet place in the area, it deserves a standing ovation. I had a great time at Sushi Kim and would gladly recommend the Korean BBQ buffet special. Buffet price was a bit high though, so crack open that piggy bank!
SeasonTicketHolder:  Like too many other undiscovered, underrated cultural treasures, the Public Theater makes for a wonderful night downtown.  (I guess I am writing a review to encourage others to \"Come On!  Give it a try!  You might like it!\").  The theater itself is the perfect size and the stage can allow for an up close and personal experience when you almost touch the actors to a balcony seat which offers some distance (but not too much!).  I started coming to the theater after seeing \"The Secret Letters of Jackie & Marilyn\" and then bought in 2008 starting buying season tickets.  The selected productions range from slightly high-brow to fun, light-hearted one woman/man shows.  Also there are \"TGIF\" Live Music nights, Wine Wednesdays, Saturday Brunches, and Sunday Post-Performance Discussions.    Ted Pappas does an excellent job!!
I can't remember the last time I was here before I saw a show last week as part of the Mix at Six series that the PPT hosts.  It's a young professionals event that serves light appetizers and drinks prior to the show.  Networking starts at 6 pm and the show starts at 8 pm. \n\nAs for the venue, it was a great space and stadium seating ensures that all seats can see the stage below - which is a huge plus for me since I'm short!\n\nI almost forgot how much I enjoy plays and I hope to see shows here more often!  Don't delay as I did and check out a show here sooner rather than later.
Had a very pleasant lunch here on a Sunday. Not busy, service fine, food fine. Nice setting. Great for a nice relaxed time.
Completely chill environment. I pretty much always get the chicken quesadilla which is awesome, so I really can't comment on anything else. The prices are good and the service is quick.
A Pittsburgh restaurant that opens \"for the season.\"  I went to Redfin Blues with a family member recently, as she recently moved to Pittsburgh's North Shore.  This establishment is not new, but definitely picks up in business when the weather is nice.\n\nRedfin Blues was packed around 7 PM on a Sunday night (it helped that the weather was gorgeous). We only had to wait about 15 minutes for a table, relaxing and sipping on Corona's with lime. Upon being seated, we decided to split some appetizers (chicken quesedillas and peel-n-eat shrimp). The cocktail sauce for the shrimp was amazing and shrimp was plentiful. The quesadillas were hot and filled with hearty ingredients of cheese, meet, sour cream and salsa.  If anything, check this place out for the deck.  Was I in Pittsburgh, PA?!  I was proud of my hometown for its uncanny way bringing opportunities of discovery to a hometown resident.
I have been to this place many times over the last 6 years(here visiting family) and I think because I'm so distracted with the view, the company, and the people watching I don't really notice that the service is sub par.  They are friendly, they are accurate and they are BUSY.  Food is always amazing! \"Yay, I'm a fan\"
On the recommendation of the previous reviewer, I booked an appointment with Autumn to fix a bad haircut I received the week before. I work about a block away from the salon, so the convenience (and the amazing price) was a big draw. \n\nThe salon is an odd mix of color, cozy, and sterile, but no matter: I wasn't there for the interior design. Happily, Autumn listened closely to why I wasn't happy with my previous cut, took careful note of the photos I brought in, and proceeded to fix the bad and design the good. She was extremely friendly, easy to chat with, and knew her stuff. I left the salon with a great new cut (exactly what I wanted, though a little short in order to fix the previous blunder), and a new hairdresser to boot. There's nothing quite like the relief of finding a stylist you know you can count on.
Nice people & nice location. Very experienced, which means they can make good recommendations. I felt I was in good hands. Location is very pleasant. The shop is clean, well-kept and feels upscale.\n\nDefinitely going back, and encourage you to try it out!
Definitely recommend this salon! I booked an appointment after having many failed attempts with other stylist that are not able to work with biracial hair. I was frustrated and tired of having the same look because of my unruly mop. I have thick, frizzy, and  curly hair that cannot be tamed easily. The stylist that ended up doing my hair was Chris and she was fantastic! She listened to what I wanted, was fun to talk to, and gave me many helpful tips. I walked out of the salon feeling very satisfied with my new look. Anyone that has biracial hair or children with it should make an appointment with her, you will not be let down!
Wonderful service all around. Had a few drinks at the bar before dinner, bartender was great.\n\nFood was your standard chops and fish. Very well prepared and tasty. Also a great wine list - I recommend the 2003 Lascombes if you like Bordeaux.\n\nThe location isnt the best (downtown) if you are looking for fun afterward.
Really good steaks! The porter house is to die for! Something about cooking a steak in butter! Paula Deen would be proud! The location could be better. With all the new construction of new condos and office buildings going up now would be a great time to move! Was my favorite until Hyde Park came to town. Really good service and drinks!
This is the third Ruth Chris I've been to. The steak was delicious as usual, but the service and overall atmosphere was a little off. \n\nThe other locations I've visited have been located in casinos and I have to say they are more laid back and comfortable. You didn't feel like you had to whisper to your dinner mates. \n\nThe only food complaint I have is that the asparagus was very large and barely warm. But luckily the bread and potatoes were more than enough to go with my steak. \n\nParking here is free if you can find the lot. There was no mention of the parking online or when I made the reservation. So we paid for parking and had to walk a few blocks.
This was a really pleasant surprise.  The normal Friday night ritual erupted last night and that is finding a restaurant interesting enough for me and flexible enough for the lady's particular tastes.  She was going to be nice enough to go to \"Dish\" although I know it's not one of her favs'.  Mantini's also came across the radar screen.  However, I wanted to try somewhere new and we both wanted to try something budget friendly.  Annie's Mom gave us an \"entertainment\" book for Christmas and Papa J's was listed as an option.  I checked out the website and was less than enthusiastic.  Unlike its sister restaurant in Carnegie this spot has a stripped down menu.  I'm guessing because it does most of its business during lunch hours and maybe happy hour.  I called the restaurant and they did have many options not on the internet menu including a couple feature dishes (note to restaurant please update your website, you don't even list any pasta dishes as an option for the downtown location).  We decided to check it out after calling her brother Lee who goes often.  We get there around 730 PM last night (Friday).  Upon entering the extremely old (classic) building I'm struck by the interior which is truly \"old school\".  It's dark wood, exposed brick, ornate lighting and the like...  There are a group of regulars I'd guess sitting at the bar imbibing loudly.  The bartender notices us and asks if we need a table for two.  We are then greeted by a friendly gal (JJ) who takes us to the back dining room which is a bit crowded and she senses our hesitation and takes us to the other side of the bar which only has a few patrons.  Annie confirms with JJ that we can use the entertainment card, she confirms and we save 12 bucks.  She brings us over some decent bread, unfortunately not served warm.  The bread is served along with the obligatory oil and vinegar mix.  She left a big bowl of parmesan cheese for us to add as much as we wanted which was a nice touch.  Annie started with the wedding soup which was okay, but not memorable.  I tried the potato soup, which was pretty tasty although a little bland.  Annie then ordered the chicken Romano which was really good.  The chicken wasn't too \"eggy\" and the coating was almost light which is hard to accomplish with this dish.  In addition the portion size was pretty large and the chicken was cooked perfectly and not dry at all.  They also accommodated her request to have thin spaghetti for the pasta and serve with Alfredo Sauce, which they did for a dollar more.  The whole dish I think was $15.  I ordered the salmon with green beans.  It was a reasonable portion of fish cooked well.  The green beans were crisp and fresh.  The salmon was served on a chipotle pesto.  I found the pesto a bit overpowering and could have skipped it altogether, but if it did need to be served on pesto I would have preferred a traditional style pesto.  Service was spot on from start to finish.  I think JJ's family owns the restaurant.  We inquired about the rumors of the place being haunted and the former incarnations of this place being a brothel.  JJ took us down to the basement and showed us the underground tunnels that used to be used for the local politicians to make their way to the brothel unnoticed.  She also took us upstairs and showed us the Madame's bedroom (incidentally the headboard of the Madame's bed is now the bar downstairs (I took a picture and posted).  The whole meal with a couple of martinis was only $45 after the entertainment card discount not including tip.  And, we both had leftovers.  We stopped at the bar for a nightcap after dinner and the bartender said they are redesigning the menu and trying hard to make this more of a dinner spot than just happy hour.  There was also a band setting up as we left.  It seems like they are trying hard and I intend to be back.  However, be warned if you're looking for a hip happening spot a la \"tamari\" this probably isn't it.  But, if you're looking for decent (3 star) food, great value and service you could do a lot worse.  I'll be back.
Have you met Frank? No? Well you'd better get on that, so you can brag to all your hipster friends that you know the best bartender in Pittsburgh.\n\nSeriously though. Best.\n\nWe found Papa J's at random on July 4th last year because, in typical Pittsburgh fashion, it was raining. We were en route from the Point to Station Square when the skies opened up, and the nearest bar to duck into was Papa J's.\n\nWhat you need to know first is that Papa J's is a historic landmark - it's the oldest standing former brothel in the 'Burgh. The wall behind the bar is actually fitted with a headboard (rumored to be that of the brothel madam), and there's a red light at the stairs.\n\nThe decor is all deep wood, low lighting, and mysterious feel. Better yet? Papa J's is rumored to be haunted.\n\n(Because if cocktails at a haunted former brothel doesn't get you excited about drinking in Pittsburgh, nothing will.)\n\nOh, and that's where Frank comes in. Frank is the friendly older gentleman behind the bar who will go out of his way to serve you the finest cocktails and martinis in downtown Pittsburgh. They've got a great house drink list (including a Bloody-Mary-esque beverage called the 'Angry Malkin'), but Frank also has a 'secret' list that only us 'real serious' Papa J's guests know about. \n\nFrank's policy is this: if you can give him the list of ingredients and he has them, he will make you any drink under the sun. If he makes it and you think it's great, he writes the recipe down in his notebook and recommends it to others. One of his specialties is the Black Eyed Susan. It's the signature drink of the Preakness, and he'll tell you the story of how he learned to make them (spoiler alert: it involves an A+ bartender going out of his way to help a sweet little old lady who loves the horses). \n\nAfter attending a Mixology class with Linda (that's Linda W. of Yelp fame!) where we made Prohibtion-era cocktails, I was in love with this gin drink called a Bee's Knees. It involves the use of honey syrup, which is not a common bar ingredient. Bless Frank's heart, he figured out some concoction of simple syrup and honey, and made me a Bee's Knees!\n\nYou can also choose to eat while at Papa J's, if you can tear your eyes away from all the drink menus. I recommend the bruschetta (almost always get an order of this - it's sooooo oniony, and sprinkled with cheese and a hefty serving of diced tomatoes - so good!), and any of the pizzas. Last time we stopped in, we had the chicken pesto pizza which had PINE NUTS on it!  PINE NUTS! (Those things are edging out beets as my favorite 'why-hello-there-how-did-you-get-on-the-menu' food in Pittsburgh restaurants lately.) The crust is perfect. I don't think I'll ever even try anything else on the menu, since I can't get past these awesome pizzas.\n\nSo, Papa J's is the perfect place to go if you want great booze and good food at decent prices in a neat atmosphere. They're in a great location downtown, and I've never had trouble getting a seat at the bar. I still haven't found any ghost activity, but as long as Frank is serving drinks, I'll certainly keep looking!
I wish more people went to Papa J's. It has great food, a truly unique atmosphere, and Frank. Frank the bartender is one cool guy. I'll get to him later.\n\nFirst, the ambiance. Very old building, low lighting, dark wood... a bit \"dodgy,\" really.\n\nIt could be that the headboard of Madame Dolly Cavanaugh hangs above the bar. Yes, Papa J's used to be brothel in Pittsburgh's industrial heyday. But that's not all the whimsy the restaurant has to offer. Clutch the pearls and phone Rick Sebak, because it's also rumored to be haunted! Frankly, this doesn't surprise me. If you poke around a bit you half expect the members of Mystery Inc. to be disappearing behind false walls. Jinkies.\n\nThe food is good, comforting, and plentiful. The wedding soup is tasty and perfect for taking the chill off you in the winter.  All entrees come with fresh italian bread with dippings and range from $10-$20. You can choose from several pastas with a variety of sauces and meats. Try the veal bolognese pasta, served with tomato cream sauce. Delicious! They regularly have several daily specials, one of which is usually seafood. \n\nNow to Frank. He's a friendly older gentleman with lots of stories to tell. Usually, I drink beer or wine.  But when I'm at Papa J's, I simply let Frank pick my drink. Just tell him what you're in the mood for; something dry, fruity, bitter, or strong... and he will whip up something tasty.  \n\nI highly recommend Papa J's. Go there on one of those nights when you want to go out to eat, but can't quite figure out where to go. You're tired of chains, not in the mood for bar food, and don't want to spend a lot of money. Head to Papa J's Centro. Frank will fix you up!
It's an odd place -- a former brothel that's reputed to be haunted, with a lot of dark polished wood decor. In all the times I've been there, it's never once been crowded. It's very noirish, even in the daytime; the sort of place you'd go to watch horse races -- desperately, of course, on which you'd just bet it all. And the guy at the other end of the bar hasn't been home in years, and the ominous bartender has a Dark Secret, and you'd better keep your damn beak out of it!\n\nExcept the bartenders here are actually quite warm, and not ominous at all. In fact, they're more than willing to learn your preferred arcane beverage recipes. One guy there, Frank, actually keeps a little book of new recipes he learns from customers, which I appreciated quite a bit. I also really enjoy the appetizers here, especially the flatbreads and the bruschetta, which are probably the least noirish foods imaginable.\n\nSo, ignore your instincts about this spooky-seeming place and check it out. The entrees are not terribly impressive, but it's a great stop for an evening with other plans in it.
My girlfriend and I were staying downtown for a couple nights and wanted to have a drink close to the hotel. This was the third of three gay bars we went into that night. (we didn't even have a drink at the second one) And it was by far our favorite. Not a lot of female patroons so if you're a lady on the prowl, I would probably go somewhere else. But if you just want to relax in a comfortable, friendly atmosphere with some decent music, this is the place!\n\nThere were two bartenders and we happened to sit on Jeff's side. I'm sure they were both quite capable but Jeff was amazing at making us feel comfortable and chatted with us quite a bit until it got later and business picked up. Even then, he made sure we were taken care of. He's pretty much amazing and has great eyebrows.\n\nI guess there was some craziness and fighting by the door and outside as the night got later but we never saw it and it didn't clear out the whole bar. I would expect a downtown bar to have a few problems and it seemed like they were taken care of efficiently. No strikes there.\n\nWe stuck to beers and the prices were very reasonable considering the downtown location. Apparently happy hour runs until midnight! We were able to both have some drinks on the cheap and listen some good music. Definitely returning whenever we're there again!
Awesome things about Mon Aimee:\n\na. Kind, knowledgeable, attentive staff.\n\nb. Excellent variety of chocolates from throughout the US as well as tons of international options. (two favorites: Poco Dolce from San Francisco and Eclipse from San Diego)\n\nc. New products appear frequently (exciting for a regular visitor)\n\nd. As other reviewers have enthusiastically mentioned, CAPOGIRO GELATO, dark chocolate flavor. Seriously, the best I've found in the US (...and by that I mean darkest chocolate. It's always too light elsewhere!). We're really lucky they distribute it in Pittsburgh. \n\nMy only caveat would be that for items you can find in the grocery store, such as Chocolove bars, you're better off grabbing them at Whole Foods, Giant Eagle, or Right by Nature - you may save about a buck per bar.
This is one of the hardest places to walk by when you're in the Strip and not be tempted to walk in to. If you're a chocolate lover who's looking for some variety, you'll be overwhelmed and satisfied. Looking for gelato in the warmer months? Head to the back fo the store for something delicious! There's really not much else to the store other than a great selection of chocolates from nearly every corner of the globe.\n\nThe negatives are the service and the prices. Some of the chocolates that you'll find at Mon Aimee can be found significantly cheaper at places like Wegman's (if you're lucky enough to live near one), and we've spent a premium on certain candies in the past that we knew we could get cheaper elsewhere. Sometimes the convenience is worth it, though.\n\nAs for the service, it's a mixed bag. Generally, I've had trouble getting service when looking at the chocolates in the cases, and the staff never seems to be in a friendly mood. While I GUESS they're doing their customers a favor by procuring such a vast variety of chocolate, I'm not sure they should ACT like they're doing us a favor by existing. This strange air of arrogance has always been a turnoff, but what can I say...they have delicious treats;)
Chocolate heaven! There are chocolate bars from all over the world. And the unique wrapping makes you wanna buy all the chocolate if it didn't make such a huge dent in your wallet. \n\nDon't forget to try out their little gelato stand while you're there.
This produce stand is a wonderful resource if you're looking to eat healthy on a tight budget.  A quantity of produce that would cost $40-$50 at Giant Eagle or another supermarket will probably only set you back less than $20 here.  Recently I bought: 5 pounds of apples for $2, bags of baby spinach for $1, an entire flat of mangoes for $8, red bell peppers for under $2/pound... it's like prehistoric prices on some of this stuff.  The selection is decent: you can pretty much always find the type of vegetable you're looking for.\n\nThere are only 2 things that hold Stan's away from a five-star rating.  One is that the market is not really very well-heated in winter, so you will freeze in here if you aren't warmly dressed.  The other is that you have to be very careful in your assessment of what you are about to buy.  That $1 head of cauliflower, or the $1 quart of strawberries, is priced very low for a reason, which is typically because about half of the cauliflowers or baskets of strawberries have gone bad.  At Stan's, if you don't like to do the old-ladyish careful and minute inspection of the produce you're about to buy, you will probably come to regret it.
As the saying goes...\"you get what you pay for\". 100% true. \n\nYes, the fruits and vegetables here are dirt cheap, and yes sometimes you end up with a moldy potato. But, moral of the story here is you have to double check before you buy anything. If you end up with a moldy potato then that's your own fault for being so oblivious. Stan's Market taught me to be a smarter and more aware shopper. \n\nI'm poor. Stan's Market is cheap. I love Stan's Market.
This ice cream parlor isn't just \"vintage\" -- it's the real deal.\n\nKlavon's originally opened in the 1920's, closed in the 1970's for 20 years, and then re-opened in 1999 by a family member.  Many original details remain, including the marble soda fountain counter and the amazing stained glass windows in the front of the building.\n\nThe ice cream flavors are pretty standard.  \n\nIt's a little bit off the beaten path, but definitely worth making a trip for a fun treat and a peek back in time.
Why do people head to Klavon's?  Walking through the door is like walking through a time portal to a simpler time when people were less rushed and people were more chill.\n\nKlavon's used to be a drugstore and the original owner used to be a pharmacist first with the soda fountain as an aside.  The store was closed for 20 years until the current owners, grandkids of the original Klavon decided to reopen it in honor of their dad and grandpa.\n\nAs for their menu, they have all the standards you would expect of an old school ice cream parlor with milk shakes, sundaes, soda floats, as well as just basic ice cream.\n\nBe sure to bring cash, because even though they take debit, there's a service fee to use it.
The ice cream here--the cones, the sundaes, splits, milkshakes, ice cream soda floats--is good but not extraordinary.  You won't find exotic or trendy flavors here, but the good ol' standbys.  What makes Klavon's a place to visit is its atmosphere.\n\nI feel like I should walk into this place wearing bobby socks and a poodle skirt (my sense of history is flawed, as this is a 1920s ice cream parlor), with some dude in a letterman jacket.  But I felt just as welcome in my Summer 2010 duds.  My friend and I sat on stools right by the counter and enjoyed looking all around as we ate (Chocolate Delight sundae--with chocolate whipped cream!--for me, and an orange soda ice cream float for her).  \n\nSometimes I feel awkward taking photos inside eateries, but felt comfortable here as I snapped pictures of the old school phone booths (just decorative) and the glass cases filled with relics.  This also seems like a good place to check out if you want some old-timey candy that's otherwise hard to find.
Mannnnn, I'd LOVE to get invited out on a date here!\n\nI mean, it's perfectly adorable and ever-so-vintage. You've got antique decor (though oddly, they don't feel antique here - it just feels like you've stepped back in time and the whole world is like that), yummy ice cream cones and shakes, candies from yesteryear (with prices to match!), and a friendly staff.\n\nI found this place via a LivingSocial coupon, which truly worked since I never would've known about it otherwise. Klavon's is tucked away in a somewhat deserted part of the Strip District, surrounded by abandoned industrial storefronts. I had the chocolate chip cookie dough cone, which in itself was pretty good, though not amazing. The milkshake and old-school candy? Totally awesome! Highly recommend due to the super sweet (no pun intended) step-back-in-time ambiance and homey feel.\n\nNow all you need is a hot date and a poodle skirt, right?!
This hotel is in a great location right next to the convention center and  is walkable to PNC Park, Heinz Field, downtown bars, etc. \n\nRooms are clean with high ceilings and comfortable beds and pillows. The TVs are vintage mid 90s but who watches that much TV in a hotel room? \n\nThe only negatives are the lack of free breakfast (though they offer coffee in the lobby) and the $22 rate per day for valet parking. Save your money and park at the city garage right down the street which is about $5 or so per day. \n\nThey have a business center you can use to check your email, use the internet, price boarding passes, etc. free right by the front desk. All the staff was friendly too. \n\nI would stay here again in Pittsburgh if I can get a good rate.
Great service, very clean and comfortable!! Definitely recommend!!
A very good Jewish deli tucked in and amongst the small factories and warehouses on Smallman Street in Pittsburgh's Strip District. I cannot believe this place has not been reviewed yet. I guess it is a best kept secret. \n\nThere were four in our party and we ordered a variety of sandwiches that ranged from a traditional Reuben, turkey and Swiss on a bagel to a pastrami and Swiss on marble rye and a turkey and cheese on a bread type that escapes me. Regardless, all the sandwiches were very good to excellent. The meat was lean and adequately piled on. The vegatables on the sandwiches were very fresh. All sandwiches came with a Kosher pickle spear and we opted for bags of Snyder of Hanover chips. I haven't had Snyder chips since I left Pittsburgh eons ago. \n\nThe amount of sandwiches offered were many. The staff were efficient and three-rivers friendly. \n\nI failed to realize that they offered Matzo ball soup. I will have to save that for a return trip to PGH. Since the in-laws live here, that's definitely going to happen.
Great deli.  Had a very good Ruben today.  Great food and friendly service.   I'll definitely be eating here again.
This theater is a beautiful example of the elegance that theaters of the past have.  The restoration was done with fantastic attention to detail and it is so beautiful, you don't know where to look next.  In fact, you may get a stiff neck from looking at the stunning ceiling, sparkling chandilers and incredible detail.\n\nIf you have long legs, or prefer to have space when you sit, your best bet is to sit on the floor level.  Balcony seats provide a great view, but there is a considerably smaller amount of leg room.  This can make a difference in your level of enjoyment of a show.\n\nI've seen two broadway touring shows there and the quality of both was great.  Sound quality and lighting were great and I was impressed with the sets and staging that could be done on touring productions.\n\nMany times in older theaters, bathroom lines are an issue, but the layout and amount of bathrooms on the lower level of the theater make it less of an issue than it is at similiar locations.  And there is even a bar on that level.\n\nThe few downsides to the theater are the high prices for drinks (but that is expected at any location like this) and the lobby gets really cold on winter days from all the patrons coming in and out.  Theater doors usually open around a half hour before curtain time, so take that into consideration for your arrival time.
The 3 course combo is a great deal!!! Cheap filling and downtown. You even get chocolate chip cookies. Sundae bar is still in a BATHTUB- \nbring a party- there's room for it and no one here.. people forget about it.
I loved this place!\n\nGreat selection! I ordered 6 buffalo wings I wasn't really hungry) but they were super yummy! And I loved that they gave me more than enough bleu cheese! No skimping!\n\nMy boyfriend ordered the 3 course option...1. Tortilla Soup (also yummy!) 2. Burger (average.)  and a chocolate chip cookie (super yummy)!\n\nThe waiter was very nice and even brought us an extra cookie! We tipped him 40%\nI am very impressed with the service, prompt and extra friendly!!\n\n\nHighly recommend this place! Great for kids too! So many options!\n=)
Yes, Max & Erma's is a chain, but not all are created equal.  The Max & Erma's at 630 Stanwix Street in downtown Pittsburgh is a great place for a casual meal.  They have very good food and service.  If you hit there during rush hour skip the waiting list and go to the bar for faster service. They have great burgers, but I like the choice of a half sandwich and soup or salad.  I also like the frequent diner program, which gives you a 5% discount after eating there about 5 times and a larger discount the more often you eat there.  They also send you specials via e-mail from time to time.  On Wednesdays they give you two free chocolate chip cookies with your meal. On your birthday month they give you six free chocolate chip cookies.  The cookies are usually served hot, right from the kitchen and are delicious. Max & Erma's also has a great bar.  This location is just across the river from PNC Park and Heinz Field.  You can grab the T about 1/2 block from Max & Erma's and get off at the North Shore stop, which is between the two stadiums.  There is also parking on the North Shore that is less expensive than parking in downtown Pittsburgh.
Have you ever had a party, and needed like, a lot of random things for it? This is your spot. They have EVERYTHING: Mardi Gras beads, tableware, Pittsburgh sports goodies, weird plastic babydolls, I mean EVERYTHING. If Stefon from SNL ever featured a party store, this would be the place!\n\nPrices are good: on my most-recent visit, I managed to get supplies for party giftbags for 70 people for only $70 bucks. Pretty awesome!\n\nDo you want to throw a Halloween party? How about a cowboy party? How about a Hawaiian NASCAR bachelorette party on St. Patrick's Day? You can totally pull that off with the help of Feinberg's!\n\nAnd in the event that you can't find just what you're looking for, the staff is super helpful and will go out of their way to get you what you need.\n\nSomething to note: you can only use a credit card if you spend more than $10, so if you're just buying a few things, bring cash. They're open on Saturdays, so it can become part of your normal Strip District stroll!
What's this, a fifth review of a hotdog stand?  Read on o' Downtown diners!\n\nIt figures.  The other day I was telling my Yelp friend Mike O. about my sudden lunchtime craving for encased meats.  I figured hey, it being a nice day why not get a dog with all the goodies on it and dine al fresco?  It's mid-October--how many more outdoor dining days are we gonna have?  So I got me a regular dog loaded up with all the goodies, fries, and a drink.  Mmmm-mmm good, right?
Solid dogs, ESP if you are a dog fanatic. Gravy Fries are awesome. I have lunch here everyday I am in Pittsburgh. Much better than Franktuary.
Sammy's is well-known for it's corned beef sandwiches!  They are actually very tasty, and the beef is fresh and tender.
The gallery is right above the Wood Street T/Bus Station and can easily be missed, well at least that was the case for me. Having gone through that station at least few times a day during my college days - I never once realize there was a gallery above the station.\n\nSince last year's gallery crawl - I've gone there few times including during this year's gallery crawl. Depending on your view towards art - this place can be pretty interesting with their showcase of some unconventional art piece. Most of the time - the entire floor consists of one major art piece.\n\nThis is definitely a stop for any art lovers.
My husband and I have used Amtrak to get from Pittsburgh to Chicago and we have also used it to get to Altoona, Lancaster, and Harrisburg, PA.  We like using it to get to Chicago because the schedule isn't that bad--it leaves late at night an arrives early the next morning.  We always get the sleeper car.  When Amtrak is on time, or if it's less than say an hour late, it can be wonderful.  The problem is that Amtrak is at the mercy of the freight railroads that own the tracks. \n\nLast year, according to my husband the train enthusiast, the train was constantly arriving into Chicago 4 to 5 hours late because of extreme frieght train congestion.  We avoided it then, but since then the company that owns the tracks has gotten its act together and its been much better.  It's also nice that your food travels with you and you can get up and stretch your legs when you want to.\n\nAmtrak used to run two trains a day to Chicago and two across Pennsylvania.  Unfortunately, budget cuts a few years ago caused one of these to be cancelled, so it is much less convenient.  Also, the train to Washington, DC leaves Pittsburgh in the wee hours of the morning.\n\nOne thing I like is that Amtrak, upon 24 hours notice, will provide refridgeration or ice for my insulin.  If you are a \"special needs\" traveller, they can usually accomodate you with advanced notice.  One other tip.  If you are using Amtrak, you can actually check your trains' on-time record using the website.  You can see which trains have good on-time records and which don't (and believe my husband when he says it varies from route to route).  You should also ALWAYS call Amtrak's number 1-800-USA-RAIL before you head out to the train station to check whether or not it will be on time.
Wow.  What a difference a few years makes.  Back in the late 90s, I used to ride the Pennsylvanian to H'burg a few times a year.  Took the train this past weekend for a meeting -- out Sunday morning and back yesterday afternoon -- and I was amazed by the experience.\n\nI see the other reviews about the station.  Forget the station.  Any train station.  They're all sad and they offer very little in the way of amenities.  You're not there for the station; you're there for the ride.  \n\nFirst and foremost, the trains were on time for both trips.  In fact, we arrived in H'burg and Pgh EARLY!  \n\nNot only has the on-time performance improved, but the service on the train is MUCH better than I remember.  The conductors and cafe staff are warm, friendly and helpful.   More like hosts than employees.   \n\nNow I did spend the extra $19 to get \"business class\" seats.  It's a Metroliner car with more room between seats and a power outlet in each row.  AND FREE WIRELESS INTERNET for nearly the entire journey!  You also receive unlimited non-alcoholic beverages and a newspaper.   I think I drank more than $19 worth of beverages on each leg of the trip.   \n\nYea, I could have driven the route in about three hours and the train took five hours, but I arrived in H'burg without being burned out from navigating the gawdawful turnpike.   Plus, I was able to get some work done.  Not as much as I had planned, mind you, because I spent most of the time looking out the window at the scenery.  It's a series of wonderful views between Greensburg and Harrisburg.
Stopped by Mark's for a quick bite to eat last night.  Both outside and in the place looks like an ordinary, run-of-the-mill bar, so I wasn't expecting anything special.  Then I saw that they had Dogfish Head and East End beers on tap - nice, I figured they'd just have macros.  I ordered a 60 minute IPA and a double-decker corned beef/pastrami Reuben.  The sandwich was amazing - fresh bread, lots of good meat, house-made dressing and slaw, and a heap of thick, flavorful, house-made chips.  It was easily the best sandwich I've had in Pittsburgh; admittedly this isn't saying much, but this sandwich would hold its own anywhere.  And at only $7 for a huge meal it's a great value, too.  I'll definitely be visiting Mark's again soon.
I went to the Strip to buy cheese for a few recipes I was going to try.  Since this was my first time buying cheese in the strip, I was planning on making my purchase at the more popular place next door.  However, I ended up buying everything from Stamoolis instead.  I like quality, but I also like a good price and I got both at Stamoolis.  It was nice to be able to get what I needed for a cheaper price than some other places.  I also love the bulk items here inlcuding the organic whole wheat coucous.\n\nMy only problem, even though it was minor for me was the the staff did not seem overly friendly or helpful.
I stop here every time I am in the Strip.  Authentic Greek grocery.  Do not pass up their stuffed grape leaves or the freshly made Babaganous & hummus.  They have great cheeses and a variety of dried lentils and spices.  You will find something delicious here, I promise you that.
A great Mediterranean food store. I was impressed by the quality and low price of the bulk spices. If you're having trouble finding a spice in Pittsburgh, then give this place a shot.\n\nThere were also several trays of Greek desserts. Bot only Were there a couple of expected sweets such as baklava and honey cookies but also chocolate baklava and mixed assortments.\n\nThe store's biggest selection of goods is in deli meats and cheeses. I picked up some hot sausage and found the price per pound to be the lowest in Pittsburgh.\n\nI also liked that the store carries some harder to find goods such as tahini.\n\nStamoolis Bros is certainly worth a stop when shopping int the strip considering their prices and selection.
I love your wonderful cheese, Penn Mac!  You have an amazing variety, all my favorites.
This place was noted as a \"must visit\" location during my last trip to Pittsburgh. I must say, it was definitely worth the visit. \n\nTo all reading this, be aware that essentially, this is just a grocery store we're talking about here. However, the rustic building, and kitchy offerings (like pour your own olive oil...or taste our 100cheeses) makes it kind of special. \n\nWhen I was given this recommendation, I was told \"head to the back to where the cheese is\". So, I did. WHOA - so much more cheese than I ever expected. But no macaroni and cheese....boo. \n\nThey should really consider serving mac and cheese. \n\nThat's all.
First impression upon entering the store (2/5) : \"What the heck is that smell?!\" After walking into the store a little further, I found my answer. CHEESE! The store was a little on the \"sloppy/pack rat/ sweaty/ definitely wouldn't hurt to mop every once in a while\" side. My first instinct wasn't to leave so that is always a good thing. \n\nCustomer service (5/5): I went there because my husband randomly missed Spain so he wanted to make a bunch of mini bocadillos with different types of meat and cheeses. We already got the meat from another place down the street so what better place to get a variety of cheeses than the Macaroni co? The lady that helped us was wonderful!! She was so patient with us even though there were a million people waiting in line.  She automatically knew which cheese to recommend based on what would compliment the meat that we had. She was extremely knowledgeable about the various kinds of cheese. I could seriously listen to her talk all day about the history of the cheese... she made it so interesting.  My husband is VERY indecisive so he couldn't figure out which one he liked more. \n\nFood (4/5): We tried at least 7 different kinds of cheese and I didn't like any of them... definitely not a cheese person. My husband on the other hand, LOVED every single one of them! We also went there for some Rustic Italian or any hard shelled bread. I know this is not the store's fault be there needs to be a sign that says, \"Do NOT touch the actual bread unless you are buying it!!!\" I saw at least 3 people who were squeezing the bread with their dirty hands to see if it was soft. Totally grossed me out. Why would anyone think that is okay?!?! I can understand if you are squeezing the bread through the bag but don't TOUCH it! That is only reason I gave it 4 stars instead of 5. Oh and the fact that it wasn't that clean.
I hit the Strip District about one weekend a month, and Penn Mac is always a \"must stop\". They have a fantastic cheese, olive, and cured meat selection, its basically a  one stop anitpasto plate. Penn Mac also has those hard to find Italian ingredients, fresh pastas, and great fresh bread. Their produce selection leaves a little to be desired, but the great thing about the strip is great produce is only a few doors away. This place does get PACKED on the weekends so I hope you can tolerate crowds.
Penn Mac is a fun shopping experience. I used to do a lot of my weekly shopping here, but now that I live in the North Hills I've got that can't-cross-the-river syndrome and I only get there every other week or so. It's miles above a Market District, though, in terms of entertainment value and pricing.\n\nThe cheese counter is pretty good. It's not the most amazing selection ever, but it's great for Pittsburgh. For example, they don't carry a variety of aged cheddars or Stiltons, opting instead to offer one or two basic and many flavored versions (with apples, with onions, etc.) They do let you sample, which I recommend; like another reviewer, I've gotten over-old blue cheese here once or twice. They've always enforced the half-pound minimum for me. The fresh mozzarella is great, and I can't resist it when tomatoes are in season. I hate to even mention it, but one time I got home and found... well, a hair in my mozzarella. It put me off for a few weeks but seems to have been a one-time incident (and no, I never brought it up to them).\n\nThe deli has fantastic prices and does proper thin slices, nicely laid out on paper sheets so it doesn't stick together. Daniele prosciutto is amazing, and the domestic is pretty good at a great price. Iberico and Serrano jamon? Yes please.\n\nService at both the cheese and deli counters can take a pretty long time if you go on a weekend. However, I've been able to walk right up on weekday afternoons, and the weekend logjam is kind of fun once in a while.\n\nIn the same room they have the amazing olive bar. I pretty much only buy olives in the Strip. I know the Iggle has an olive bar, but everything I've ever bought from one tastes off in a way I can't put my finger on. Castleventrano olives (a bright, clear light green) are amazing: buttery and briny and fruity with a firm texture. Cerignola are good, and the various stuffed olives on offer are nice if you don't feel like dealing with pits.\n\nI haven't really bought many of their bulk goods aside from Jordan almonds, to which I am shamelessly addicted. They have a variety of pretty colors, as well as the \"seconds\" which aren't as shiny but taste great anyway.\n\nI love the selection of anchovies, tuna and tomato products in the dry goods area. They also have a good variety of hot sauces, though I can't say I've ever seen Pickapeppa there. Full range (I think) of Dave's Insanity, and lots of other brands as well. Important: They do sell Blennd concentrate, which you can also pick up at the Iggle. I have fond childhood memories of drinking Blennd at the KMart cafeteria growing up. I introduced my Michigan-born husband to it and he never visits Pittsburgh without getting Blennd at least once. (You can also get it premixed and cold at Wholey's, FYI.)\n\nIn the next room you'll find baccala (yum), pour-your-own olive oils at a reasonable price (not a huge selection, but the Spanish is fruity and a good everyday sort of thing at $4.99/12oz). I pretty much never buy bread here, opting to hit up the double rustic baguettes at Mancini's instead. The anise love knot cookies are great.\n\nThe last room has produce, normally at a good price but not the best selection. They do have fresh figs in season, thank God. I have to admit I've never tried the fresh pasta, since that's one of those things I just make at home. I should probably remedy that so I can offer an opinion on it. They sometimes have refrigerated and ready-to-go San Pelligrino Chinotto, a bitter soda that comes in a pretty bottle you can use as a small vase afterwards.\n\nCheckout is straightforward and efficient, but you will be in line for a while if you go on a weekend. It's nuts, just like everywhere else in the Strip. If you can, visit all the shops both on a weekday and on a weekend to enjoy two totally different experiences.\n\nThey do have a small parking area behind the store on Liberty, with which I wish you good luck on a Saturday. Otherwise it's street parking, but there's a ton of that, and walking past and through the other shops in the Strip is so much fun it shouldn't matter anyway.
One star off for the veggie section.  Stopped here during a recent trip to Pittsburgh: wound up buying a reusable tote to bring goodies home to Boston.  \n\nThe cheese shop? To. Die. For.  We need one of these in Boston. So much yumminess in such a little space!!!\n\nGreat range of olive oil, nuts (bulk), did i mention the plethora of cheese available?\n\nThey ship...I'm thrilled.  This place saved me a trip to italy.
How can you not love Penn Mac? There are so many good things about this lovely little gem of a place. If you're a foodie, you simply must check it out. The variety of delectable spices, cheeses, deli meats, bread, grains and pasta boggle my mind. I tried a habanero soft cheese this weekend that I couldn't help but buy. My eyes were tearing up from the potency of the habanero while my taste buds were throwing a mini dance party. It was creamy pungent cheesy perfection. This is also a great place to pick up 'from scratch' Italian meal essentials. I could really go on about this place. Take a chance and visit one weekend, you won't regret it!
Just one of the best for cheese and olive oil!  Spices, too. Love the cheese counter.  Can get busy but usually a cheese to sample while you wait.  \n\nCheck it out and check out the other reviews for more info!
I like little indie theaters like this.  (WARNING: If you want big comfy seats, digital projection, surround sound, and a bucket o' soda, head elsewhere!)  It's small, shows art/foreign/indie films, and you can get a ginger ale for $1.50.  My ticket was only $4 since I'm a grad student...you can't beat that, and there are some amazing movies that show here!  My husband complained the whole time that the seats were uncomfortable, but I was fine.\n\nI am glad that we have the Harris downtown, and I will most likely return.
